THE  ROLE  OF  NON-GOVERNMENTAL
ORGANIZATIONS  AND  UNIVERSITIES
IN  INTERNATIONAL  SCIENCE  AND

TECHNOLOGY  COOPERATION

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE

EDUCATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

SECOND  SESSION

JULY  15,  2008

Serial No. 110–114

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov

43–350PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2008

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
ANDRE´ CARSON,  Indiana

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE EDUCATION

HON.  BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington,  Chairman

EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
ANDRE´ CARSON,  Indiana
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas

JIM  WILSON  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

DAHLIA  SOKOLOV  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member
MELE´ WILLIAMS  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

BESS  CAUGHRAN  Research  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

July  15,  2008

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Brian  Baird,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  Re-
search  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.
House of Representatives ....................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Vernon  J.  Ehlers,  Ranking  Minority  Member,
Subcommittee  on  Research  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science
and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Russ  Carnahan,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Research  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science  and
Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .......................................................

Witnesses:

Dr.  Alan  I.  Leshner,  Chief  Executive  Officer,  American  Association  for  the

Advancement of Science; Executive Publisher, SCIENCE

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Michael  T.  Clegg,  Foreign  Secretary,  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  The

National Academies

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  William  A.  Wulf,  Member,  Board  of  Directors,  U.S.  Civilian  Research

and Development Foundation (CRDF)

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr. James A. Calvin, Interim Vice President for Research; Professor of Statis-

tics, Texas A&M University

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Page
2
3

6
7

7
8

8

9
11
14

15
17
22

23
25
37

39
41
46
46

(III)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

THE  ROLE  OF  NON-GOVERNMENTAL  ORGANI-
ZATIONS  AND  UNIVERSITIES 
INTER-
NATIONAL  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY  CO-
OPERATION

IN 

TUESDAY,  JULY  15,  2008

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE EDUCATION,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:07  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Brian  Baird
[Chairman of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE

EDUCATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

The Role of Non-governmental
Organizations and Universities

in International Science and

Technology Cooperation

TUESDAY, JULY 15, 2008

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

The purpose of the hearing is to examine the role of U.S. non-governmental orga-
nizations  and  universities  in  international  science  and  technology  cooperation,  in
particular relative to the role of the Federal Government.

2. Witnesses:

• Dr. Alan Leshner, Chief Executive Officer, American Association for the Ad-
vancement of Science (AAAS), and Executive Publisher of the journal Science.
• Dr. Michael Clegg, in  his  capacity  as  Foreign  Secretary,  National  Academy
of Sciences. Dr. Clegg is also Donald Bren Professor of Biological Sciences and
of  Ecology  and  Evolutionary  Biology  at  the  University  of  California,  Irvine.
• Dr.  William  Wulf,  in  his  capacity  as  a  Member  of  the  Board  of  Directors,
Civilian  Research  and  Development  Foundation  (CRDF).  Dr.  Wulf  is  also
AT&T Professor of Computer Science at the University of Virginia and imme-
diate Past President of the National Academy of Engineering.

• Dr. James Calvin, Interim Vice President for Research, Texas A&M Univer-

sity. Dr. Calvin is also a Professor of Statistics at Texas A&M.

3. Overarching Questions:

• What  are  the  roles  of  non-governmental  organizations  (NGOs)  and  univer-
sities in fostering international science cooperation relative to that of the Fed-
eral  Government  and  to  each  other?  What  unique  strengths  does  each  of  the
organizations  represented  at  the  hearing  bring  to  this  effort?  What  are  their
respective limitations? How do NGOs and universities coordinate their efforts
with the Federal Government and with each other?
• How might the Federal Government take better advantage of science and the
U.S.  scientific  community  in  pursuing  its  foreign  policy  goals  and  in  helping
to lead the world toward global solutions for global challenges such as water,
climate, energy and infectious diseases?

4. Overview

On  April  2,  2008,  the  Subcommittee  on  Research  and  Science  Education  held  a
hearing  to  examine  the  federal  role  in  international  science  and  technology  (S&T)
cooperation.1 Witnesses were invited from the Office of Science and Technology Pol-
icy (OSTP), the National Science Foundation (NSF), the Department of State (DOS),
and  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA).  The  research
agencies,  such  as  NSF  and  NASA,  support  science  for  the  sake  of  science;  that  is,
they support cooperative research activities that enable U.S. scientists to work with

1 http://science.house.gov/publications/hearings¥markups¥details.aspx?NewsID=2134

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

the best scientists and access the best research sites around the world, or that lever-
age foreign funds to build world class research facilities. However, witnesses agreed
that  while  DOS  is  responsible  for  establishing  U.S.  diplomatic  priorities,  the  re-
search agencies support cooperative S&T activities that may also benefit U.S. diplo-
matic objectives. Furthermore, OSTP and the research agencies provide intellectual
support  to  DOS  on  S&T-related  issues,  and  DOS  helps  the  research  agencies  nego-
tiate formal international S&T agreements. The purpose of the April 2 hearing was
to learn about the breadth of U.S. Government sponsored cooperative S&T activities
and  to  examine  the  extent  to  which  these  activities  are  coordinated  or  prioritized
across the government.

The purpose of this hearing is to examine the role of non-governmental organiza-
tions  in  international  S&T  cooperation,  and  the  relationship  between  those  organi-
zations  and  the  Federal  Government.  NGOs  and  universities  play  critical  roles  in
promoting  and  managing  U.S.  participation  in  international  S&T  cooperation.  Sci-
entific organizations such as the National Academies and the American Association
for  the  Advancement  of  Science  (AAAS)  can  mobilize  U.S.  scientific  leadership  in  a
way  that  the  U.S.  Government  generally  cannot,  and  they  can  engage  in  troubled
countries where the government has strained or no official diplomatic relations. The
U.S.  Civilian  Research  and  Development  Foundation  (CRDF)  also  has  more  flexi-
bility and credibility than official government representatives in certain regions. Or-
ganizations such as the Institute for International Education (IIE) and NAFSA: As-
sociation  of  International  Educators  promote  the  open  exchange  of  students  and
scholars across borders. Universities not only welcome foreign students and scholars
to  their  campuses  and  send  their  own  students  and  scholars  abroad,  they  are  in-
creasingly experimenting with satellite campuses in regions such as the Middle East
and  in  educating  a  more  globally  aware  student  body.  Finally,  a  number  of  private
foundations  fund  certain  science  or  technology  based  initiatives,  typically  in  agri-
culture and/or health, including Gates, Sloan, Carnegie, and Rockefeller. One much
smaller foundation, the Lounsbery Foundation, provides seed funding to help jump-
start  international  cooperative  S&T  activities  not  related  to  agriculture,  health  or
other areas not supported by the big foundations.

5. NGO Activities in International S&T Cooperation

The National Academies (comprised of the National Academy of Sciences, the Na-
tional  Academy  of  Engineering  and  the  Institute  of  Medicine)  have  a  long  history
of engagement in global S&T issues, run primarily out of the Policy and Global Af-
fairs  Division.  The  National  Academies  are  represented  at  the  18-Member  Inter-
Academy Council and the 98-Member InterAcademy Panel, both of which are global
networks  of  national  and/or  regional  science  academies  that  take  on  global  S&T
challenges.  The  Council  produces  reports  for  policy-makers  on  global  issues,  most
recently  on  a  sustainable  energy  future,  whereas  the  Panel  is  focused  more  on  ca-
pacity building. The National Academies also work on a bilateral basis—for example
with  China  on  biosecurity  and  with  Israel  and  the  Palestinian  Authority  on  water
issues. They frequently sponsor meetings and workshops to bring together scientists
and  engineers  from  different  countries  but  with  common  interests  and  challenges.
In general, the National Academies have unparalleled credibility and a unique abil-
ity to regularly mobilize a global network of scientists and our own scientific leader-
ship  in  cooperative  efforts  to  address  global  concerns  across  the  spectrum  of  S&T
issues.

The  American  Association  for  the  Advancement  of  Science  (AAAS),  publisher  of
Science  magazine,  also  has  global  credibility  and  name  recognition,  but  does  not
have  the  same  built-in  network  of  comparable  organizations.  The  AAAS  Inter-
national  Office,  which  has  just  a  handful  of  staff,  supports  three  strategic  goals:
international  scientific  cooperation;  capacity-building  and  workforce  enhancements
(including  increased  participation  of  women  in  science);  and  sustainable  develop-
ment. The AAAS Center for Science, Technology and Security also works on a global
level  to  address  non-proliferation  and  arms  control.  AAAS  does  not  produce  reports
directly  for  policy-makers,  but  it  does  produce  reports  for  the  community  that  are
often  of  interest  to  policy-makers.  AAAS  also  facilitates  meetings  of  scientists  from
around  the  world,  sometimes  in  partnership  with  the  National  Academies.  The
theme of the 2008 AAAS Annual Meeting was ‘‘Science and Technology from a Glob-
al Perspective’’ and among the keynote speakers were the President of the Republic
of  Rwanda  and  the  Science  Adviser  to  the  Secretary  of  State.  As  an  organization
they  are  making  a  concerted  effort  to  engage  more  U.S.  scientists  in  international
cooperation.

The U.S. Civilian Research and Development Foundation (CRDF) was authorized
by Congress in 1992 (P.L. 102–511) and established by NSF in 1995. CRDF receives
support  from  several  foundations  and  from  the  U.S.  Government—primarily  an  an-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

nual grant from DOS, but also lesser amounts for specific programs from NSF, NIH,
and DOD. While CRDF has many different kinds of programs in cooperative science
research,  education  and  training,  including  an  industry  partnership  program,  it  is
perhaps  best  known  for  its  role  in  helping  to  redirect  weapons  scientists  in  the
Former  Soviet  Union  (FSU).  CRDF,  as  an  NGO  without  the  constraints  of  official
government-to-government diplomacy and bureaucracy, became very adept at enlist-
ing FSU weapons scientists in cooperative civilian research with U.S. scientists, and
bypassing  bureaucracy  and  corruption  on  the  FSU  side  to  transfer  to  the  scientists
the  funds  necessary  to  partner  in  this  research.  In  2004,  CRDF  began  to  expand
its  reach  beyond  the  FSU  to  developing  countries  and  troubled  regions  throughout
the  world  as  well  as  to  broaden  its  expertise  to  the  full  range  of  global  S&T  chal-
lenges.

The  international  programs  and  initiatives  at  Texas  A&M  University  are  fairly
representative  of  such  programs  at  research  universities  across  the  country.  Texas
A&M  has  formal  research  agreements  with  more  than  130  institutions  in  45  coun-
tries  and  enrolls  over  4,000  international  students  from  124  countries.  Nationwide,
40.5  percent  of  the  583,000  foreign  students  studying  in  the  U.S.  in  2006–07  were
enrolled  in  science  and  engineering  programs.2 The  university  also  welcomes  inter-
national faculty and scholars for limited term research and education appointments
and likewise sends some of its own faculty to foreign universities. The Research and
Science  Education  Subcommittee  explored  the  benefits  of  the  open  exchange  of
science and engineering students and scholars in a February 2008 hearing.3 In addi-
tion,  Texas  A&M  maintains  two  overseas  centers  in  Italy  and  in  Mexico  City  and
is  currently  establishing  a  third  one  in  Costa  Rica.  Faculty  and  students  have  par-
ticipated  in  more  than  600  research  and  development  projects  in  over  80  countries.
In 2003 the university opened a branch campus in Doha, Qatar, offering four under-
graduate  engineering  degrees.  It  will  soon  be  establishing  research  centers  and
graduate  programs  at  the  Qatar  campus.  The  Technology  and  Innovation  Sub-
committee examined the specific issue of the internationalization of U.S. universities
as part of a July 2007 hearing on the globalization of R&D.4

6. Questions for Witnesses

All  four  witnesses  were  asked  to  address  in  their  testimony  questions  similar  to

the ‘‘overarching questions’’ listed previously.

2 ‘‘Open Doors Report on International Educational Exchange,’’ Institute of International Edu-

cation, 2007.

3 http://science.house.gov/publications/hearings¥markups¥details.aspx?NewsID=2064
4 http://science.house.gov/publications/hearings¥markups¥details.aspx?NewsID=1926

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

Chairman BAIRD. Good morning. Our hearing will come to order.
I want to thank all our witnesses, my dear friend, Dr. Ehlers, and
Members  in  the  audience  for  being  here.  This  is  the  third  hearing
we  are  having  in  a  series  of  meetings  dealing  with  the  issue  of
international scientific collaboration and what some have called sci-
entific  diplomacy,  the  idea  that  scientific  exchanges  can  go  a  long
way towards not only advancing science itself but advancing inter-
national  relationships.  Both  Dr.  Ehlers  and  I  are  very  passionate
about  this,  both  of  us  trained  as  scientists,  and  having  had  the
privilege  of  meeting  people  from  around  the  world  who  have  been
impacted by collaborative exchanges, we place a high value on this.
In the past, we have heard from government agencies, and today
we  will  hear  from  three  non-governmental  organizations  that  en-
gage in scientific diplomacy and from a university that supports re-
search and education partnerships, not just across its southern bor-
ders  but  halfway  across  the  world  to  a  country  and  culture  radi-
cally different from our own, and we look forward to hearing about
that. As important as it is for the U.S. Government to actively en-
gage in science diplomacy, the organizations we are having with us
today  represented  here  add  unique  value  to  the  effort.  They  are
widely  known  and  respected  throughout  the  world.  They  represent
the  best  of  U.S.  science  and  higher  education,  and  they  have  the
flexibility,  the  connections,  and  the  know-how  to  engage  scientists
and  pursue  good  science  even  in  countries  where  government-to-
government  relations  are  tense  or  limited  and  in  countries  with
limited S&T capacity of their own.

I  had  an  interesting  brief  chat  with  Dr.  Leshner  earlier  about,
for  example,  the  challenge  in  some  cultures  of  producing  non-sig-
nificant  results,  if  that  is  a  failure  of  experience  and  failure  is  not
allowed,  goodness  gracious,  how  do  you  do  science  if  you  cannot
fail?

While  I  often  emphasize  the  diplomatic  benefits  of  international
science and technology cooperation, there are also many compelling
reasons  for  the  U.S.  public  and  private  sectors  alike  to  make  S&T
cooperation  a  national  priority.  Visit  any  of  the  high-tech  enter-
prises in my district and I am sure across the country and you will
see  they  are  indeed  international  endeavors,  and  bringing  people
here, sending our people internationally, is an often I think unseen
benefit of collaboration.

The  major  challenges  faced  by  our  nation  are  the  major  chal-
lenges faced by the entire globe, and our country cannot effectively
pursue solutions on its own.

So,  I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  this  very  distinguished  panel
of  witnesses  about  their  efforts  to  promote  international  science
and cooperation as well as their recommendations for how the Fed-
eral  Government  might  strengthen  its  efforts  through  more  effec-
tive  partnerships  with  U.S.  scientific  organizations  and  research
universities.

I  will  tell  you  a  brief  anecdote  which  others  have  heard  before,
but  I  think  it  is  so  compelling  that  I  will  tell  it  often  here  and  it
is in visiting Egypt a couple of years ago at an international meet-
ing  and  meeting  a  young  woman  with  a  head  scarf.  Actually,  not
a  young  woman,  she  was  probably  in  her  late  50’s  with  a  head
scarf,  kind  of  classic  Arabic  woman;  and  when  she  was  introduced

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

to  Howard  Berman,  he  said  he  was  from  southern  California,  a
proud fist shot into the air and the woman said, I am a mighty Tro-
jan.  She  had  gotten  her  doctorate  at  USC,  and  she  didn’t  just  say
I  got  my  doctorate  at  USC,  she  had  become  a  mighty  Trojan.  And
that  kind  of  affection  and  sincere  warmth  one  doesn’t  take  lightly.
And  it  is  through  scientific  collaboration  that  much  of  that  is
achieved.

And  so  we  look  forward  to  our  witnesses  today,  and  with  that  I

recognize Dr. Ehlers for opening remarks.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Baird follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN BRIAN BAIRD

Good  morning.  Welcome  to  this  Research  and  Science  Education  Subcommittee
hearing  on  The  Role  of  Non-governmental  Organizations  and  Universities  in  Inter-
national Science and Technology Cooperation.

Three months ago this subcommittee heard testimony from a panel of senior gov-
ernmental officials representing some of the key federal agencies and offices respon-
sible  for  supporting  and  setting  priorities  for  U.S.  participation  in  international
science  and  technology  cooperation.  In  that  hearing  we  learned  a  little  about  the
breadth  of  cooperative  S&T  activities  supported  by  the  U.S.  Government.  We
learned that research agencies are largely successful at pursuing international part-
nerships  to  further  science  and  the  agencies’  own  domestic  missions  and  that  the
State  Department  actively  pursues  S&T  agreements  to  further  its  foreign  policy
goals. However, it seems to me there is room for improved coordination and priority
setting  across  agencies,  especially  when  it  comes  to  leveraging  the  quality  and  rep-
utation of U.S. science to further diplomatic goals.

This  morning  we  will  hear  from  three  non-governmental  organizations  that  ac-
tively  engage  in  science  diplomacy,  and  from  a  university  that  supports  research
and  education  partnerships  not  just  across  its  southern  borders  but  halfway  across
the  world  to  a  country  and  culture  radically  different  from  our  own.  As  important
as it is for the U.S. Government to actively engage in science diplomacy, the organi-
zations  represented  here  add  unique  value  to  this  effort.  They  are  known  and  re-
spected  throughout  the  world.  They  represent  the  best  of  U.S.  science  and  higher
education.  And  they  have  the  flexibility,  the  connections  and  the  know-how  to  en-
gage scientists and pursue good science even in countries where government-to-gov-
ernment relationships are tense or limited and in countries with limited S&T capac-
ity of their own.

While I often emphasize the diplomatic benefits of international S&T cooperation,
there  are  many  compelling  reasons  for  the  U.S.  public  and  private  sectors  alike  to
make S&T cooperation a national priority. The major challenges faced by our nation
are  the  major  challenges  faced  by  the  entire  globe,  and  the  U.S.  cannot  effectively
pursue solutions on its own.

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  this  very  distinguished  panel  of  witnesses  about
their  efforts  to  promote  international  science  and  technology  cooperation  as  well  as
their recommendations for how the Federal Government might strengthen its efforts
through  more  effective  partnerships  with  U.S.  scientific  organizations  and  research
universities.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  First,  my  apologies  for
being  a  bit  late.  We  were  trying  to  solve  the  Fannie  Mae  and
Freddie  Mac  difficulties  in  the  space  of  15  minutes.  It  would  have
been easier to solve Maxwell’s equations.

Today’s hearing gives us an opportunity to learn about efforts by
non-governmental  organizations  and  universities  in  science  diplo-
macy  around  the  world.  The  federal  agencies  have  a  responsibility
in  this  area,  of  course,  as  we  learned  in  a  previous  hearing,  but
many  of  the  organizations  before  us  today  are  uniquely  positioned
to leverage their own strengths at building relationships in science
and  technology  cooperation  that  transcend  literal  and  figurative
borders. Even in times of governmental conflict, relationships built
on trust and mutual respect will outlast current frictions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

One of the advantages of being older is to remember, this has all
happened before; and I remember during the years of the Iron Cur-
tain,  things  of  that  sort,  the  two  things  that  contributed  a  great
deal  to  the  breaking  down  of  the  Iron  Curtain  were  exchanges  of
cultural  activities,  primarily  musical,  but  there  were  some  other
cultural  activities,  too,  and  that  broke  the  ice.  But  I  think  what
really did make major contributions is the interchange of scientists
between  the  Soviet  Union  and  the  West.  Both  parties,  both  the
American  scientists  and  the  Russian  scientists,  were  very  anxious
to  work  together.  They  did  not  regard  this  as  a  political  activity,
but the net effect on the government of Russia I think was to open
the  doors  even  wider  because  they  could  learn  from  us  and  they
did.

This  committee  knows  that  the  United  States  will  not  remain
globally  competitive  in  science  and  technology  unless  we  are  able
to  work  with  international  partners.  Utilizing  all  avenues  to
strengthen these relationships, public and private, official and non-
official,  will  be  critical  to  our  success  as  a  nation.  Raising  the  pro-
file of science and technology is a consistent goal of this committee
as well.

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses  today  about  both
their  successes  and  challenges.  I  certainly  appreciate  your  attend-
ance at this hearing, and I am sure we will learn a great deal from
you  in  the  experiences  you  have  had;  and  I  can  add  those  to  the
experiences that I have had working directly in my laboratory with
foreign scientists whom I still keep in touch with.

Thank you for being here.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Ehlers follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE VERNON J. EHLERS

Today’s  hearing  is  an  opportunity  to  learn  about  efforts  by  non-governmental  or-
ganizations  and  universities  in  science  diplomacy  around  the  world.  The  federal
agencies have a responsibility in this area, as we learned in a previous hearing, but
many of the organizations before us today are uniquely positioned to leverage their
own  strengths  at  building  relationships  in  science  and  technology  cooperation  that
transcend literal and figurative borders. Even in times of governmental conflict, re-
lationships built on trust and mutual respect will outlast current frictions.

This  committee  knows  that  the  U.S.  will  not  remain  globally  competitive  in
science and technology unless we are able to work with international partners. Uti-
lizing all avenues to strengthen these relationships—public and private, official and
non-official  will  be  critical  to  our  success  as  a  nation.  Raising  the  profile  of  science
and technology is a consistent goal of this committee as well.

I look forward to hearing from our witnesses today about both their successes and

challenges. Thank you for your attendance.

Chairman BAIRD. Thank you, Dr. Ehlers.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Carnahan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RUSS CARNAHAN

Mr. Chairman, thank you for hosting another important hearing on international

science and technology.

As  a  Member  of  both  the  Subcommittee  on  Research  and  Science  Education  and
the  House  Committee  on  Foreign  Affairs,  I  am  particularly  interested  in  the  issues
before  us  today.  I  was  pleased  to  attend  our  April  hearing  on  the  Federal  Govern-
ment’s  role  in  science  diplomacy;  I  look  forward  to  learning  more  about  the  role  of
non-governmental  organizations  and  universities  as  coordinating  entities  of  inter-
national science and technology.

It  is  clear  that  we  can  build  more  positive  relationships  with  other  countries
through  science.  We  also  understand  that  the  U.S.  can  better  affect  U.S.  national

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

security  and  economic  interests  by  helping  to  build  technological  capacity  in  other
countries. I am especially interested in how NGOs and universities can help support
the Federal Government’s efforts to improve relations abroad through science diplo-
macy and hope that our witnesses today will spend some time on that topic.

I would like to thank today’s witnesses, Dr. Leshner, Dr. Clegg, Dr. Wulf, and Dr.
Calvin, for coming before the Committee. I look forward to hearing their testimony.
Chairman BAIRD. At this time, I would like to introduce our dis-
tinguished  witnesses.  First,  Dr.  Alan  Leshner  is  the  Chief  Execu-
tive  Officer  of  the  American  Association  for  the  Advancement  of
Science  and  executive  publisher  of  the  journal,  Science.  Dr.
Leshner, I would like to say I received your letter. I will be renew-
ing my membership just next week. I truly did. It was in my mail-
box  last  night  that  my  membership  to  Science  is  about  to  expire,
so it is on the way, the check is in the mail.

Dr. Michael Clegg is the Foreign Secretary of the National Acad-
emy of Sciences. Dr. Clegg is also the Donald Bren Professor of Bio-
logical Sciences and of ecology and evolutionary biology at the Uni-
versity  of  California  at  Irvine.  Dr.  Bill  Wulf  is  a  Member  of  the
Board  of  Directors  of  the  U.S.  Civilian  Research  and  Development
Foundation.  Dr.  Wulf  is  also  AT&T  professor  of  computer  science
at  the  University  of  Virginia  and  the  immediate  past  president  of
the  National  Academy  of  Engineering.  Dr.  James  Calvin  is  the  In-
terim  Vice  President  for  Research  at  Texas  A&M  University.  Dr.
Calvin is also professor of statistics at Texas A&M.

As  the  witnesses  all  probably  know  from  experience,  our  spoken
testimony  is  limited  to  five  minutes,  but  after  that,  we  will  have
a  nice  positive  exchange  of  ideas  and  questions,  and  we  will  start
then with Dr. Leshner. Dr. Leshner, thank you for being here.
STATEMENT  OF  DR.  ALAN  I.  LESHNER,  CHIEF  EXECUTIVE  OF-
FICER,  AMERICAN  ASSOCIATION  FOR  THE  ADVANCEMENT
OF SCIENCE; EXECUTIVE PUBLISHER, SCIENCE
Dr. LESHNER. Thank you very much, Dr. Baird, Dr. Ehlers. First
of all, thank you both for your membership. We enjoy your partici-
pation  in  our  organization.  I  also  wanted  to  take  this  opportunity
to  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  and  for  giving  us  an  oppor-
tunity  to  speak  about  the  critical  role  that  U.S.  non-governmental
organizations  can  play  in  international  science  and  technology  co-
operation.

Just  to  be  clear,  the  American  Association  for  the  Advancement
of Science is the world’s largest multi-disciplinary scientific society,
and  in  spite  of  our  name,  we  are  in  fact  international  in  member-
ship  and  character.  About  20  percent  of  our  members  come  from
outside the United States.

Our  international  activities  typically  support  two  key  objectives.
One  is  helping  to  build  and  knit  together  the  global  science  enter-
prise and secondly promoting what is called science diplomacy. We
at  AAAS  believe  it  is  incumbent  to  our  mission  to  build  inter-
national  partnerships  that  assist  other  nations  as  they  are  becom-
ing  integrated  into  the  global  science  enterprise.  We  also  help  de-
veloping  nations  establish  the  requisite  scientific  infrastructure  so
that they may better reap the benefits of science for their societies.
Science  diplomacy  has  as  its  goal  to  utilize  international  sci-
entific  collaboration  to  foster  communication  and  cooperation
among the peoples of diverse nations and to promote greater global

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

peace,  prosperity,  and  stability.  I  would  like  to  draw  a  somewhat
subtle but I think important distinction between science diplomacy
as  conducted  by  governments  and  science  diplomacy  as  often  car-
ried out by non-governmental organizations.

Governments often use science and technology as a diplomatic or
foreign  policy  tool  either  to  help  foster  another  country’s  develop-
ment or to increase understanding of U.S. values and ways of doing
business.  As  used  by  non-governmental  organizations,  however,
science diplomacy typically has been used to maintain communica-
tion  and  cooperation  links  among  the  citizens  of  countries  when
their  governmental  relationships  might  otherwise  be  strained  or
limited. Because we believe science diplomacy to be particularly im-
portant  at  this  point  in  world  history,  I  am  very  pleased  to  an-
nounce  today  that  we  at  AAAS  are  creating  a  new  AAAS  Center
for  Science  Diplomacy.  The  Center’s  over-arching  goal  is  to  use
science  and  scientific  cooperation  to  promote  international  under-
standing  and  prosperity.  It  will  provide  a  forum  for  scientists,  pol-
icy  analysis,  and  policy-makers  to  share  information  and  explore
collaborative opportunities.

I  also  would  like  to  take  this  occasion  to  offer  some  suggestions
about  steps  the  government  might  take  to  better  position  the
United States in undertaking international science activities.

First,  we  need  to  raise  the  profile  of  these  issues,  and  I  am  par-
ticularly pleased you are having this hearing. We need to raise the
profile  of  these  issues  to  the  government,  to  the  public,  and  to  the
scientific community itself. I do hope that other Congressional com-
mittees, particularly those dealing with foreign relations, will work
jointly  with  you  to  continue  the  discussion  through,  for  example,
additional  focused  hearings.  As  just  one  example  of  a  topic  of  a
hearing might be to look at the mechanisms the State Department
could  use  to  evaluate  more  effectively  the  science  and  technology
cooperation  agreements  that  the  United  States  has  with  other
countries,  particularly  in  terms  of  their  follow-on  activities  and
their long-term impacts over time.

We  also  believe  that  there  are  steps  that  might  improve  the  ef-
fectiveness  of  the  international  programs  of  U.S.  governmental  re-
search agencies. One concern I have long had is that some agencies
are limited by statute in what they can do because they are not al-
lowed to pay the cost for foreign participants. We believe this limi-
tation can impede the ability of the programs to achieve their over-
arching goals.

In  the  realm  of  science  diplomacy,  I  would  encourage  Congress
and  the  State  Department  to  consider  developing  funding  mecha-
nisms  that  could  be  used  to  catalyze  the  types  of  international
science cooperation that are consistent with and reinforce U.S. for-
eign policy objectives.

And finally, I believe that any efforts to raise the profile on effec-
tiveness of international science requires strong White House lead-
ership, particularly through a presidential science advisor with suf-
ficient  rank  to  work  across  the  entire  government.  The  Office  of
Science and Technology Policy must also have an associate director
who  has  a  clear  international  mandate  if  this  is  going  to  work.  As
science  and  technology  are  ever  more  embedded  in  every  aspect  of
modern  life  and  in  every  major  global  policy  issue,  it  is  essential

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

that  we  determine  ways  and  places  where  science  and  technology
cooperation  might  be  better  incorporated  into  international  rela-
tions, not only government to government but critically civil society
to civil society. Thank you very much.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Leshner follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF ALAN I. LESHNER

Dr.  Baird  (Chairman),  Dr.  Ehlers  (Ranking  Member),  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee, thank you for the opportunity to testify on the critical role that U.S. non-
governmental  organizations  play  in  cultivating,  promoting,  and  coordinating  inter-
national science and technology cooperation.

The  American  Association  for  the  Advancement  of  Science  (AAAS)  is  the  world’s
largest multi-disciplinary scientific society and publisher of the journal, Science. Al-
though  we  were  founded  in  the  United  States  and  our  name  begins  with  the  word
‘‘American,’’  that  term  belies  the  inherent  role  that  we  play  in  the  international
arena.  Approximately  20  percent  of  our  members  are  from  outside  the  United
States.  Moreover,  35  to  40  percent  of  the  research  articles  we  publish  in  Science
have authors located outside of the United States.

As  the  largest  general  scientific  society  in  the  world,  our  membership  allows  us
both  to  draw  upon  scientists  from  around  the  world  and  to  access  scientists  from
a  very  wide  range  of  fields,  including  the  natural,  physical  and  social  sciences,  as
well as engineering and medical science. This depth and breadth of membership pro-
vides a massive resource base for action.

AAAS  also  has  an  array  of  well  established  and  recognized  program  activities  in
science  education,  science  policy,  science  communication,  and  science  and  national
security.  This  diversity  allows  us  to  engage  stakeholders  from  all  regions  and  sec-
tors  required  to  promote  and  sustain  a  robust  dialogue  with  the  global  scientific
community.

Over  the  years,  AAAS  has  worked  hard  to  broaden  its  efforts  to  advance  science
internationally  through  a  range  of  meetings  and  education  exchange  activities.
AAAS’s  portfolio  of  programs,  publications  and  members  are  critical  to  our  efforts
to  build  coalitions  among  other  science  organizations,  non-governmental  organiza-
tions (NGOs) and international governments for addressing a wide range of science-
society  issues  and  for  providing  a  framework  for  our  broader  international  efforts.
As a AAAS Board of Directors’ resolution states, ‘‘science is often a means to bridge
the  political  chasm  that  divides  nations.’’  It  is  a  sentiment  that  is  embodied  in  all
of  AAAS’s  international  interests  and  is  echoed  in  our  Mission  ‘‘to  advance  science
and serve society throughout the world.’’

AAAS International Goals and Missions

While  AAAS’s  international  activities  typically  involve  convening  special  work-
shops  or  fostering  educational  exchanges,  our  projects  can  best  be  characterized  as
supporting two key and mutually reinforcing objectives:

• Helping to build and knit together the global science enterprise
• Promoting what is called science diplomacy

Building a Global Science Enterprise

Science  is  by  definition  global  in  scope  and  application—it  knows  no  borders,  is
not  constrained  by  geography,  and  no  one  country  has  a  monopoly  on  it.  Advance-
ments  in  astronomy,  mathematics,  biology  and  medicine  can  find  their  roots  in  a
rich  history  of  scientific  inquiry,  discovery,  and  the  sharing  of  knowledge  whether
from Meso-America, the Middle-East, or Europe.

That  said,  the  United  States  has  invested  in  a  rich  portfolio  of  basic  and  applied
research  across  a  diverse  spectrum  of  disciplines,  established  a  higher  education
system that is envied around the world, and developed a robust scientific infrastruc-
ture.  Because  of  these  investments,  our  national  science  and  technology  activities
are at the very forefront of the world’s scientific enterprise. These investments have
also  greatly  benefited  human  health  and  well-being,  increased  standards  of  living
and economic growth, and helped build an informed democratic society.

Because of our international character, we at AAAS believe it is both our mission
and a great opportunity to build international partnerships that assist other nations
as  they  begin  to  become  integrated  into  the  global  science  enterprise.  In  support  of
our  objective  ‘‘to  serve  society,’’  we  help  developing  nations  establish  the  requisite
scientific  infrastructure  in  order  that  they  too  may  better  reap  the  benefits  of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

science as a basis for both their own scientific advancement and their economic and
social development.

Two recent examples of such international efforts include:

Women Leaders in Science and Engineering Conference. AAAS worked in col-
laboration with the U.S. Department of State and the Government of Kuwait to or-
ganize the Women’s Leaders in Science and Engineering Conference in Kuwait City
in 2007. AAAS was able to assemble a delegation of U.S. women scientists and engi-
neers  along  with  nearly  200  female  scientists  representing  the  22  Arab  countries.
The  conference  allowed  international  scientific  peers  to  share  experiences  and  les-
sons  learned  in  mentoring,  scientific  publishing  and  academic  leadership.  Beyond
building  practical  skills,  the  conference  also  provided  a  critical  opportunity  for  net-
working  and  building  relationships  for  potential  collaborations  in  the  future;  not
only between the U.S. and Arab nations, but among the Arab nations present.
Research  Integrity  Workshop  in  China.  Last  September,  AAAS  conducted  a
workshop  in  collaboration  with  senior  members  of  the  Chinese  scientific  research
and  policy  community  on  the  subject  of  research  integrity  and  misconduct.  The  as-
sembled  U.S.  delegation  included  journal  editors,  former  university  presidents,  and
government  officials.  Chinese  delegates  include  presidents  of  their  universities  and
leaders of government agencies with responsibilities for science and technology. Be-
cause integrity and trust are so critical to scientific research and collaboration, this
type of dialogue provided a valuable framework for future partnerships and the fur-
ther  development  of  China’s  own  standards  for  the  ethical  conduct  of  scientific  re-
search.

Science Diplomacy

AAAS’s  second  major  objective  is  to  act  as  a  catalyst  for  what  is  called  ‘‘science
diplomacy.’’  The  over-arching  goal  of  science  diplomacy  is  to  use  international  sci-
entific cooperation to foster communication and cooperation among the peoples of di-
verse  nations  and  to  promote  greater  global  peace,  prosperity  and  stability.  Science
diplomacy  is  receiving  more  and  more  attention  in  both  the  scientific  and  inter-
national relations community.

It  might  be  useful  here  to  draw  a  somewhat  subtle  distinction  between  science
diplomacy  as  conducted  by  governments  and  science  diplomacy  as  carried  out  by
non-governmental organizations. As emphasized in a recent Congressional Research
Service Report to the Congress,1 science and technology can be used very effectively
by  government  agencies  as  a  diplomatic  or  foreign  policy  tool  either  to  help  foster
another country’s development or to increase understanding of U.S. values and ways
of  doing  business.  As  used  by  non-governmental  organizations,  science  diplomacy
has typically been used to maintain communication and cooperation links among the
citizens  of  countries  when  their  governmental  relationships  might  otherwise  be
strained or limited.2 In addition, non-governmental science diplomacy can help build
relationships  among  civil  society  entities  to  foster  closer  people  to  people  relation-
ships  whether  governmental  relationships  are  good  or  strained.  From  my  point  of
view,  governments  should  be  interested  and  supportive  of  all  of  these  forms  of
science diplomacy.

Perhaps  the  most  well  known  example  of  the  success  of  science  diplomacy  is  the
scientific  exchanges  that  took  place  between  the  U.S.  and  the  former  Soviet  Union
throughout the Cold War years. These engagements not only helped advance funda-
mental  scientific  research,  but  they  also  were  critical  for  reinforcing  trust  between
two  nations  with  tense  official  relationships.  In  fact  in  many  instances,  it  provided
the only relationship between the two.

AAAS  believes  this  use  of  scientific  collaboration  and  communication  is  essential
both to the advancement of science and its use for the benefit of our global society.
For these reasons I am very pleased to announce today the creation of a new AAAS
Center for Science Diplomacy.

The Center is to be guided by the overarching goal of using science and scientific
cooperation  to  promote  international  understanding  and  prosperity.  It  approaches
this  goal  by  providing  a  forum  for  scientists,  policy  analysts  and  policy-makers
through  which  they  can  share  information  and  explore  collaborative  opportunities.
We  are  particularly  interested  in  identifying  opportunities  for  science  diplomacy  to
serve  as  a  catalyst  between  societies  where  official  relations  might  be  limited,  and
to strengthen existing partnerships in science and technology.

1 Stine, D.D., ‘‘Science, Technology, and American diplomacy: Background and Issues for Con-

gress,’’ Congressional Research Service, May 22, 2008.

2 Lord K.M. and Turekian V.C., ‘‘Time for a New Era of Science Diplomacy,’’ Science, February

9, 2007: Vol. 315 no. 5813, pp. 769–770.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

The Center’s initial activities will focus on:

forts and deriving lessons learned from those that have succeeded;

• Analyzing  current  and  past  domestic  and  international  science  diplomacy  ef-
• Characterizing  the  major  barriers  to  successful  science  diplomacy,  such  as
educational  and  human  resource  issues,  funding  problems,  or  other  policy
issues; and
• Leveraging  existing  and  building  new  partnerships  with  appropriate  stake-
holders in both the scientific and the international affairs communities to de-
velop new initiatives and projects and expand ongoing successful ones.

Constraints on AAAS Programs

AAAS faces the same dilemmas that the U.S. Government faces: how best to bal-
ance  domestic  versus  international  interests,  and  how  best  to  balance  short-term
versus long-term goals. International cooperation takes time to develop and nurture,
particularly if it requires infrastructure development in one of the cooperating coun-
tries.  The  impacts  of  science  diplomacy  also  can  take  a  long  time  to  be  realized,
since the scientific work must be done and trust must be nurtured over time.

Both  collaboration  and  diplomacy  require  clear  time  commitments,  and  we  are
limited by the ability of our scientific members to take time from their own research
careers to share their expertise and build the necessary relationships. We are fortu-
nate  at  AAAS,  because  we  can  draw  upon  a  very  large  membership  of  notable  sci-
entists that have both an eager interest in and the necessary experience of working
internationally.  But  that  is  not  always  enough.  Many  large  scientific  organizations,
not only those represented here today—CRDF, AAAS, and the Academy—assist sci-
entists  in  some  capacity  to  participate  in  the  range  of  international  activities  that
our organizations sponsor. By collaborating and supporting one another, our organi-
zations  are  able  to  maximize  the  quality  of  international  endeavors,  while  mini-
mizing the resources required.

Some Potential Government Activities

I  will  conclude  by  identifying  some  possible  steps  the  government  might  consider
in  order  to  better  position  the  United  States  in  undertaking  international  science
activities.

First,  we  need  more  efforts  like  this  hearing  to  raise  the  profile  of  these  issues,
to  the  government,  to  the  public  and  to  the  scientific  community.  I  hope  that  other
committees,  particularly  those  dealing  with  foreign  relations,  will  work  jointly  with
the Research and Science Education Subcommittee to continue the discussion of the
importance  of  international  scientific  cooperation  and  science  diplomacy  as  tools  in
facilitating  international  peace,  prosperity  and  security,  and  build  upon  the  efforts
that you have already launched.

An  example  of  a  topic  that  could  be  explored  in  a  joint  hearing  might  be  mecha-
nisms  to  assist  the  State  Department  in  the  development  of  better  strategies  for
evaluating  science  and  technology  cooperation  agreements.  Too  often  the  signing  of
these agreements seems to be an end to the process rather than the start of a long-
term, strategic relationship.

Moreover, an analysis could be undertaken jointly by the scientific community and
the international relations community to provide guidance for more strategic use of
these  agreements.  This  guidance  could  serve  not  only  to  help  foster  international
scientific collaborations and overall relationship building, but also for addressing the
many societal challenges we face, such as sustainability, climate change, health, etc.
I  also  believe  there  are  steps  that  might  improve  the  effectiveness  of  the  inter-
national  programs  of  U.S.  governmental  research  agencies.  One  concern  is  that
some agencies may be limited by statute in their ability to use federal funds to sup-
port international activities because they are not allowed to pay the costs for foreign
participants.  Many  agencies,  of  course,  do  participate  in  joint  international  projects
(e.g., the Space Station), but many still are unable to use their budgets to help pay
any  of  the  costs  for  foreign  participation.  Although  we  do  agree  with  the  view  that
U.S. taxpayer funds should be used primarily to support American science, there are
instances, such as in international science development activities, where this limita-
tion  impedes  the  ability  of  the  programs  to  achieve  their  goals.  Specifically,  many
countries  simply  cannot  afford  to  support  their  side  of  the  collaboration,  and  there-
fore the collaboration is doomed before it has begun. It is worth noting that the Eu-
ropean Commission 7th Framework Program includes a new policy that allows non-
European institutions to apply for research funding.

In the realm of science diplomacy, I would encourage Congress and the State De-
partment  to  organize  a  workshop  or  roundtable  of  relevant  stakeholders  from  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

scientific  and  international  affairs  communities  to  look  at  ongoing  efforts  and  ana-
lyze  the  possibility  of  establishing  new  funding  mechanisms  to  catalyze  the  types
of  international  science  cooperation  that  are  consistent  with  and  reinforce  the  for-
eign policy objectives of the United States.

Finally,  I  believe  that  any  efforts  to  raise  the  profile  and  effectiveness  of  inter-
national  science  require  strong  White  House  leadership,  mostly  likely  through  a
Presidential  Science  Advisor  with  sufficient  rank  to  work  across  the  government,
most  likely  the  rank  of  Assistant  to  the  President.  Furthermore,  the  Office  of
Science and Technology Policy must also have an associate director who has a clear
international  mandate  and  the  ability  to  work  with  the  State  Department  and  the
National Security Council on issues of international science cooperation.

As  science  and  technology  are  ever-more  imbedded  in  every  aspect  of  modern  life
and  in  every  major  global  policy  issue,  it  is  essential  that  all  relevant  parties—the
Executive  Branch,  Congress,  scientific  organizations  and  their  members,  inter-
national think tanks, foundation leaders, and others, work together in a deliberative
manner  to  determine  ways  and  places  where  science  and  technology  cooperation
might  be  better  incorporated  into  international  relations,  not  only  government  to
government, but critically, civil society to civil society.

APPENDIX A

American Association for the Advancement of Science

(AAAS)

The  American  Association  for  the  Advancement  of  Science  (AAAS)  is  the  world’s
largest  general  scientific  society,  and  publisher  of 
journal,  Science
(www.sciencemag.org).  AAAS  was  founded  in  1848,  and  includes  262  affiliated  soci-
eties and academies of science, serving 10 million individuals. Science has the larg-
est  paid  circulation  of  any  peer-reviewed  general  science  journal  in  the  world,  with
an  estimated  total  readership  of  one  million.  The  non-profit  AAAS  (www.aaas.org)
is open to all and fulfills its mission to ‘‘advance science and serve society’’ through
initiatives in science education, science policy; international programs; and an array
of  activities  designed  both  to  increase  public  understanding  and  engage  the  public
more with science.

the 

APPENDIX B

BIOGRAPHY FOR ALAN I. LESHNER

Alan I. Leshner is Chief Executive Officer of the American Association for the Ad-
vancement  of  Science  (AAAS)  and  Executive  Publisher  of  its  journal,  Science.  From
1994  to  2001,  Dr.  Leshner  was  Director  of  the  U.S.  National  Institute  on  Drug
Abuse  at  the  National  Institutes  of  Health  (NIH),  and  from  1988  to  1994  he  was
Deputy  Director  and  Acting  Director  of  the  National  Institute  of  Mental  Health.
Prior  to  that,  he  spent  nine  years  at  the  National  Science  Foundation,  where  he
held a variety of senior positions, focusing on basic research in the biological, behav-
ioral  and  social  sciences,  on  science  policy  and  on  science  education.  Dr.  Leshner
began his career at Bucknell University, where he was Professor of Psychology. His
research has focused on the biological bases of behavior, particularly the role of hor-
mones in the control of behavior. Dr. Leshner is an elected member of the Institute
of Medicine of the National Academy of Sciences, and an elected fellow of the AAAS,
the  American  Academy  of  Arts  and  Sciences,  and  the  National  Academy  of  Public
Administration.  He  has  received  numerous  awards  form  both  professional  and  lay
groups for his national leadership in science, mental illness and mental health, sub-
stance  abuse  and  addiction,  and  public  engagement  with  science.  He  received  an
A.B.  degree  in  Psychology  from  Franklin  and  Marshall  College  and  M.S.  and  Ph.D.
degrees  in  Physiological  Psychology  from  Rutgers  University.  He  also  has  been
awarded six Honorary Doctor of Science degrees.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Thank  you,  Dr.  Leshner.  We  have  been  joined
by  Mr.  Bilbray  from  California.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Bilbray,  for  being
here.

Dr. Clegg.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  MICHAEL  T.  CLEGG,  FOREIGN  SEC-
RETARY, NATIONAL ACADEMY OF SCIENCES, THE NATIONAL
ACADEMIES
Dr.  CLEGG.  Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and  dis-
tinguished Members of the Subcommittee, thank you for this oppor-
tunity  to  discuss  international  science,  technology,  and  health  co-
operation.  I  use  the  abbreviation  STH  to  refer  to  science,  tech-
nology, and health.

I  am  Michael  Clegg,  Foreign  Secretary  of  the  National  Academy
of Sciences. The National Academy of Sciences is a merit-based or-
ganization  that  elects  outstanding  scientists  for  membership  and
includes the Nation’s scientific leadership. The U.S. Congress char-
tered  the  Academy  in  1863  with  the  explicit  mission  of  providing
STH advice to the U.S. Government when asked.

Now, I would like to address your questions directly. Why did the

Academies promote international science cooperation?

Science  is  a  global  activity,  was  a  global  activity  long  before  the
invention  of  the  term  globalization  because  the  advancement  of
sciences  and  the  issues  and  challenges  of  STH  programs  are  pre-
dominantly  global  in  nature.  Science  is  increasingly  trans-border
and global in its conception, exploration, and application. It is thus
in the vital interest of the U.S. science community and more broad-
ly U.S. society, to maintain close linkages with science communities
throughout the world.

Mr.  Chairman,  we  believe  that  our  organization,  together  with
its  sister  academies,  the  National  Academy  of  Engineering  in  the
Institute of Medicine, and Allied Science NGOs like the AAAS and
the  major  disciplinary  science  societies  bring  unique  strengths  to
international science cooperation.

Let  me  illustrate  this  point  with  three  case  studies.  Beginning
early  in  the  1980s,  the  U.S.  National  Academy  of  Sciences  estab-
lished  a  standing  committee  on  international  security  and  arms
control  that  worked  with  scientists  in  the  Soviet  Union  and  later
in Russia on issues of nuclear stability, arms control, and non-pro-
liferation. The initial work was aimed at building mutual trust and
respect, but ultimately this effort matured into a dialogue that was
central to later arms reduction agreements. Current work with the
Russian  Academy  focuses  on  topics  such  as  the  international  nu-
clear  fuel  cycle,  international  nuclear  security  environments,  and
beyond  cooperation  with  Russia  we  convened  dialogues  with  India
on  Indo-U.S.  cooperation  in  international  security  issues  and  we
convened  a  series  of  U.S.-China  engagements  on  security-related
questions.

Let  me  now  turn  to  a  second  example,  that  is,  creating  bridges
of  cooperation  in  areas  of  conflict.  We  have  an  ongoing  program  of
cooperation with the Academies of the Middle East whose effort in-
cluded  a  project  on  water  futures  in  the  Jordan  Valley  conducted
jointly  with  the  Israeli  and  Palestinian  Academies  and  with  the
Higher  Council  of  Jordan  that  resulted  in  a  joint  report  entitled
Water for the Future.

This  work  has  now  matured  into  a  series  of  joint  activities  that
include projects on micro-nutrient deficiencies, water resources, re-
newable  energy,  pollution,  and  land  degradation  and  science  edu-
cation.  An  organization  has  been  created  to  implement  these  pro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

grams  provisionally  named  the  Association  of  Middle  Eastern  and
U.S. National Academies of Sciences.

Why are the U.S. Academies seen as effective conveners of activi-
ties  in  the  Middle  East?  The  principal  answer  is  that  the  U.S.  sci-
entific community is held in high esteem by all the societies of this
conflicted region of the world. This respect for U.S. science institu-
tions  is  based  on  widespread  admiration  for  American  accomplish-
ments  in  STH  fields,  and  it  opens  doors  that  might  otherwise  be
closed.

The  third  example  comes  from  Africa  where  five  years  ago  we
initiated a program of institutional development funded by the Bill
and  Melinda  Gates  Foundation  to  build  a  capacity  of  African
Science Academies to provide independent evidence-based advice to
governments and countries with an emphasis on health needs. The
principal objectives of the initiative are to help academies establish
sound  advisory  processes  and  to  foster  and  sustain  a  relationship
between the academy and its government.

What are the unique strengths of Academies? First, the high es-
teem  accorded  U.S.  science  by  the  rest  of  the  world.  International
polling reveals that attitudes toward U.S. science are more positive
than towards any other aspect of U.S. society. This attitude is espe-
cially pronounced in Islamic countries.

Second,  the  Academies  represent  the  leadership  of  U.S.  science
and  as  such  represent  the  human  face  of  U.S.  scientific  achieve-
ment.  This  enables  engagement  in  cooperative  work  aimed  at
shared goals in all regions of the world.

Another  strength  is  that  the  Academies  and  other  non-govern-
mental  organizations  such  as  the  AAAS  can  mobilize  the  U.S.  sci-
entific  community  on  urgent  issues.  And  third  and  perhaps  most
importantly  is  the  ethic  of  science.  The  Academies  represent  a  sci-
entific  approach  to  problem  solving,  achieving  national  economic
goals, and peaceful competition. A major aspect of our international
program  is  to  strengthen  education  and  training  and  to  empower
science  communities  to  be  more  effective  in  engaging  national  pol-
icy-makers  and  the  public,  thereby  transmitting  this  problem-solv-
ing ethic to other societies, especially in the developing world.

How  might  the  Federal  Government  take  better  advantage  of
science  and  the  U.S.  scientific  community?  The  U.S.  Federal  Gov-
ernment has great influence in the world owing to the scale of the
U.S.  economy  and  owing  to  the  widely  admired  egalitarian  ideals
and  aspirations  of  U.S.  society.  This  provides  substantial  leverage
to achieve constructive solutions to global problems. Unfortunately,
the U.S. has not always made full use of these assets.

The U.S. has allowed its investments in international STH to de-
cline.  Take  investments  through  USAID  as  an  example.  An  Acad-
emies  report  published  in  2006  and  undertaken  at  the  request  of
the  USAID  administrator  found  that  STH  competencies  in  USAID
have  declined  substantially.  The  report  makes  a  series  of  rec-
ommendations  on  how  to  rebalance  the  USAID  competencies  in
STH to increase the effectiveness of USAID programs. A very posi-
tive  step  has  been  the  creation  of  the  Office  of  Science  and  Tech-
nology  Advisor  for  the  Secretary  of  State  and  the  naming  of  that
same individual as advisor to the administrator of USAID.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

In  its  May  2007  strategic  plan,  the  Department  of  State  and
USAID  established  an  important  set  of  realistic  STH  diplomatic
strategies. However, these must be seen against inadequate on the
part of the Department of State or inadequate and declining on the
part of USAID STH capabilities.

Many  of  the  leaders  of  science  in  other  parts  of  the  world  have
had  significant  experience  in  U.S.  research  intuitions  as  students
or  as  research  visitors,  echoing  a  point  made  by  Chairman  Baird.
Those with direct knowledge of our country and its culture are fre-
quently  willing  partners  for  further  engagement  owing  to  positive
feelings  about  their  experiences  with  U.S.  science  institutions  spe-
cifically and U.S. society generally. Regrettably, the cadre of inter-
national  scientists  with  direct  knowledge  of  the  U.S.  is  declining.
The reasons are many, but two are visa policies that inhibit appli-
cations  to  U.S.  institutions  and  dramatic  erosion  of  broad-based
U.S. Government programs for international fellowships.

The  Academies’  report  cited  above  found  that  there  has  been  a
more  than  10-fold  decline  in  the  number  of  USAID  financed  grad-
uate  students  from  developing  countries  at  U.S.  universities.  The
report makes the strong recommendation that USAID revitalize its
investments  in  human  resources  based  on  historical  experience.  It
is clear that a modest investment in fellowships will bring large re-
turns to future generations.

Now,  I  see  I  am  running  out  of  time,  so  let  me  just  summarize
the  last  couple  of  points.  Why  is  it  that  many  federal  agencies,
USAID,  EPA,  have  science  programs  with  international  dimen-
sions,  but  they  could  benefit  from  more  explicit  instructions  and
advice from the Congress on how to implement those international
responsibilities.

Let  me  just  then  conclude  by  saying  that  major  opportunities  to
capitalize on U.S. strengths are ignored. To ensure a better future,
we must make effective use of all of our nation’s assets. Modest in-
vestments in international science diplomacy can leverage the enor-
mous asset represented by the U.S. STH communities.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Clegg follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MICHAEL T. CLEGG

Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and  distinguished  Members  of  the
Subcommittee, thank you for this opportunity to discuss international science, tech-
nology  and  health  (STH)  cooperation.  I  am  Michael  Clegg,  Foreign  Secretary  of  the
National Academy of Sciences. The National Academy of Sciences, together with the
Academy  of  Engineering  and  the  Institute  of  Medicine,  (collectively  referred  to  as
‘‘The  Academies’’)  are  non-governmental  organizations  whose  members  are  elected
on the basis of STH leadership.

The  U.S.  Congress  chartered  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  in  1863  with  the
explicit mission of providing STH advice to the U.S. Government when asked. Over
the years, as the demand for advice expanded and as the U.S. STH community grew
in size and complexity, the National Research Council (NRC) was established to ad-
minister the advice function. Later the National Academy of Engineering (NAE) and
the Institute of Medicine (IOM) were organized under the original charter of the Na-
tional Academy of Sciences. Today’s organization provides advice to government and
the  public  on  a  wide  variety  of  issues  ranging  from  climate  change  to  bacterial
threats, from energy futures to emerging diseases, from food security to building ef-
fective  science  education  programs,  from  challenges  of  mega  cities  to  the  control  of
weapons of mass destruction.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

Why  do  the  National  Academies  promote  international  science  coopera-

tion?

The Academies are engaged with counterpart STH communities around the world
and  have  a  long  history  of  working  with  international  partners  in  addressing  the
STH  based  challenges  facing  the  world.  From  its  inception  in  1863,  the  U.S.  Na-
tional  Academy  of  Sciences  has  elected  outstanding  scientists  from  outside  the
United  States  as  Foreign  Associates,  thus  recognizing  the  important  contributions
of foreign scientists to progress in all fields. In today’s world, science is increasingly
trans-border  and  global  in  its  conception,  exploration,  and  application.  It  is  thus  in
the  vital  interest  of  the  U.S.  science  community,  and  more  broadly  of  U.S.  society,
to maintain close linkages with science communities throughout the world. Because
our  organization  includes  the  leadership  of  science  from  around  the  globe,  we  are
uniquely positioned to promote international science cooperation and to facilitate the
provision  of  scientific  evidence  to  policy-makers  on  a  global  basis.  We  are  also
uniquely  positioned  to  use  science  as  a  means  of  building  bridges  between  societies
in conflict and as a means of facilitating international STH collaborations.

Science was a global activity long before the invention of the term ‘‘globalization’’
because the issues and challenges of STH programs are predominantly global in na-
ture.  The  Academies  often  include  foreign  participants  in  our  work,  because  access
to foreign expertise is increasingly relevant for all U.S.-based institutions. The inclu-
sion  of  global  dimensions  improves  the  quality,  depth,  and  accuracy  of  our  studies
and reports.

What are the specific goals of the Academies’ international programs?

Based  on  our  experience  and  capacity  as  an  advisor  to  our  own  government  and
society,  three  broad  themes  of  the  Academies’  international  programs,  have
emerged:  They  are:  (1)  improving  global  sustainability  and  health.  (2)  Enhancing
national  and  international  security  through  increasing  pathways  of  communication.
And, (3) enhancing human and institutional capital as a route to economic develop-
ment  and  equity.  I  will  briefly  describe  several  selected  activities  to  illustrate  the
Academies’ international programs relevant to these themes.
Improving global sustainability and health: The Academies have had a long engage-
ment  with  international  partners  on  issues  of  sustainability  and  health.  One  of  the
major  global  sustainability  issues  that  demand  international  S&T  cooperation  is
that  of  water  resources.  Many  parts  of  the  world,  including  parts  of  the  United
States, face uncertain water futures and it is imperative to develop S&T based solu-
tions for water management issues. In this context, the NRC produced a comprehen-
sive  report,  together  with  the  Mexican  Academy  of  Sciences,  on  the  issues  con-
fronting  the  Mexico  City  water  supply  (Mexico  City’s  Water  Supply:  Improving  the
Outlook for Sustainability). We have conducted joint workshops on ground water re-
sources  in  the  Yucatan,  in  the  Middle  East  and  in  North  Africa  and  we  have  pro-
duced a multilingual information resource on water and health.

A second issue that is particularly crucial at present is that of energy sources and
management.  The  Academies  partnered  with  the  Chinese  Academy  of  Sciences  to
produce a forward-looking report on energy futures in 2000 (Cooperation in the En-
ergy  Futures  of  China  and  the  United  States)  and  we  have  a  continuing  series  of
cooperative efforts with the Chinese Academy focused on energy related issues.

Often the Academies work with partners in regions of conflict thereby addressing
an  important  scientific  issue  while  also  helping  to  create  bridges  of  cooperation.
Thus,  for  example,  we  have  an  ongoing  program  of  cooperation  with  the  academies
of the Middle East. This effort began with cooperation on regional health challenges.
It  also  included  a  project  on  water  futures  in  the  Jordan  Valley,  conducted  jointly
with  the  Israeli  and  Palestinian  academies  and  the  Higher  Council  of  Jordan  that
resulted  in  the  joint  report  entitled  Water  for  the  Future:  The  West  Bank  and  Gaza
Strip, Israel, and Jordan. This work has now matured into a series of joint activities
that  include  projects  on  micro-nutrient  deficiencies,  water  resources,  renewable  en-
ergy,  pollution  and  land  degradation  and  science  education.  An  organization  has
been  created  to  implement  these  programs  provisionally  named  the  ‘‘Association  of
Middle Eastern and U.S. National Academies of Sciences.’’ Our Academies also host
a meeting for young and mid-career scientists from Jordan, Israel, Palestine and the
United  States  aimed  at  sharing  research  knowledge  and  framing  joint  solutions  to
common problems.

Why are the U.S. Academies seen as effective conveners of activities in the Middle
East? The principle answer is that the U.S. scientific community is held in high es-
teem  by  all  the  societies  of  this  conflicted  region  of  the  world.  This  respect  for  U.S.
science  institutions  is  based  on  a  widespread  admiration  for  American  accomplish-
ments in STH fields and it opens doors that might otherwise be closed.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

Enhancing national and international security through increasing pathways of com-
munication:  Beginning  in  the  early  1980s,  the  U.S.  National  Academy  of  Sciences
established  a  standing  committee  on  International  Security  and  Arms  Control
(CISAC)  that  worked  with  scientists  in  the  Soviet  Union  and  later  in  Russia  on
issues of nuclear stability, arms control and non-proliferation. The initial work was
aimed at building mutual trust and respect, but ultimately this effort matured into
a dialogue that was central to later arms reduction agreements. Current work with
the  Russian  Academy  focuses  on  topics  such  as  international  nuclear  fuel  cycle  ap-
proaches,  and  the  international  nuclear  security  environment.  Beyond  cooperation
with  Russia,  we  convene  dialogues  in  India  on  Indo-U.S.  cooperation  in  inter-
national  security  issues.  We  have  a  series  of  U.S.-China  engagements,  one  of  the
few  sustained  bilateral  channels  of  non-governmental  communication  on  inter-
national  and  regional  security  issues,  with  an  important  set  of  Chinese  scientists,
nuclear  weapons  experts,  and  policy  analysts.  We  participate  in  international  fora
aimed at enhancing biosecurity, both with the international community and in a bi-
lateral context with the Chinese Academy of Sciences.
Enhancing human and institutional capital as a route to economic development and
equity:  Over  the  past  15  years  a  global  network  of  science  academies  has  emerged
and  become  an  important  venue  for  coordination  among  science  academies  around
the  world.  The  network,  known  as  the  InterAcademy  Panel  on  International  Issues
(IAP),  has  provided  a  means  to  coordinate  communications  and  actions  with  many
partners  simultaneously.  The  IAP  has  established  programs  on  water  futures,
science  education,  biosecurity,  natural  hazards  and  disasters,  and  digital  access  to
scientific  information.  Associations  of  Engineering  and  Medical  Academies  are  also
active,  and  cooperation  among  networks  has  been  established.  A  second  organiza-
tion,  called  the  InterAcademy  Council  (IAC)  undertakes  detailed  studies  on  major
global  issues.  An  IAC  report  released  on  October  2007  analyzed  the  global  energy
transition, earlier reports address the problem of food security in Africa and the im-
portance  of  women  as  an  under  utilized  human  resource  in  science.  These  reports
are  intended  for  high-level  policy-makers  and  their  dissemination  and  implementa-
tion  is  being  accomplished  on  a  regional  basis  by  networks  of  academies  in  Africa,
the  Americas  and  Asia.  Our  Academy  played  a  crucial  role  in  the  creation  of  these
networks.

Five years ago we initiated a program of institutional development, funded by the
Bill  and  Melinda  Gates  Foundation,  to  build  the  capacity  of  African  science  acad-
emies to provide independent, evidence-based advice to their governments and coun-
tries,  with  an  emphasis  on  health  needs.  The  principal  objectives  of  the  initiative
are to help the academies establish sound advisory processes and to foster and sus-
tain  a  relationship  between  the  academy  and  its  government  and  nation  such  that
the academy is regarded as a trusted source of excellent scientific advice.

The initiative supports a variety of activities at the national level. We work inten-
sively  with  the  science  academies  of  Nigeria,  South  Africa,  and  Uganda  and  assist
these  academies  in  hiring  and  training  staff,  developing  infrastructure,  and  devel-
oping  and  testing  different  models  for  policy  advice.  In  addition,  we  are  providing
more  modest  strategic  planning  grants  to  the  African  Academy  of  Sciences  and  to
the  academies  of  Senegal,  Ghana,  Kenya  and  Cameroon,  and  helping  the  African
Academies to work together.

Partner  academies  have  experimented  with  convening  activities—forums,
symposia,  and  workshops—to  gather  stakeholders  from  government,  academia,  in-
dustry,  and  non-governmental  organizations  for  examination,  illumination,  and  dis-
cussion of scientific and policy issues. A few examples of outputs from this work are:
• An  influential  consensus  report  of  the  Academy  of  Sciences  of  South  Africa
entitled ‘‘HIV/AIDS, TB and Nutrition: Scientific Inquiry into the Nutritional
influences  on  Human  Immunity  with  Special  Reference  to  HIV  Infection  and
Active TB in South Africa’’ was released in August 2007. This report address-
es  a  widespread  controversy  over  the  Nation’s  AIDS  policies,  which  have  for
many years emphasized the importance of good nutrition in the fight against
poverty, a study committee of 15 multi-disciplinary experts found that neither
food  nor  food  supplements,  although  important  for  many  other  reasons,  are
alternatives to drug therapy in treating those afflicted with HIV/AIDS.

• A Forum on Evidence-based Policy-making in Nigeria.
• The  Uganda  National  Academy  of  Sciences  has  established  a  Forum  on
Health  and  Nutrition  and  has  recently  released  its  first  major  consensus  re-
port on ‘‘Approaches to Assessing and Managing Malaria Vector Resistance to
Insecticides.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

• The  Uganda  National  Academy  of  Sciences  also  recently  hosted  a  workshop
• A  workshop  report  of  the  Academy  of  Sciences  of  South  Africa  on  water  re-

‘‘Promoting Biosafety and Biosecurity within the Life Sciences.’’

search and management was released in 2007.

Complementary  to  these  activities  at  the  national  level,  we  convene  annual  con-
ferences, joint learning sessions, and training activities—for networking and shared
learning on evidence-based policy advice. The most recent annual conference, Water
and Health in Africa, was held in Dakar, Senegal. Government officials from 12 Af-
rican  countries  participated  in  the  conference.  The  exchanges  and  experience  from
the  conference  discussions  resulted  in  the  drafting  and  signing  of  the  Declaration
of  Dakar:  a  document  that  espouses  the  use  of  scientific  evidence  in  policy-making
through a process facilitated by science academies.

In the area of human resource development our Academy is an active participant
in  the  IAP  global  program  to  improve  the  quality  of  science  education.  During  the
past  year,  these  efforts  have  included  an  IAP  sponsored  meeting  in  London  on  the
professional  development  of  science  teachers,  work  with  the  U.S.–Mexico  Founda-
tion for Science (FUMEC) on the fourth biennial international conference on science
education—‘‘Science and Well-Being . . . From Amazement to Citizenship’’—held in
Monterrey,  Mexico,  in  November  2007,  a  leadership  development  conference  in
Nairobi,  Kenya,  for  teacher  leaders  from  10  African  countries  and  work  on  the  de-
velopment  of  an  evaluation  framework  for  use  in  countries  committed  to  improving
science education.

What  are  the  unique  strengths  of  the  Academies  in  fostering  international

science cooperation?

A  unique  strength  of  the  National  Academies  in  fostering  international  scientific
cooperation is the high esteem accorded U.S. science by the rest of the world. Inter-
national  polling  reveals  that  attitudes  towards  U.S.  science  are  more  positive  than
towards  any  other  aspect  of  U.S.  society.  This  attitude  is  especially  pronounced  in
Islamic  countries.  As  noted  elsewhere  in  this  testimony,  the  Academies  represent
the  leadership  of  U.S.  science  and  as  such  represent  the  human  face  of  U.S.  sci-
entific  achievement.  This  enables  engagement  and  cooperative  work  aimed  at
shared  goals  in  all  regions  of  the  world.  A  second  strength  is  that  The  Academies,
and  other  non-governmental  science  organizations  such  as  the  AAAS,  can  mobilize
the U.S. scientific community on urgent issues.

Academies  represent  a  scientific  approach  to  problem-solving,  achieving  national
economic  goals,  and  peaceful  competition.  A  major  aspect  of  our  international  pro-
gram is to strengthen education and training, and to empower science communities
to  be  more  effective  in  engaging  national  policy-makers  and  the  public,  thereby
transmitting  this  problem-solving  ethic  to  other  societies,  especially  in  the  devel-
oping world.

What  are  the  limitations  of  the  Academies  in  fostering  international

science cooperation?

The Academies do not make policy, but rather provide evidence, analysis and pol-
icy options based on our best understanding of science. This means that in most re-
gards,  the  Academies  occupy  the  role  of  advisors  and  not  implementers.  A  second
limitation  is  financial.  Most  of  our  international  activities  are  financed  by  philan-
thropic foundations or from our own limited endowment pool. The financial base for
international work is not adequate to the meet the many urgent needs and opportu-
nities for constructive engagement.

How do you coordinate your efforts with the Federal Government and with

those other organizations?

One  important  component  of  our  interaction  with  the  Federal  Government  is  our
direct  advisory  reports  to  the  State  Department  and  USAID  on  the  role  of  STH  in
foreign policy and development assistance. In our own engagement with other coun-
tries,  we  operate  within  U.S.  laws  and  regulations,  which  involves  communication
with  the  Federal  Government  when  required.  But  more  importantly,  the  Federal
Government  is  very  aware  that  a  successful  American  engagement  with  the  world
must  involve  many  private  sector  and  non-governmental  players,  and  we  receive
much  encouragement  from  the  government  in  our  international  activities.  One  im-
portant program of U.S. Embassies abroad is to sponsor extended visits to the U.S.
for  key  (often  young)  leaders  from  host  countries,  including  many  with  interests  in
STH, and we meet regularly with these foreign visitors. Many U.S. agencies, notably
the  Fogarty  International  Center  at  NIH,  and  the  NSF,  but  also  DOE,  EPA,  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

others, have active programs for, and interests in, international cooperation, and we
have  valuable  interaction  with  them.  With  the  support  of  the  NSF,  The  National
Academies  provide  U.S.  participation  in  the  International  Council  for  Science
(ICSU), many international disciplinary unions, and IIASA.

Also,  our  interest  in  international  STH  cooperation  and  in  capacity  building
around  the  world  is  similar  to  that  of  many  non-governmental  organizations  in  the
U.S.,  notably  the  AAAS.  Since  these  organizations  also  are  led  by  outstanding
American scientists, in many cases individuals involved in their leadership are cur-
rent or past leaders of The National Academies, and cooperation is natural.

How  might  the  Federal  Government,  either  as  a  whole  or  specific  to  one
or  more  agencies,  take  better  advantage  of  science  and  the  U.S.
scientific  community  in  pursuing  its  foreign  policy  goals  and  in
helping  to  lead  the  world  toward  global  solutions  for  global  chal-
lenges such as water, climate, energy and infectious diseases?

The U.S. Federal Government has great influence in the world owing to the scale
of the U.S. economy, and owing to the widely admired egalitarian ideals and aspira-
tions of U.S. society. This provides substantial leverage to achieve constructive solu-
tions  to  global  problems.  Unfortunately,  the  U.S.  has  not  always  made  full  use  of
these  assets.  Moreover,  the  U.S.  has  allowed  its  investments  in  international  STH
to  decline.  Take  investments  through  the  U.S.  AID  as  an  example.  An  Academies
report published in 2006, and under taken at the request of the U.S. AID Adminis-
trator,  entitled  ‘‘The  Fundamental  Role  of  Science  and  Technology  in  International
Development:  An  Imperative  for  the  U.S.  Agency  for  International  Development’’
found  that  STH  competencies  in  USAID  have  declined  substantially.  The  report
made a series of recommendations on how to rebalance the USAID competencies in
STH to increase the effectiveness of USAID programs.

The  creation  of  the  office  of  Science  and  Technology  Advisor  (STAS)  for  the  Sec-
retary  of  State  is  an  important  step  forward,  as  is  the  recent  appointment  of  the
same individual as Science and Technology Advisor to the USAID Administrator. In
its May 2007 strategic plan, the Department of State and USAID established an im-
portant  set  of  realistic  STH  diplomatic  strategies,  however,  these  must  be  seen
against inadequate (DOS) or inadequate and declining (USAID) STH capabilities. As
noted  in  a  recent  Congressional  Research  Service  report  (‘‘Science,  Technology,  and
American  Diplomacy:  Background  and  Issues  for  Congress’’),  implementation  of
these  diplomatic  strategies  will  require  new  investments  in  governmental  capabili-
ties,  but  implementation  can  also  be  accelerated  by  the  effective  use  of  non-govern-
mental science organizations.

An  important  opportunity  derives  from  the  fact  that  many  of  the  leaders  of
science  in  other  parts  of  the  world  have  had  a  significant  experience  with  U.S.  re-
search institutions as students or as research visitors. To cite one example, 40 per-
cent of the faculty at Sharif University, Iran’s premier science and technology insti-
tution,  received  training  in  the  U.S.  During  a  recent  visit  to  Sharif  University,  the
desire  for  an  expanded  engagement  with  all  areas  of  U.S.  science  was  repeatedly
emphasized to the U.S. visiting delegation. This illustrates an experience that is re-
iterated  in  all  parts  of  the  world—many  with  direct  knowledge  of  our  country  and
its  culture  are  willing  partners  for  further  engagement,  owing  to  positive  feelings
about their experiences with U.S. science institutions specifically and with U.S. soci-
ety generally.

Regrettably the cadre of international scientists with direct knowledge of the U.S.
is  declining,  because  broad  based  U.S.  Government  programs  for  international  fel-
lowships have eroded greatly over the past two decades. The Academies report cited
above found that there has been a ten-fold decline in the number of USAID-financed
graduate students from developing countries at U.S. universities. The report makes
the  strong  recommendation  that  USAID  revitalize  its  investments  in  human  re-
sources,  by  bringing  its  fellowship  programs  back  to  the  scale  of  the  1980s.  Based
on  historical  experience,  it  is  clear  that  a  modest  investment  in  fellowships  will
bring large returns in future generations.

Current  visa  policies  are  a  further  obstacle  to  scientific  exchange.  It  is  important
to  find  an  appropriate  balance  between  legitimate  national  security  concerns  and
other dimensions of our national interest. To quote from the recent CRS report cited
above,  ‘‘As  other  countries  increase  their  investment  in  higher  education  and  R&D,
the  top  science  and  engineering  research  and  facilities  may  not  be  in  the  United
States,’’  thus  broader  engagement  is  clearly  in  our  national  economic  self  interest.
Moreover,  other  aspects  of  our  national  security  depend  on  U.S.  international  STH
engagement,  for  example  in  responding  to  global  emerging  infectious  diseases  chal-
lenges such as HIV or SARS or avian flu.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

The National Science Board (NSB) recently issued a report (International Science
and  Engineering  Partnerships:  A  Priority  for  U.S.  Foreign  Policy  and  Our  Nation’s
Innovation Enterprise) that touches many of the themes listed above, including that
the U.S. should create a coherent and integrated international science and engineer-
ing  strategy,  balance  U.S.  foreign  and  R&D  policy,  and  promote  intellectual  ex-
change.  These  themes  emphasizing  the  critical  role  of  STH  in  U.S.  diplomacy  are
being reiterated in many fora including these hearings. It seems clear that the time
is  ripe  to  make  fuller  use  of  U.S.  STH  assets  in  achieving  national  foreign  policy
goals.

Many  of  the  dozens  of  federal  agencies  have  core  goals  to  which  carefully  chosen
international  cooperation  could  provide  very  valuable  contributions,  and  these  op-
portunities  are  becoming  more  important  as  scientific  strength  is  more  widely  dis-
tributed,  as  economies  globalize,  and  as  challenges  (related,  for  example,  to  aging
populations, to water, to global health, to energy and climate change) are increasing
understood to have commonalities and/or to require common action. But in general,
federal  agencies  perceive  that  the  option  to  support  international  activities  is  not
very clear in their congressional guidance and mandate. Thus, it would be very use-
ful  for  federal  agencies  to  have  congressional  guidance  that  allows  them  to  support
and engage in high-value, innovative opportunities for international cooperation.

The  points  developed  above  do  not  speak  directly  to  the  question  of  addressing
‘‘global challenges such as water, climate, energy and infectious diseases,’’ but rath-
er address structural impediments to a more effective utilization of U.S. STH assets
to  achieve  national  goals.  We  believe  that  structural  reforms  must  be  the  funda-
mental first step. Once these are accomplished, it will be relatively straightforward
to  focus  U.S.  STH  strengths,  both  through  direct  governmental  programs  and
through the effective use of non-governmental science organizations, on global chal-
lenges  of  sustainability.  As  noted  earlier  in  this  testimony,  much  is  already  being
done  through  the  global  network  of  academies  (IAP)  or  with  important  bilateral
partners  (e.g.,  China,  the  Middle  East)  to  focus  on  sustainability  issues,  but  these
efforts are modest compared to the scale of the problems that the world faces.

Thank  you  again  for  this  opportunity  to  testify.  I  would  be  happy  to  address  any

questions the Subcommittee might have.

BIOGRAPHY FOR MICHAEL T. CLEGG

Michael T. Clegg received his B.S. and Ph.D. degrees in agricultural genetics and
genetics  respectively  at  the  University  of  California,  Davis.  In  1972,  he  joined  the
faculty of Brown University moving from there to the University of Georgia in 1976.
In  1984,  he  assumed  the  position  of  professor  of  genetics  at  the  University  of  Cali-
fornia, Riverside. He also served as Dean of the College of Natural and Agricultural
Sciences  from  1994  to  2000  and  he  is  Founding  Director  of  the  Genomics  Institute
at the University of California, Riverside. In July 2004, he joined the faculty of UC–
Irvine as the Donald Bren Professor of Biological Sciences.

Clegg’s  research  specialty  is  population  genetics  and  molecular  evolution.  His
early  work  in  population  genetics  focused  on  the  dynamical  behavior  of  linked  sys-
tems of genes in plant and Drosophila populations. During this period, he also con-
tributed to the theoretical study of multi-locus systems employing computer simula-
tions  together  with  the  analysis  of  mathematical  models.  Later  he  helped  pioneer
the  comparative  analysis  of  cholorplast  DNA  variation  as  a  tool  for  the  reconstruc-
tion  of  plant  phylogenies.  His  current  work  is  concerned  with  the  molecular  evo-
lution  of  genes  in  the  flavonoid  biosynthetic  pathway,  the  use  of  coalescent  models
to  study  crop  plant  domestication  and  the  application  of  molecular  markers  to  avo-
cado improvement.

Clegg  was  elected  to  membership  in  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  in  1990
and he was elected a fellow of the American Academy of Arts and Sciences in 1992.
He was elected Foreign Secretary of the National Academy of Sciences in 2002 and
reelected  in  2006.  He  is  an  Associate  Fellow  of  TWAS  (Academy  of  Sciences  of  the
Developing  World)  and  a  corresponding  member  of  both  the  Academia  Nacional  de
Ciencias  Exactas  Fisicas  y  Naturales  and  the  Academia  Nacional  de  Agronomia  y
Veterinaria  of  Argentina.  He  has  also  served  as  President  of  the  American  Genetic
Association  (1987);  President  of  the  International  Society  for  Molecular  Biology  &
Evolution  (2002);  and  Chair  of  the  Section  on  Agriculture,  Food  and  Natural  Re-
sources of the American Association for the Advancement of Science (2003).

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Wulf.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  WILLIAM  A.  WULF,  MEMBER,  BOARD  OF
DIRECTORS,  U.S.  CIVILIAN  RESEARCH  AND  DEVELOPMENT
FOUNDATION (CRDF)
Dr. WULF. Chairman Baird, Ranking Member Ehlers, and distin-
guished  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  appreciate  the  oppor-
tunity to testify today on behalf of the Civilian Research and Devel-
opment  Foundation,  a.k.a.  CRDF.  I  am  fairly  new  to  the  board  of
CRDF,  having  just  joined  in  February.  I  was  quickly  recruited  to
become Chairman of the Audit Committee, and so I have immersed
myself in the organizational, financial, and programmatic activities
of the organization, an organization I must say whose mission I be-
lieve  very  deeply  in.  Nevertheless,  let  me  introduce  Cathy  Camp-
bell  behind  me  here  who  is  the  CEO  of  CRDF  and  who  will  bail
me out if I get in over my head during the Q&A.

It  is  especially  appropriate  for  CRDF  to  be  testifying  here  today
since  it  was  the  brainchild  of  the  former  Chairman  of  this  com-
mittee, the late George Brown. Chairman Brown was an articulate
advocate for international science and engineering research collabo-
ration,  and  he  understood  the  value  that  that  collaboration  had  as
a tool to advance U.S. foreign policy and national security.

In  the  early  ’90s  when  the  Soviet  Union  was  disintegrating,  and
engineers and scientists in the former Soviet Union’s weapons lab-
oratories were not being paid, there was a deep concern that those
scientists  and  engineers  would  offer  their  services  to  governments
that  do  not  have  the  best  interest  of  the  United  States  at  heart.
Chairman  Brown’s  first  charge  to  CRDF  was  to  fund  these  sci-
entists  and  engineers  to  convert  themselves  to  civilian  research.  I
am glad to report that that particular mission has mostly been ac-
complished.  Chairman  Brown’s  truly  clever  scheme  not  only  kept
the  weapons  designers  at  home  but  helped  enhance  their  civilian
research  capacity  in  contributing  to  the  increased  stability  and
prosperity  of  Russia  and  other  members  of  the  former  Soviet
Union.

The success of the original CRDF mission underscored Chairman
Brown’s broader vision and what a lot of us believe deeply, namely
that  science  and  engineering  can  be  a  powerful  tool  for  fostering
better international relations, but there is much, much more to do.
International  collaboration  of  science  and  engineering  is  a  two-
fer.  Number  one,  it  solves  important  human  problems  and  thus
contributes directly to security, prosperity, and health. But number
two,  it  also  creates  those  personal  relationships  and  trust  that  en-
gender peace. Based on that philosophy and our experience in Rus-
sia,  the  mission  of  CRDF  is  the  promotion  of  peace  and  prosperity
through international science and engineering collaboration.

Scientists  and  engineers  I  believe  are  an  extremely  valuable  but
underutilized  resource  for  U.S.  foreign  policy.  As  Mike  just  men-
tioned, according to numerous polls, the single-most admired aspect
of the West among Muslims is our technology prowess. We can and
we should exploit that admiration.

CRDF  is  a  unique  organization.  It  is  an  independent  501(c)(3)
not-for-profit  corporation,  but  it  was  created  by  the  U.S.  Congress
to  advance  U.S.  foreign  affairs  and  national  security.  We  think  of
CRDF  as  a  ‘‘do-tank,’’  as  opposed  to  a  ‘‘think-tank.’’  We  are  imple-
menters  of  things.  We  implement  good  ideas  to  encourage  collabo-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

ration  between  U.S.  and  foreign  scientists  and  engineers.  Our
unique  specialty  is  to  quickly  and  efficiently  implement  inter-
national  science  and  technology  collaborations  based  on  merit  and
implement it with transparency, flexibility, and accountability.

The success of the original charge from Chairman Brown also un-
derscored that just giving out research grants wasn’t enough. There
is  a  whole  infrastructure  that  supports  research  and  increases  the
probability  of  collaboration  opportunities  for  U.S.  scientists.  That
infrastructure  includes  things  like  peer  review  for  merit-based
awards,  the  ability  to  write  proposals,  grant  administration,  logis-
tics for joint research, and on and on. Those are all things that we
take  for  granted  in  the  U.S.  research  system  but  in  fact  are  not
present in many foreign systems.

So  CRDF  had  to  create  that  infrastructure,  and  so  now  CRDF’s
activities  fall  into  about  20  programs,  certainly  support  for  re-
search collaborations. This fall we will be announcing a competition
for  research  on  climate  change.  We  also  carry  out  nonproliferation
activities,  sort  of  the  original  mission  from  Chairman  Brown.  For
example,  we  have  recently  managed  to  change  what  was  a  bio-
weapons laboratory in Siberia into one that is monitoring for avian
flu.

New program support, for example, logistical support for joint re-
search  between  ourselves  and  the  Russians  in  the  Arctic.  We  do
training  on  things  like  bioethics,  on  how  to  do  peer  review,  on  re-
search management, and grant administration.

We  have  a  number  of  activities  related  to  institution  building.
For example, in most parts of the world, basic research is not done
in  universities  as  it  is  in  the  United  States.  We  happen  to  believe
that  supporting  basic  research  in  universities  is  both  good  for  the
research and good for the universities, and so we have undertaken
activities, particularly in Russia, to encourage that activity. We, as
CRDF, did that at 20 universities. The Russians were so enamored
and appreciative of that, they have done it by themselves in 15 ad-
ditional  ones.  We  are  also  focused  on  innovation  and  knowledge
transfer.  We  have  a  program  called  Next  Steps.  We  have  created
technology transfer offices in a number of universities.

As  an  independent,  non-profit,  non-governmental  organization,
CRDF has capabilities that complement those of government agen-
cies  such  as  NSF.  For  example,  CRDF  can  move  quickly  and  flexi-
bly  to  respond  to  opportunities  that  arise.  It  can  fund  foreign  re-
search scientists and engineers to collaborate with their U.S. coun-
terparts. It can seek and negotiate cost-sharing programs with for-
eign  governments  and  multi-nationals.  It  offers  potential  overseas
partners  a  U.S.  entity  that  is  not  part  of  the  U.S.  Government,  a
property  that  is  especially  important  in  those  countries  that  are
suspicious of the intent of the U.S. Government.

Examples  of  all  of  these  are  given  in  the  written  version  of  my
testimony,  but  as  just  one  example  CRDF  has  secured  $43  million
in cost sharing from foreign governments on 675 projects in 10 dif-
ferent countries.

Recognizing  the  value  of  these  complementary  capabilities,
CRDF  has  been  tasked  by  a  number  of  U.S.  Government  agencies
including  the  Department  of  State,  NSF,  DOD,  the  Department  of
Energy,  and  the  National  Institutes  of  Health.  Again,  examples  of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

the kinds of tasks we do for them are in my written testimony, but
for example, the Department of State has been our principal funder
of original work in Russia and the former Soviet Union. CRDF also
stays in close touch with other NGOs such as those here today, but
especially  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  and  the  AAAS.  We
each  have  unique  strengths  to  contribute,  so  by  working  together,
we maximize the quality of our international activities.

In  summary,  I  would  emphasize  four  points  in  my  testimony.
Number  one,  science  and  engineering  diplomacy  can  be  a  powerful
tool  for  communication  with  influential  citizens  of  countries  that
have  limited  or  strained  relations  with  the  United  States.  Second,
scientists  and  engineers  share  a  set  of  values  that  transcend  cul-
ture. Those shared values facilitate developing the trust that is es-
sential to achieving U.S. foreign policy and national security objec-
tives.  Third,  science  and  engineering  NGOs  such  as  those  here
today provide complementary capabilities to those of the U.S. Gov-
ernment  to  further  effectiveness  of  science  and  engineering  diplo-
macy.  Finally,  CRDF’s  special  contribution  is  as  a  ‘‘do-tank,’’  that
is,  an  implementer  of  science  and  engineering  diplomacy  activities
and programs. We do whatever it takes to make those programs ef-
fective. Thank you.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Wulf follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF WILLIAM A. WULF

Introduction

Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and  distinguished  Members  of  the
Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  discuss  the  role  of  non-govern-
mental  organizations  and  universities  in  international  science  and  technology  col-
laboration.  I  commend  the  leadership  of  this  committee  for  developing  these  hear-
ings  to  highlight  the  importance  of  engaging  some  of  our  most  valued  resources  in
the United States, our scientists and engineers, to help lead the world toward global
solutions  for  global  challenges  to  build  peace  and  prosperity  for  all.  The  United
States—government,  non-governmental  organizations  and  universities—must  do
more to engage our scientists and engineers in international collaboration.

I  have  had  the  privilege  of  testifying  before  this  committee  on  a  number  of  occa-
sions, including when I served as President of the National Academy of Engineering.
It  is  a  great  pleasure  to  return  today  as  a  member  of  the  Board  of  the  Directors
of the U.S. Civilian Research & Development Foundation (CRDF) and to share with
you  the  experience  that  CRDF  has  accumulated  over  twelve  years.  During  that
time, CRDF has developed a world-class reputation as an effective and efficient im-
plementer  of  global  science  and  technology  collaborations  and  a  solid  partner  with
the  U.S.  Government,  private  sector,  and  foreign  governments  and  institutions.
CRDF’s  programs  have  had  direct  benefits  to  American  science  objectives,  but  also
to U.S. foreign policy, public diplomacy, national security, and competitiveness.

It  is  highly  fitting  that  CRDF  is  testifying  before  the  House  Science  Committee.
It was this committee, under the leadership of your former Chairman the late Con-
gressman George Brown, that spawned the creation of CRDF in 1992. As you know,
Chairman Brown was an ardent and articulate advocate of developing innovative ef-
forts to build science and technology collaboration between the U.S. and other coun-
tries.  He  understood  the  benefits  to  the  U.S.  scientific  community  of  high-quality
international  collaborations  in  the  basic  and  applied  sciences.  He  understood  the
value of international science and technology cooperation as an important tool to ad-
vance  U.S.  foreign  policy  and  national  security,  specifically  at  that  time  with  the
countries  of  the  former  Soviet  Union  (FSU).  Finally,  he  felt  strongly  about  the  role
of  NGOs  in  helping  to  build  these  partnerships,  thus  the  establishment  of  CRDF.
It is for this reason that CRDF gives an eponymous annual award for international
science achievement—the George Brown Award for International Scientific Coopera-
tion.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

CRDF: HISTORY, MISSION, AND PROGRAM ACCOMPLISHMENTS

26

CRDF is a unique organization in that it is an independent, non-governmental or-
ganization created by the U.S. Congress to help advance U.S. science, foreign affairs
and  national  security  priorities.  Based  in  Arlington,  Va.,  with  three  support  offices
abroad,  CRDF  has  grown  to  include  a  global  staff  of  over  130  people  working  with
more  than  20  countries.  Incorporated  as  a  not-for-profit  organization  in  the  Com-
monwealth  of  Virginia,  CRDF  is  governed  by  an  independent  Board  of  Directors
whose  fourteen  members  represent  a  cross  section  of  American  science,  foreign  pol-
icy,  nonproliferation,  academic  and  business  communities.  CRDF  also  routinely
seeks  advice  from  a  group  of  preeminent  experts,  including  a  Nobel  laureate  in
chemistry, who serve on CRDF’s Advisory Council. CRDF’s staff contributes experi-
ence  in  science,  international  affairs,  program  and  project  management,  finance,
grant  administration,  nonproliferation  and  policy-making.  Many  of  our  staff  have
lived, studied or worked overseas. The scientific backgrounds of many of our foreign
staff and their experience working in the science establishments of their own coun-
tries provide invaluable capabilities and credibility for successful implementation of
CRDF’s program activities.

CRDF’s  unique  specialty  is  its  ability  to  quickly  and  effectively  implement  inter-
national science and technology partnerships selected on scientific merit and mutual
benefit,  and  executed  with  transparency,  flexibility,  and  accountability.  It  partners
and  works  closely  with  scientists  and  policy-makers  in  the  U.S.  Government,  other
NGOs,  universities,  foundations,  and  U.S.  companies,  as  well  as  with  key  foreign
governments  and  partners,  successfully  supporting  international  collaborative
projects valued at over $350 million. These projects include more than 3,000 grants
that CRDF has made under its own programs, and over 1,200 separate projects that
CRDF  has  administered  on  behalf  of  U.S.  Government  agencies,  universities  and
businesses supporting research and development projects overseas.

For  its  own  programs,  CRDF  is  extremely  effective  at  leveraging  the  funds  it  re-
ceives  with  contributions  from  other  sources,  and  has  secured  $43  million  in  cost-
sharing,  primarily  from  foreign  government  agencies,  for  675  projects  in  ten  coun-
tries.  For  example,  under  its  Basic  Research  in  Higher  Education  (BRHE)  program
in Russia, CRDF has obtained cost-sharing from Russian sources, including the Rus-
sian  Federation  Ministry  of  Education  and  Science,  regional  and  local  sources,  and
universities.  These  sources  contributed  50  percent  of  the  initial  core  grants,  and
then  have  increased  their  share,  such  that  they  now  provide  70  percent  of  all  pro-
gram  costs  and  by  2010,  they  will  have  assumed  100  percent  of  the  program  costs.
CRDF  also  works  hard  to  advance  the  goal  of  science  for  diplomacy  working  in
partnership with top scientific societies such as our colleagues here—AAAS and the
NAS—as well as with other organizations to focus on how best to help policy-makers
better understand the unique resources of the U.S. scientific community in fostering
and  advancing  U.S.  foreign  and  national  security  priorities.  Finally,  given  our  suc-
cess  working  with  the  countries  of  the  former  Soviet  Union,  CRDF  has  expanded
its  geographic  focus  across  Eurasia,  and  into  the  Middle  East,  North  Africa,  and
Asia. The model and methods developed with this experience can be successfully ap-
plied to many situations.

History

Sixteen years ago, Science Committee Chairman Brown, on the Floor of the House
of  Representatives,  introduced  the  ‘‘AmeRus  Foundation  for  Research  and  Develop-
ment  Act’’  and  explained  that  this  bill  would  ‘‘establish  an  independent,  endowed
foundation  which  will  identify  and  fund  cooperative  research  and  development  ven-
tures  between  engineers  and  scientists  working  in  industry,  academia,  and  defense
in  the  United  States  and  the  former  Soviet  Union.’’  In  October  1992,  Congress
passed  the  FREEDOM  Support  Act  of  1992.  Section  511  of  that  bill  authorized  the
creation of the foundation. Three years later, the U.S. Civilian Research & Develop-
ment  Foundation  was  established,  with  initial  funding  from  the  Department  of  De-
fense through the Nunn-Lugar program and the National Science Foundation, to ad-
vance U.S. policy and security interests through international science collaboration.
Congressman Brown’s support for CRDF was bold. It came at a time of significant
geopolitical  change  overseas  and  an  economic  downturn  at  home.  The  break-up  of
the Soviet empire, and the consequent need to secure the weapons of mass destruc-
tion  and  ensure  economic  stability  in  the  successor  states,  dominated  the  U.S.  for-
eign  policy  agenda.  Congressman  Brown  recognized  an  historic  opportunity  for  the
United States to foster economic stability through support of science and technology
cooperation.  He  argued  that  the  scientists  and  engineers  in  the  newly  independent
states would ‘‘. . . play a key role in determining whether the transition to an open
and market-driven society will succeed . . .’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

Arguing  for  support  of  foreign  scientists  and  engineers  during  a  period  of  eco-
nomic  downturn  in  the  United  States  was  not  easy.  Congressman  Brown  acknowl-
edged the competing demands for budgetary resources and argued that the only ‘‘ra-
tionale  approach’’  for  this  new  foundation  would  be  based  on  ‘‘mutual  cooperation,
collaboration and benefit.’’ The underlying model involved partnerships between sci-
entists  and  engineers  in  the  former  Soviet  Union  and  scientists  and  engineers  in
the  United  States.  In  other  words,  scientists  and  engineers  from  the  United  States
would be directly involved in the cooperation and stand to benefit from the research,
which would be selected based on merit and mutual benefit. The challenges and vi-
sion Congressman Brown articulated in 1992 in the former Soviet Union are as rel-
evant  today.  They  also  are  transportable  to  other  countries  and  regions  facing  sig-
nificant  challenges  that  would  benefit  from  more  proactive  international  scientific
engagement programs and initiatives.

CRDF Mission

Today,  CRDF  remains  rooted  in  the  basic  principles  and  approaches  outlined  by
the  Science  Committee  sixteen  years  ago.  CRDF  has  taken  its  successful  track
record in the FSU to implement its mission in other countries and regions globally.
The CRDF mission is to:

• Provide  cooperative  research  and  development  (R&D)  opportunities  that  en-
able  scientists  and  engineers  to  address  critical  security,  economic,  education
and other societal needs worldwide.

• Advance  peace  and  prosperity  by  funding  civilian  research  and  development

projects that contribute to global nonproliferation objectives.

• Promote the application of science and technology to economic growth through
international  partnerships  and  training  that  foster  invention,  innovation,  en-
trepreneurship and the commercialization of technology.

• Strengthen university research and education in science and engineering.

Program Components and Accomplishments

CRDF realizes its mission by designing and implementing a range of program ac-
tivities that jointly meet donor requirements and respond to the needs in each coun-
try. CRDF currently is administering over twenty programs that address each of the
four mission areas, as follows:

Research Collaborations

CRDF  supports  and  funds  high-quality  collaborative  research  and  development
projects in the natural sciences. Research projects involving U.S. scientists and for-
eign  counterparts  are  selected  through  merit-based  competitions.  CRDF  has  pro-
vided  nearly  1,500  grants  in  support  of  collaborative  research  projects  valued  at
more than $78 million and involving approximately 8,000 scientists in 15 countries.
Targeted research competitions have also been designed to address specific areas of
priority to funders, including general biomedical research, HIV/AIDS research, anti-
terrorism research, and this coming year, global climate change.

CRDF’s  flagship  research  collaboration  program  is  the  Cooperative  Grants  Pro-
gram  (CGP).  This  program  provides  up  to  two  years  of  support  for  joint  U.S.  and
foreign  research  teams  in  all  areas  of  basic  and  applied  research  in  the  natural
sciences.  Such  collaborations  strengthen  the  quality  of  foreign  research  to  collabo-
rate more effectively with U.S. and international partners, provide opportunities for
junior  researchers  and  female  scientists,  support  the  redirection  of  former  weapons
scientists to civilian research, and establish the background of knowledge and tech-
nology  on  which  successful  industry  and  business  partnerships  with  U.S.  institu-
tions  may  be  built.  Historically,  cooperative  research  grants  have  averaged  about
$60,000  each  but  amounts  can  vary  by  the  research  program  and  the  local  context
in  which  the  awards  are  made.  Grants  to  the  foreign  teams  typically  include  indi-
vidual  financial  support;  equipment,  supplies  and  travel  support;  and  institutional
support  to  the  grantee  institution;  U.S.  team  expenses  are  generally  confined  to
travel, supplies, and graduate student stipends.

Such  cooperative  research  grants  are  extremely  valuable  in  addressing  global
challenges  that  can  benefit  greatly  from  S&T  solutions.  One  example,  focused  on
disaster  mitigation  and  earthquake  hazard,  is  a  CRDF  grant  to  the  Institute  of
Vulcanology and Seismology in Kamchatka, Russia, and Pennsylvania State Univer-
sity.  This  team  improved  the  scientific  understanding  of  the  generation,  transport,
and deposition of dangerous explosive volcanic gravity flows of hot ash-gas mixtures.
Using  numeric  modeling  to  simulate  directed  blast  clouds  of  volcanic  eruptions  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

validating  the  computer  results  against  field  and  lab  data  has  resulted  in  findings
that are invaluable for volcanic hazard assessment worldwide.

Another  successful  CRDF  grant,  focused  on  biodiversity  and  agriculture,  involves
the  Ketshkoveli  Institute  of  Botany  in  Tbilisi,  Georgia,  and  the  Missouri  Botanical
Garden  who  jointly  established  the  first  Caucasus  Regional  Seed  Bank  in  Tbilisi.
The  seed  bank  is  a  living  reservoir  of  biodiversity  in  the  Southern  Caucasus,  one
of  the  United  Nation’s  designated  world  biodiversity  hot  spots.  The  seed  bank  in-
cludes many wild varieties of crops originally domesticated in the Caucasus, and ex-
amples  of  plants  used  as  folk  remedies,  which  are  candidates  for  clinical  study  and
use as effective medicines. Some species have already been successfully reintroduced
into  the  wild.  CRDF  has  literally  dozens  of  such  cases  where  joint  research  has
yielded  important  findings,  led  to  improved  partnerships,  or  opened  new  areas  for
investigation.

Nonproliferation and Security

Since  its  inception,  CRDF  has  worked  to  transition  former  weapons  of  mass  de-
struction  (WMD)  scientists  to  civilian  research.  CRDF  has  been  able  to  engage
former  weapons  researchers  in  productive  civilian  R&D,  converting  former  related
facilities to civilian use, and upgrading security at civilian facilities to prevent their
misuse.  Given  CRDF’s  expertise  and  credibility  in  helping  to  transition  former
weapon  researchers,  the  Department  of  State  and  Department  of  Defense  continue
to  request  CRDF’s  help  in  implementing  a  variety  of  threat  reduction  programs.
Most  are  focused  on  biological  weapons  research  and  conversion  of  scientists  and
their associated facilities to civilian applications.

For example, CRDF formed a collaborative project with Vector, a former biological
defense research facility in Siberia. Highly trained American and Russian virologists
collaborated  to  establish  this  critical  effort  to  monitor  migratory  birds  as  they  flew
over  Novosibirsk,  in  Siberia.  American  scientists  now  famous  for  their  work  on
avian  influenza  provided  the  reagents  to  Vector  that  allowed  the  typing  within  24
hours  of  the  H5N1  outbreak.  Today,  the  World  Health  Organization  (WHO)  is  tap-
ping into the capacity that CRDF built at Vector and specialists are considering this
a model disease surveillance program for emerging threats.

This  Russian  flu  surveillance  project  is  an  example  of  the  type  of  contribution
CRDF is offering to the U.S. State Department. A recent focus has been support for
the State Department’s Biosecurity Engagement Program (BEP), which reduces the
risk  of  biological  threats  by  collaborating  with  partner  governments  to  develop  bio-
safety and pathogen security standards that are consistent with national and inter-
national  guidelines,  norms  and  requirements.  What  is  more,  CRDF  has  dem-
onstrated our ability to rapidly respond in difficult environments and transition sci-
entists into meaningful civilian alternatives.

CRDF  also  recently  completed  a  contract  with  the  Defense  Threat  Reduction
Agency (DTRA), where CRDF managed three Cooperative Biological Research (CBR)
projects  that  engaged  scientists  from  Uzbekistan  and  Kazakhstan  in  research  that
resulted  in  19  abstracts  presented  at  international  conferences  and  two  articles  in
peer-reviewed  journals.  The  projects  helped  to  build  institutional  research  capacity;
improve  biosafety  and  biosecurity,  and  increase  knowledge  of  local  pathogens.  Here
is another example of how engagement of this kind brings these people and organi-
zations into the broader international community with strong linkages to U.S. policy
and practice.

Innovation and the Transition to Knowledge Economies

CRDF  has  supported  a  suite  of  programs  to  link  foreign  researchers  and  entre-
preneurs  with  prospective  U.S.  industry  partners  or  investors.  CRDF  introduced  a
pioneering  industrial  R&D  collaborative  program  that  matched  CRDF’s  funding  of
$11  million  with  $13  million  in  funding  from  U.S.  partner  companies,  such  as  3M
and General Electric. CRDF’s ‘‘Next Steps to Market’’ program resulted in four new
companies  and  six  commercial  partnerships  with  commercial  sales  throughout  Eur-
asia and the United States.

As an example, a small U.S. small business based in California, SciClone Pharma-
ceuticals,  working  on  compounds  that  address  tuberculosis  (TB),  received  funding
from CRDF to work with Verta, a St. Petersburg, Russia-based institute. Verta’s re-
searchers  had  an  alternative  TB  treatment  compound  that  could  be  taken  orally—
a more globally viable delivery method. Notably, this collaboration provided the two
dozen  former  biological-weapons  scientists  employed  by  Verta  with  an  opportunity
to transition their weapons expertise. The partnership has brought the world closer
to a new TB treatment much more quickly than either SciClone or Verta could have
done alone, while helping to advance U.S. small business.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

More  recently,  CRDF  organized  Eurasian  Innovation  and  Investment  Fora  in
Cleveland,  Ohio  and  Fairfax,  Virginia,  to  bring  together  promising  Eurasian  high
technology  entrepreneurs  with  potential  U.S.  partners  in  fields  such  as  alternative
energy and information technology. One of the participants in the Northern Virginia
Forum  was  a  Russian  technology  company,  Gravitonus,  which  subsequently  estab-
lished a presence in the U.S. for its cutting-edge technology that helps persons with
disabilities  to  use  personal  computers  effectively.  Company  president  and  founder
Dr. Alex Kosik, a spinal cord surgeon in Russia, wanted to persuade potential Amer-
ican  investors  to  help  him  produce  the  Alternative  Computer  Control  System
(ACCS)—a  special  assistance  device  that  is  placed  in  a  person’s  mouth  and  con-
trolled  by  the  tongue  and  biting  action.  Through  partnership  with  CRDF  and  the
Mason  Enterprise  Center  at  George  Mason  University,  Gravitonus  is  now  able  to
set  up  volume  production,  distribution,  sales  and  marketing  operations  and  cus-
tomer  support  services  in  the  United  States.  ‘‘CRDF  has  given  us  a  great  oppor-
tunity,’’  says  Kosik.  ‘‘We  feel  that  our  R&D  efforts  are  noticed.  We  see  that  CRDF
cares.  And  it  really  helps  us  and  inspires  us  to  move  forward.’’  Such  commercial
bridge  building  accelerates  the  adoption  of  beneficial  technologies  in  the  U.S.,  cre-
ates  employment,  and  ultimately,  may  contribute  to  export  sales  from  the  U.S.  as
such products are developed and perfected.

Building New S&T Institutions

CRDF  provides  institutional  support  for  scientific  research  centers,  universities
and  grant-making  organizations  in  order  to  promote  scientific  research  and  to  nur-
ture capacity overseas to allocate R&D resources on the basis of merit review. CRDF
has established and funded fifty such institutions in nine countries throughout Eur-
asia, stretching from the Black Sea to the Sea of Okhotsk on the Pacific Rim. Four
of  these  organizations—in  Armenia,  Azerbaijan,  Georgia  and  Moldova—help  their
respective  nations  gain  experience  in  allocating  scarce  R&D  resources  based  on
merit-based  competitions.  Modeled  on  the  U.S.  National  Science  Foundation,  these
grant-making organizations help to build the necessary capacity for long-term devel-
opment of science and for international collaboration. They also promote democratic
values such as open competition through a transparent process employing the prin-
ciple of merit review.

CRDF has also provided major state-of-the-art equipment and training to 21 com-
petitively selected institutes across eight countries in Eurasia (Armenia, Azerbaijan,
Georgia, Kazakhstan, Moldova, Russia, Ukraine, and Uzbekistan). These shared-use
centers  are  utilized  by  nonprofit  research  and  education  institutions  as  well  as  the
industrial research communities within the regions where the equipment is located.
CRDF  committed  $6.5  million  towards  equipment  and  supplementary  grants.  Eur-
asian governments and local institutions have provided additional support of rough-
ly $1 million to this program.

Advancing Research Capacity in Higher Education

With funding from the U.S. private sector and Russia, CRDF developed a unique
partnership with Russia to introduce a new model for integrating research and edu-
cation  in  Russian  universities.  Since  1998,  the  Basic  Research  and  Higher  Edu-
cation (BRHE) program has established 20 Research and Education Centers at Rus-
sian  universities  to  strengthen  the  university  research  infrastructure,  develop  new
curriculum,  engage  students  in  research  early  in  their  careers,  improve  external
linkages  and  foster  the  commercialization  of  technology.  In  2005,  the  Russian  Min-
istry of Education and Science validated the BRHE model when it independently es-
tablished 15 new centers patterned after the BRHE program. In 2008, independent
evaluators called BRHE ‘‘the Right Program, at the Right Time and with the Right
Process.’’  This  model  has  recently  been  duplicated  in  five  other  countries,  each  of
which  has  contributed  substantial  cost-share  funding  to  their  joint  programs  with
CRDF.

Specialized Programs

Over  the  years  CRDF  has  designed  and  implemented  numerous  specialized  and
general training programs to address a wide range of global needs, including train-
ing  in  bioethics,  peer  review  and  scientific  proposal  writing,  English  language  for
scientists,  research  management,  and  grant  administration.  CRDF  has  also  em-
ployed  information  and  communications  technologies  to  facilitate  these  programs.
For  example,  in  August  2007  CRDF  conducted  training  for  the  seven  original  par-
ticipating institutions of the Iraqi Virtual Science Library. CRDF serves as the Sec-
retariat for this program, which allows Iraqi academic faculty and students to access

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

current  scientific  literature.  Following  the  training,  the  number  of  registered  users
grew by more than 200 new users per month and continues to expand.

Program Support Services

CRDF places a high priority on accountability and transparency in implementing
and  managing  its  grants.  CRDF  has  a  dedicated  department  that  focuses  solely  on
the  effective  administration  of  all  aspects  of  award  management.  The  department
oversees  CRDF’s  network  of  international  banking  agreements,  in-country  support
contractors,  and  international  travel  agencies  and  equipment  vendors.  The  depart-
ment  also  oversees  all  compliance  and  legal  issues  associated  with  project  imple-
mentation  from  export  controls  to  bioethics  to  taxation  to  intellectual  property.  Ex-
tensive  payment  distribution  systems  provide  for  the  efficient  and  transparent  dis-
bursement of project funds and equipment to grantees from $100 payments to indi-
vidual students working on projects to multi-million dollar equipment purchases. In
addition, the department oversees CRDF’s project audit functions and conducts reg-
ular  site  visits  and  audits  to  ensure  the  highest  level  of  assurance  that  resources
are directed to their intended recipients and effectively utilized for the intended re-
sult.

The  systems  developed  for  the  management  of  CRDF’s  international  grants  have
proven  very  effective  and,  as  a  result,  CRDF  utilizes  these  mechanisms  to  support
almost 200 U.S. Government, university, for-profit company and NGO organizations
in the financial and administrative management of their own international projects
and  activities.  A  list  of  customers  under  GAP  Services  is  attached  at  Appendix  A.

ROLE  OF  CRDF  AS  AN  NGO  AND  COORDINATION  WITH  THE  U.S.  GOV-

ERNMENT

The  Congressional  sponsors  of  CRDF  believed  strongly  in  the  potential  contribu-
tion of a non-governmental mission to international science and technology coopera-
tion. They cited the successful precedents of the three non-governmental foundations
that the United States and Israel established in the mid-1970: the Binational Indus-
trial Research and Development (BIRD) Foundation; the Binational Agricultural Re-
search  and  Development  (BARD)  Foundation;  and  the  Binational  Science  Founda-
tion (BSF). They were aware of previous efforts in the late 1970s to develop a major
NGO  to  advance  global  scientific  collaboration  to  advance  development  that  was
never  realized.  Finally  they  understood  that  there  are  times  when  an  independent
NGO—working in partnership with the U.S. Government—can help implement pro-
grams  more  effectively.  Over  the  years  as  CRDF’s  reputation  has  grown,  it  has  re-
ceived  more  calls  for  help  from  the  U.S.  Government.  Its  strengths—as  well  as  its
limitations—as an NGO are listed below:

Strengths as an NGO

As  an  NGO,  CRDF  has  been  able  to  operate  quickly  and  flexibly  in  responding  to
emerging  opportunities.  For  example,  just  a  month  after  the  events  of  9/11,  CRDF
launched  an  initiative  to  engage  U.S.  and  Eurasian  scientists  in  collaborative  re-
search to reduce the effects of terrorist acts on civilian populations. CRDF supported
a series of 11 workshops where hundreds of scientists gathered to focus on research
to  detect,  protect,  and  treat  in  the  case  of  a  terrorist  event.  Some  $1.5  million  was
committed to follow on grants to these teams of scientists, with funding from several
U.S. government agencies.

In  2004,  while  the  U.S.  Government  was  developing  plans  for  science  initiatives
with  Iraq,  CRDF  organized  an  orientation  visit  to  Washington,  DC,  for  a  group  of
six  Iraqi  scientists.  CRDF  introduced  them  to  scientists  in  U.S.  Government  agen-
cies,  local  universities  and  businesses.  Many  of  those  scientists  have  subsequently
participated in research projects with U.S. counterparts.

As an NGO, CRDF can seek and negotiate cost-shared programs with foreign coun-
terparts.  As  mentioned  earlier,  CRDF  has  secured  $43  million,  primarily  from  for-
eign  government  agencies,  for  675  projects  in  ten  countries.  These  cost-shares  ex-
pand the scope and impact of CRDF programs in-country and set the stage to tran-
sition from cost-sharing to exclusive host-country funding.

CRDF is able to leverage resources of multiple organizations as well. For example,
CRDF’s Cooperative Grants Program leverages funding from the State Department,
National  Science  Foundation  and  National  Institutes  of  Health,  to  support  collabo-
rative  research  projects  between  U.S.  scientists  and  their  counterparts  in  Eurasia.
CRDF’s premier university initiative, the Basic Research and Higher Education Pro-
gram, leverages funding from the John D. and Catherine T. MacArthur Foundation,
the  Carnegie  Corporation  of  New  York,  the  Russian  Ministry  of  Education  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

Science  and  regional  governments  in  Russia  to  support  twenty  Research  and  Edu-
cation Centers at Russian universities.

Another  strength  of  CRDF  is  its  ability  to  quickly  engage  specialized  expertise  for
program  design  and  implementation.  CRDF  has  developed  a  network  of  more  than
40,000 scientists and engineers who conduct merit review of proposals submitted to
CRDF;  participate  in  review  panels  or  site  visit  teams;  advise  CRDF  on  program
design  and  implementation;  and  provide  specialized  expertise.  CRDF  works  closely
with key U.S. science and engineering organizations and societies to ensure that we
tap  the  best  expertise  for  existing  or  new  programs.  We  have  also  partnered  with
the  Arab  Science  and  Technology  Foundation  in  the  United  Arab  Emirates  (UAE)
on  workshops  and  other  programs  to  promote  science  collaboration  between  U.S.
and Arab scientists. CRDF has formed partnerships with the King Abdullah Univer-
sity  of  Science  and  Technology  (KAUST)  and  the  Qatar  National  Research  Founda-
tion  (QNRF)  to  provide  CRDF’s  expertise  in  implementing  science  and  technology
cooperative  programs,  building  organizational  capacity  in  information  technology,
database administration, peer review and grant administration support.

As  an  NGO  with  on-the-ground  support  offices  in  Russia,  Ukraine,  Kazakhstan,
and  soon  in  Azerbaijan,  CRDF  has  the  staff  expertise  and  resources  to  offer  flexible
solutions to meet customer needs. For example, our Russian office staff has provided
support to the National Science Foundation’s Arctic programs division in the imple-
mentation  of  their  programs  with  the  Russian  Federation,  working  with  Russian
government agencies and research institutes to coordinate work in the Arctic region.
Through our GAP program, CRDF has assisted over 200 organizations who work in
the  FSU  to  implement  more  than  1,200  projects  by  providing  flexible  and  account-
able project management services.

As an NGO, CRDF offers potential partners overseas a U.S. counterpart that is not
part of the U.S. Government. Because CRDF is a non-governmental, non-profit orga-
nization,  it  is  often  seen  as  a  neutral  partner  in  developing  program  initiatives  be-
tween  the  US  and  its  foreign  counterparts.  CRDF  has  been  able  to  fulfill  this  role
while  maintaining  U.S.  policy  objectives.  Moreover,  CRDF  can  invest  the  time  and
resources needed to build the relationships and trust that are so necessary to engag-
ing  foreign  scientific  communities  in  new  programs  of  cooperation  with  the  United
States.

As an NGO, CRDF’s mission is broad. This breadth enables CRDF to offer a wide
range  of  program  implementation  strategies  for  multiple  customers.  As  of  July  1,
2008, CRDF is implementing over 20 programs for more than thirteen sponsors and
customers. In addition, our GAP program currently is implementing 350 projects for
over  100  customers.  Other  organizations,  including  U.S.  Government  agencies  and
non-governmental entities, are supporting activities related to one or more of CRDF
mission  objectives.  However,  CRDF  is  unique  in  its  combination  of  mission  objec-
tives and capability to implement across a wide range of issues and countries.

Limitations as an NGO

While  CRDF  has  achieved  remarkable  success  in  its  twelve  years  of  operation,  its
forward  progress  is  constrained  by  the  absence  of  multi-year  funding.  CRDF  was
originally  envisaged  as  an  endowed  foundation  that  would  operate  similar  to  the
foundations  that  the  U.S.  established  with  Israel.  That  endowment  did  not  mate-
rialize,  and  hence,  CRDF  must  constantly  seek  new  funding  for  all  of  its  program
activities and to maintain its core staff capabilities. In almost all cases, that funding
is secured on an annual basis, which limits the ability of CRDF to develop long-term
program  strategies  with  partners  overseas.  CRDF  also  needs  to  retain  some  flexi-
bility  in  designing  its  programs  as  needs  on  the  ground  can  evolve  over  time  and
out-pace the ability of governmental agencies to respond in a timely way.

Coordination with the USG

CRDF coordinates its work closely with the United States Government, which has
been the primary source of funds for CRDF program activities. For example, in 2007
federal  expenditures  accounted  for  over  $18  million,  out  of  almost  $25  million,  in
CRDF  activities.  The  federal  expenditures  include  funds  from  the  Departments  of
State,  Defense,  and  Energy,  the  National  Science  Foundation  and  the  National  In-
stitutes of Health. Overall, the largest single source of funds has been the State De-
partment’s  FREEDOM  Support  Act  funds,  which  have  declined  from  a  high  of  $15
million in 2002 to $5.7 million in fiscal year 2007, with further reductions expected
in fiscal year 2008.

As  CRDF’s  primary  funder,  the  Department  of  State  continues  to  request  CRDF
help  in  implementing  its  programs.  CRDF  works  closely  with  a  number  of  the  De-
partment’s  geographic  and  functional  bureaus  to  advance  international  science  col-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

laborations  on  behalf  of  the  Department.  However,  the  significant  decrease  in  FSA
funding has significantly impacted the type of programming and impact that CRDF
can  exert.  The  decline  in  FSA  funding  reduces  CRDF’s  ability  to  respond  quickly
to  new  opportunities  in  priority  countries  and  to  take  advantage  of  cost-sharing  of-
fers from foreign partners. CRDF has annually been included in the House and Sen-
ate  foreign  operations  appropriations  report,  and  in  recent  years  the  Congress  has
urged the Department of State to expand funding for CRDF from other accounts be-
yond the FSA.

CRDF works with a number of other U.S. Government agencies, helping them ad-
vance  their  global  research  interests.  For  example,  with  funding  from  NSF  supple-
mented  by  other  agencies,  CRDF  has  supported  over  1,000  collaborative  research
projects  between  U.S.  scientists  and  counterparts  in  Eurasia  and  Eastern  Europe.
The  projects  cover  multiple  disciplines,  such  as  biology,  chemistry,  physics,  engi-
neering, math, IT, and geology and are selected based on merit review. Additionally,
on  behalf  of  NSF,  CRDF  manages  a  small  number  of  bilateral  programs  primarily
in Russia and Eurasia which include Arctic area research, fellowship and exchange
programs, and support for international conferences in various scientific disciplines.
NSF-funded CRDF programs have benefited from annual cost-sharing from the gov-
ernments of Russia and Ukraine.

With  funding  from  NIH,  CRDF  has  engaged  scientists  around  world  in  coopera-
tive research projects with U.S. partners to investigate high-priority topics in global
health, including: disease prevention, treatment, and surveillance; innovative cancer
diagnostic  methods;  and  new  approaches  to  HIV/AIDS,  tuberculosis,  and  hepatitis
C.  In  particular,  CRDF  manages  several  international  programs  in  public  health,
primarily  in  infectious  disease  prevention  and  monitoring,  centers  of  excellence  for
public  health  education,  and  in  research  on  HIV/AIDS.  CRDF’s  support  for  HIV/
AIDS  research  entered  a  new  phase  in  2008  with  the  HIV/AIDS  Research  Public
Health Centers of Excellence program. This program, jointly funded by the Russian
Ministry  of  Education  and  Science,  funds  two  U.S.–Russian  interdisciplinary  con-
sortia  to  apply  international  best  practices  to  HIV/AIDS  research  in  Russia.  The
centers  are  focusing  on  pressing  research  needs  in  Russia,  TB  co-infection  and  be-
havioral factors in HIV transmission, and providing a model for future interdiscipli-
nary  public  health  research  centers  in  HIV  and  other  global  health  threats,  such
as tuberculosis, heart disease, and substance abuse.

For  the  Department  of  Energy,  CRDF  has  provided  logistical  and  financial  sup-
port  for  a  number  of  engagement  programs  between  DOE  and  its  international
counterparts, primarily in Russia. Finally, for DOD through the Defense Threat Re-
duction  Agency  (DTRA),  CRDF  has  managed  science  engagement  programs  with  a
number  of  institutes  in  Eurasian  countries  that  have  had  biological  weapons  capa-
bilities  or  histories,  supervising  their  transition  to  civilian  applications,  research,
and commercialization.

CRDF  routinely  submits  proposals  for  work  to  U.S.  Government  agencies  and  if
selected, operate under a federal grant or contract. CRDF complies with all applica-
ble rules and regulations as a grantee/contractor and reports regularly to the spon-
soring  agency  on  the  progress  of  the  work.  CRDF  maintains  regular  contact  with
the  policy-making  community  and  Congress  to  keep  them  updated  on  the  progress
of  CRDF  work  and  new  opportunities  that  may  be  of  interest  to  government  spon-
sors.

THE FUTURE: HOW CAN THE USG WORK WITH NGOS AND THE U.S. SCI-
ENTIFIC  COMMUNITY  TO  PURSUE  FOREIGN  POLICY  GOALS
AND GLOBAL CHALLENGES?

The Time is Right

Never  has  CRDF’s  vision,  ‘‘international  peace  and  prosperity  through  inter-
national science collaboration,’’ been more relevant than it is today. The U.S. science
and  technology  enterprise  is  the  best  in  the  world.  U.S.  leadership  in  science  and
technology is recognized globally. According to the Gallup World Poll conducted over
six years and which covers 40 majority Muslim countries and 90 percent of the glob-
al  Muslim  population,  the  single  most  admired  aspect  of  the  West  among  Muslims
around the world is technology. When asked what the West can do to improve rela-
tions  with  the  Muslim  world,  the  most  frequent  response  after  the  resounding  call
for  the  West  to  respect  Islam,  is  for  the  Western  nations  to  help  Muslim  countries
with capacity building and technology transfer.1

1 Statement by Dalia Mogahed, Senior Analyst at Gallup and Executive Director of the Gallup
Center for Muslim Studies; author of the book ‘‘Who Speaks for Islam?: What a Billion Muslims
Really Think’’ (Gallup Press, March 2008).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

American scientists and engineers represent an incredibly valuable, but underuti-
lized,  resource  in  U.S.  foreign  policy.  With  adequate  support  and  incentives,  U.S.
scientists  and  engineers  can  reach  out  to  societies  around  the  world  and  apply
‘‘smart  power’’  through  international  science  and  technology  cooperation.  Secretary
of  Defense  Robert  Gates  and  others  have  argued  for  more  effective  use  of  U.S.
‘‘smart  power’’  to  invest  ‘‘in  the  global  good—providing  services  and  policies  that
people and governments want but cannot attain in the absence of American leader-
ship.’’ 2 We  need  to  engage  our  leaders  to  utilize  our  scientists  and  engineers  to
reach  out  to  counterparts  around  the  world  and  engage  in  long-term  science  and
technology  projects  that  find  collaborative  solutions  to  common  problems  in  health,
environment, energy and agriculture.

Today’s most vexing problems are global in nature and are not limited to the geo-
graphic  boundaries  of  any  one  country.  So,  too,  the  capability  to  solve  technical
problems  resides  around  the  world.  The  best  approach  to  solving  global  problems
is to involve global teams of scientists and engineers. By contributing to the solution
of these problems, the U.S. engenders gratitude and trust. By collaborating in their
solution, the U.S. builds capacity and hence leverages our efforts. Scientists and en-
gineers  tend  to  share  values  that  transcend  cultures,  thus  facilitating  more  rapid
trust  relations.  This  is  very  important  as  a  diplomatic  tool—to  reach  out  to  global
partners in ways that diplomats cannot. In many developing countries, the technical
leadership  is  tied  into  the  political  leadership  more  so  than  in  developed  countries.
This  too  can  be  an  important  avenue  to  encourage  sound  political  decision-making.

The U.S. Government’s Role

The  U.S.  Government  must  significantly  expand  its  support  for  international
science  and  technology  cooperation.  It  should  begin  by  articulating  a  clear  policy
statement  endorsing  international  cooperation  as  a  key  component  of  U.S.  foreign
policy  and  assistance,  national  and  economic  security,  and  a  priority  for  U.S.  re-
search  and  development  agencies.  The  White  House  should  increase  attention  to
international science and technology cooperation and reestablish a high-level, inter-
agency committee to coordinate U.S. Government efforts.

The  U.S.  Government  should  promote  an  environment  that  is  conducive  to  inter-
national science and technology by routinely reviewing policies and procedures that
affect  the  implementation  of  international  science  and  technology  cooperation.  The
appropriate  U.S.  Government  agencies  should  work  to  reduce  barriers  to  coopera-
tion, such as the difficulty of obtaining visas.

The  U.S.  Government  should  increase  the  resources  allocated  to  international
science  collaboration.  For  example,  international  program  offices  at  federal  R&D
agencies  should  be  allocated  additional  resources  to  explore  and  expand  inter-
national cooperation. Seed funding should be made available for ‘‘start-up’’ activities
under the intergovernmental science and technology agreements that the U.S. signs
with foreign counterparts. These agreements are often signed with great fanfare but
do  not  live  up  to  expectations,  particularly  for  our  foreign  counterparts,  because
there  generally  is  no  funding  to  pursue  concrete  activities.  U.S.  foreign  assistance
programs  should  increase  their  attention  to  science  and  technology  for  capacity
building overseas.

The U.S. Government should increase its partnerships with non-governmental or-
ganizations to initiate and implement international science and technology coopera-
tion. NGOs offer the speed, flexibility and responsiveness needed to pursue new op-
portunities and to execute constantly evolving policy and programmatic priorities of
U.S.  Government  agencies.  NGOs  have  the  ability  to  get  ‘‘on-the-ground’’  quickly
and  develop  the  relationships  and  trust  needed  to  initiate  new  partnerships,  often
in  difficult  circumstances.  At  the  same  time,  NGOs  are  able  to  work  with  trans-
parency,  openness  and  accountability  overseas,  and  to  foster  the  same  in  our  part-
ners.

Catalyzing a New Global Initiative

Most importantly, the U.S. Government should launch a strategic, new global ini-
tiative  to  catalyze,  broker,  amplify  and  scale  up  science  and  technology  cooperation
for  the  benefit  of  the  United  States  and  its  partners  around  the  world.  This  new
initiative should be a global public-private partnership with the U.S. taking the lead

2 Center  for  Strategic  and  International  Studies  (CSIS),  ‘‘Implementing  Smart  Power:  Setting
an  Agenda  for  National  Security  Reform,’’  a  statement  by  Richard  L.  Armitage,  President,
Armitage  International,  and  Dr.  Joseph  S.  Nye,  Jr.,  Distinguished  Service  Professor,  Kennedy
School  of  Government,  Harvard  University,  before  the  Senate  Foreign  Relations  Committee,
April 24, 2008.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

in challenging other governments and private donors to match the U.S. contribution.
Patterned after other public-private partnerships, such as the Global Fund to Fight
AIDS, Tuberculosis and Malaria, this new global science initiative would engage sci-
entists  internationally  to  encourage  critical  scientific  and  technical  advances  that
address  global  challenges  including  infectious  disease,  food  security,  energy  alter-
natives  and  vanishing  ecosystems;  to  reach  young  scientists  and  support  a  robust
research  and  educational  infrastructure;  and  to  build  mutually  beneficial  economic
partnerships.  It  would  facilitate  greatly  expanded  international  science  and  tech-
nology cooperation as well as enhance institutional capacity in the developing world.
Nations with a strong, stable science and technology base are better participants in
the  global  economy,  develop  indigenous  solutions  to  national  problems,  and  con-
tribute to ongoing international collaborative efforts.

CRDF as a Global Partner for the Future

With over a decade of strong support from both public and private donors, CRDF
has  developed  a  potent  and  unique  capability  to  implement  international  science
and  technology  cooperation.  CRDF’s  many  successes  validate  the  vision  that  the
leadership  of  this  Science  Committee  articulated  in  1992.  CRDF  has  demonstrated
that  Congressman  Brown  was  right  when  he  argued  for  the  creation  of  a  non-gov-
ernmental organization to help achieve U.S. foreign and national security policy ob-
jectives through international science and technology cooperation that benefits both
the United States and its partners overseas.

The  global  environment  in  which  CRDF  operates  has  changed  dramatically  since
CRDF began in 1992. New opportunities to collaborate in science and technology are
emerging rapidly as countries focus attention on building knowledge-based societies.
The  demand  for  science-based  solutions  to  complex  global  challenges  in  health,  en-
ergy, agriculture, economic well-being and security is high. Meeting such challenges
requires  international  science  and  technology  collaboration  that  brings  together  the
best  minds  and  innovative  approaches  to  find  mutually  beneficial  solutions.  It  is  in
the  U.S.  interest  to  encourage  such  collaboration.  CRDF  also  sees  many  opportuni-
ties to continue its record of success in other regions where science cooperation can
make  a  positive  contribution  to  U.S.  policy,  especially  in  the  Middle  East  and  in
South Asia.

CRDF  will  continue  to  work  in  partnership  with  the  U.S.  Government,  foreign
partners  and  other  NGOs  to  develop  international  science  and  technology  coopera-
tion  that  builds  on  CRDF  proven  models  and  addresses  high  priority  opportunities
or  needs.  For  example,  through  its  higher  education  and  research  initiative,  CRDF
will work to establish and integrate scientific research more effectively into univer-
sity programs overseas and to develop opportunities to engage foreign students and
young  researchers—the  next  generation  of  scientists—into  productive,  long-lasting
collaborations with the U.S. partners.

CRDF  will  continue  to  develop  program  initiatives  to  engage  scientists  and  engi-
neers in the Middle East and other Muslim countries in collaborations that generate
new  knowledge,  apply  research  to  address  priority  needs  in  health,  agriculture,
water and energy; and build capacity for education, research and economic develop-
ment  through  science  and  technology.  A  high  priority  will  be  collaborative  research
programs  that  encourage  U.S.  scientists  to  identify  and  partner  with  foreign  sci-
entists  on  mutually  beneficial,  competitively  selected  projects.  Together,  these  joint
research  teams  can  address  common  problems  while  developing  long-lasting  rela-
tionships of trust and collaboration.

CRDF will continue to work with new science and technology institutions overseas
to  develop  mechanisms  and  procedures  that  promote  merit-based  selection  of
projects and opportunities for collaboration with U.S. scientists. Building on its suc-
cessful experience managing the Iraqi Virtual Science Library, CRDF will work with
others  to  help  bring  this  type  of  digital  library  resource  to  other  countries.  A  num-
ber of countries have expressed a desire for CRDF’s assistance to partner with them
on  creating  and  maintaining  access  to  scientific  literature,  research  databases,  and
other similar tools. These activities stimulate collaborative research, allow access by
scientists  to  a  wider  community  of  scholars,  and  ultimately  contribute  to  a  more
open  flow  of  information.  CRDF  sees  a  major  opportunity  for  positive  public  diplo-
macy  in  stimulating  and  funding  such  programs  to  broaden  access  to  scientific
knowledge and norms as practiced in the U.S. research community.

CRDF  will  continue  to  pursue  collaborative  approaches  to  address  global  energy
issues. This fall, CRDF will begin a new initiative in climate change research. With
cost-shares  from  CRDF’s  international  partners,  CRDF  will  support  international
teams  researching  ways  to  measure  and  reduce  the  impacts  of  this  global  problem
from a variety of scientific disciplines, including biology, chemistry, physics, geology,
and  engineering.  This  builds  upon  CRDF’s  track  record  of  supporting  international

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

collaborative  projects  that  have  studied  solar  energy,  improved  the  potential  and
marketability  of  fuel  cells,  and  explored  sustainable  energy.  U.S.  industry  partners
on these projects have included Shell, ConocoPhillips and GE. As an example, CRDF
supported  researchers  from  Armenia  and  the  California  Department  of  Water  Re-
sources  to  evaluate  the  energy  capacity  and  wood  yield  potential  of  fast-growing
poplar trees as a promising source of power and as a remedy for some of Armenia’s
heavily deforested regions.

CRDF’s work in addressing energy-related issues was noted by the Ranking Mem-
ber  of  the  Senate  Energy  and  Natural  Resources  Committee,  Senator  Pete  Domen-
ici,  in  his  remarks  regarding  CRDF’s  ten  year  anniversary:  ‘‘The  Civilian  Research
& Development Foundation has amassed a very solid record of helping the U.S. Gov-
ernment  achieve  its  foreign  and  national  security  policy  agendas.  By  using  science
collaborations to advance peace and sustainable prosperity, we can best address the
complex  energy  challenges  that  we  face  globally  by  uniting  the  talents  of  all  the
world’s  brightest  minds.  CRDF  is  uniquely  positioned  to  help  enable  these  inter-
national collaborations that will benefit all of us in the energy field and elsewhere.’’
In  conclusion,  CRDF’s  unique  expertise  and  track  record  have  been  tested  with
great  success  in  the  countries  of  the  former  Soviet  Union.  They  are  now  being  ex-
panded slowly into other countries and regions. CRDF is working hard to help make
the  case  for  expanded  partnerships  to  advance  science  for  diplomacy  and  security.
In partnership with AAAS, the NAS, Brookings, and others, CRDF is working hard
to  help  raise  awareness  regarding  science  for  diplomacy.  We  commend  this  com-
mittee for taking the lead here on Capitol Hill and we look forward to working with
you  and  our  partners  here  and  in  the  government  to  make  this  dream  that  George
Brown had a global reality.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

BIOGRAPHY FOR WILLIAM A. WULF

Education:
B.S.—Engineering Physics, University of Illinois, 1961
M.S.—Electrical Engineering, University of Illinois, 1963
Ph.D.—Computer Science, University of Virginia, 1968

Descriptive Biography:

Dr.  Wulf  is  a  University  Professor  and  the  AT&T  Professor  of  Engineering  and
Applied Science at the University of Virginia. Among his activities at the University
were  a  complete  revision  of  the  undergraduate  Computer  Science  curriculum,  re-
search  on  computer  architecture  and  computer  security,  and  an  effort  to  assist  hu-
manities scholars exploit information technology.

Dr.  Wulf  was  on  leave  from  the  University  from  mid  1996  to  mid  2007  to  serve
as  President  of  the  National  Academy  of  Engineering.  Together  with  the  National
Academy  of  Sciences,  the  NAE  operates  under  a  congressional  charter  and  presi-
dential executive orders that call on it to provide advice to the government on issues
of science and engineering.

In  1988–90  Dr.  Wulf  was  on  leave  from  the  University  to  be  Assistant  Director
of the National Science Foundation (NSF) where he headed the Directorate for Com-
puter  and  Information  Science  and  Engineering  (CISE).  CISE  was  responsible  for
computer  science  and  engineering  research  as  well  as  for  operating  the  National
Supercomputer  Centers  and  NSFNET  (the  precursor  to  today’s  Internet).  While  at
NSF,  Dr.  Wulf  was  deeply  involved  in  the  development  of  the  High  Performance
Computing  and  Communication  Initiative  and  in  the  formative  discussions  of  the
National Information Infrastructure.

Prior  to  joining  Virginia,  Dr.  Wulf  founded  Tartan  Laboratories,  a  software  com-
pany,  and  served  as  its  Chairman  and  Chief  Executive  Officer.  Before  returning  to
academe,  Dr.  Wulf  grew  the  company  to  about  a  hundred  employees.  Tartan  devel-
oped and marketed optimizing compilers, notably for Ada. Tartan was sold to Texas
Instruments in 1995.

The technical basis for Tartan was research by Dr. Wulf while he was a Professor
of  Computer  Science  at  Carnegie-Mellon  University,  where  he  was  Acting  Head  of
the  Department  from  1978–1979.  At  Carnegie-Mellon  Dr.  Wulf’s  research  spanned
programming  systems  and  computer  architecture;  specific  research  activities  in-
cluded:  the  design  and  implementation  of  a  systems-implementation  language
(Bliss),  architectural  design  of  the  DEC  PDP–11,  the  design  and  construction  of  a
16  processor  multiprocessor  and  its  operating  system,  a  new  approach  to  computer
security,  and  development  of  a  technology  for  the  construction  of  high  quality  opti-
mizing compilers. Dr. Wulf also actively participated in the development of Ada, the
common DOD programming language for embedded computer applications.

While at Carnegie-Mellon and Tartan, Dr. Wulf was active in the ‘‘high tech’’ com-
munity in Pittsburgh. He helped found the Pittsburgh High Technology Council and
served  as  Vice  President  and  Director  from  its  creation.  He  also  helped  found  the
CEO  Network,  the  CEO  Venture  Fund,  and  served  as  an  advisor  to  the  Western
Pennsylvania Advanced Technology Center. In 1983 he was awarded the Enterprise
‘‘Man of the Year’’ Award for these and other activities.

Consulting:

Stellar  Computer,  Pyramid  Computer,  Prime  Computer,  Westinghouse  Research
and  Development,  United  Nations  Development  Program,  IBM,  Digital  Equipment
Corporation, Intel Corporation, Intermetrics Inc., North Electric Company, Cii Hon-
eywell-Bull, Computer Networks Inc., NCR, Univac, and others.

Administrative Experience:
President, National Academy of Engineering, 1996–2007.
Assistant Director, National Science Foundation, 1988–90.
Chairman & CEO, Tartan Laboratories Incorporated, 1981–1987.
Acting  Head,  Department  of  Computer  Science,  Carnegie-Mellon  University,  1978–

1979.

Selected Professional Activities:
Member, National Academy of Engineering
Member, American Philosophical Society

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

Fellow, American Academy of Arts and Sciences
Foreign Fellow, Australian Academy of Science, Technology and Engineering
Foreign Member, Russian Academy of Sciences
Foreign Member of the Chinese Academy of Engineering
Foreign Member, Engineering Academy of Japan
Honorary Member, Academy of Technical Sciences of Romania
Corresponding Member, Royal Spanish Academy of Engineering
Member, Academy Bibliotheca Alexandrina (Library of Alexandria)
Foreign Corresponding Member, National Academy of Engineering of Venezuela
D. Sc. (Hon.) Carnegie Mellon University
D. Sc. (Hon) U. Connecticut
D. Engr. (Hon) Colorado School of Mines
D. Engr. (Hon) Polytechnic University
D. Engr. (Hon) Missouri University of Science and Technology
Distinguished Service Medal, U. Pennsylvania
Kenneth Andrew Roe Award, ASEE
Ralph Coats Roe Award, ASME
Distinguished Career in Science Award, Washington Academy of Sciences
Associate Editor, Acta Informatica
Reviewing Editor, Science, 1992–96
Chairman,  Computer  Science  and  Telecommunications  Board,  National  Research

Council, 1991–6

Member, Council of the ACM, 1991–98
Director, Computing Research Association, 1988–92
Member, Board of Visitors, Software Engineering Institute, 1987–93
Editorial Board, Addison-Wesley/SEI Series on Software Engineering
Member, Air Force Science Advisory Board, 1989–91
Director, Baker Engineers (a public Engineering firm), 1984–97
Director, Charles Starke Draper Laboratory, 1998–2006
Director, National Action Council for Minorities in Engineering, 1997–2007
Director,  Anita  Borg  Institute  for  Women  and  Technology,  1999–(Chair  beginning

7/1/08)

Trustee, Library of Alexandria (Egypt), 2001–2007
Member, Eta Kappa Nu (EE Honary Society)
Member, NSF Engineering Advisory Committee, 2007–present
Member, Purdue School of Engineering Advisory Board, 2007–present
Vice-Chair, Olin College President’s Advisory Committee, 2007–present
Director, Civilian Research and Development Foundation, 2008–present
Director, MASDR Institute (Abu Dhabi), 2007–present

Professional Society Memberships:
Association for Computing Machinery, ACM (Fellow)
Institute of Electrical and Electronic Engineers, IEEE (Fellow)
American Association for the Advancement of Science, AAAS (Fellow)
American Society of Mechanical Engineers
Sigma-Xi
Association for Women in Science (Fellow)
International Engineering Council (Fellow)

Patents:
U.S.  Patent  No.  4,819,155  ‘‘Apparatus  for  Reading  and  Writing  From  Memory
Streams  of  Data  While  Concurrently  Executing  a  Plurality  of  Data  Processing
Operations’’

U.S.  Patent  No.  6,154,826  ‘‘Method  and  Device  for  Maximizing  Memory  System

Bandwidth by Accessing Data in an Dynamically Determined Order’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

Selected Publications:
Books
Wulf,  W.A.,  Levin,  R.,  and  Harbison,  S.P.,  ‘‘Hydra/C.mmp:  An  Experimental  Com-

puter System.’’ McGraw-Hill Publishing Co., 1980.

Wulf,  W.A.,  Shaw,  M.,  Hilfinger,  P.M.,  and  Flon,  L.,  ‘‘Fundamental  Structures  of

Computer Science.’’ Addison-Wesley, 1980.

Wulf,  W.A.,  Johnson,  R.,  Weinstock,  C.,  Hobbs,  S.,  and  Geschke,  C.,  ‘‘The  Design  of
an  Optimizing  Compiler.’’  American  Elsevier  Publishing  Company,  Inc.,  New
York, 1975.

Journal and Conference Publications
Bell,  C.  Gordon,  Cady,  R.,  McFarland,  H.,  Delagi,  B.,  O’Laughlin,  J.,  Noonan,  R.,
and Wulf, W.A., ‘‘A New Architecture for Mini-Computers—The DEC PDP–11,’’
AFIPS Conference Proceedings, AFIPS, pp 657–675, 1970.

Wulf, W.A., Habermann, A.N., and Russell, D., ‘‘Bliss: A Language for Systems Pro-
gramming,’’  Communications  of  the  Association  of  Computing  Machinery,  De-
cember 1972.

Wulf,  W.A.,  and  Bell,  C.G.,  ‘‘C.mmp:  A  Multi-Mini  Processor,’’  Proceedings  of  the

FJCC, November 1972.

Wulf,  W.A.,  et.  al.,  ‘‘Hydra—The  Kernel  of  a  Multiprocessor  Operating  System,’’

Communications of the ACM, June 1974.

Wulf, W.A., London, R., and Shaw, M., ‘‘Abstraction and Verification in Alphard: In-
troduction  to  Language  and  Methodology,’’  IEEE  Transactions  on  Software  En-
gineering, December 1976.

Wulf,  W.  Knight,  J.,  and  Prey  J.,  ‘‘Undergraduate  Computer  Science  Education:  A

New Curriculum Philosophy And Overview,’’ ACMCSE conference, Mar. 94.

Grimshaw, A., and Wulf, W., ‘‘The Legion Vision of a Worldwide Virtual Computer,’’

Communications of the ACM, Jan. 1997, Vol. 40, No. 1.

McKee,  Sally,  Wulf,  Wm.  A.,  et.  al.,  ‘‘Smarter  Memory:  Improving  Bandwidth  for

Streamed References,’’ IEEE Computer, Vol. 31, No. 7, July 1998.

Chenxi  Wang,  William  Wulf,  ‘‘A  Distributed  Key  Generation  Technique  for  Public
Key  Infrastructures,’’  Netnomics,  Vol.  2  (2000),  pp.  265–278.  Baltzer  Science
Publishers. The Netherlands.
Chairman BAIRD. Thank you. Dr. Calvin.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  JAMES  A.  CALVIN,  INTERIM  VICE  PRESI-
DENT  FOR  RESEARCH;  PROFESSOR  OF  STATISTICS,  TEXAS
A&M UNIVERSITY
Dr.  CALVIN.  Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and
Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  am  honored  to  be  able  to  rep-
resent Texas A&M University and testify about the role of non-gov-
ernmental organizations and universities.

Texas  A&M  has  a  long  history  of  supporting  the  three-fold  mis-
sion  of  research,  teaching,  and  public  service  and  globalization  of
research  and  education  is  a  natural  extension  of  this  traditional
mission.  Through  globalization,  Texas  A&M  has  been  able  to
produce  graduates  that  are  better  prepared  to  compete  within  the
global marketplace, recruit top-level faculty, and leverage local and
national  research  support  while  at  the  same  time  further  devel-
oping a positive international reputation.

To  support  these  numerous  international  exchanges  at  Texas
A&M, we have over 130 active international Memoranda of Under-
standing  and  are  currently  in  the  process  of  formalizing  nearly  30
additional  MOAs.  Of  note  is  our  branch  campus  in  Doha,  Qatar,
where  we  offer  four  undergraduate  engineering  degrees  with  grad-
uate programs soon to be established. This campus is supported by
the Qatar Foundation, and so no taxpayer or tuition money is used

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

to  support  this  effort.  Significantly,  the  curriculum  requirements
are  the  same  as  in  College  Station.  Thus,  undergraduate  students
must complete six hours in American history and six hours in polit-
ical science in order to graduate.

The workplace and the scientific landscape have become increas-
ingly global. No country can maintain a monopoly on scientific dis-
coveries or on a trained work force. Thus, it is incumbent upon uni-
versities such as Texas A&M to engage this global environment so
that we can lead instead of follow.

Employers  of  our  graduates  tell  us  that  they  want  employees
with global perspective. Providing international experiences to over
46,000  students  is  difficult  if  we  limit  ourselves  to  only  sending
students to foreign locations. Having more than 4,000 international
students  on  our  main  campus  allows  Texas  A&M  a  significant  op-
portunity  to  create  global  experiences  for  a  broad  set  of  our  stu-
dents within the College Station environment.

A  unique  example  of  this  involves  the  current  president  of  Pan-
ama  and  a  former  student  of  Texas  A&M.  As  a  result  of  the  Pan-
amanian President’s experience, he has promoted increased student
and faculty exchanges with Texas A&M as a mechanism to help in-
crease competitiveness of Panamanian universities.

Scientific  discoveries  come  from  all  over  the  globe.  In  many
cases, these efforts are most effective if they involve global collabo-
ration.  Although  we  have  relationships  around  the  world,  we  have
chosen  to  focus  particular  emphasis  on  three  regions,  the  Middle
East, Asia, and Latin America. Here are some selected examples of
such  partnerships  and  their  benefits.  We  have  an  agreement  with
Mexico’s  National  Council  of  Science  and  Technology,  or
CONACYT, which is their equivalent of our National Science Foun-
dation,  that  was  formally  established  in  2002.  Texas  A&M  and
CONACYT have invested over $2.2 million in 93 new collaborative
research  teams  involving  investigators  from  both  Texas  A&M  and
Mexico. In fact, the partnerships are only funded if they are equal-
ly  supported  by  both  Texas  A&M  and  Mexican  researchers,  and
they cover topics of interest to both Mexico and the United States,
from  Cross-Border  Land  and  Water-Use  Changes  to  Diabetes  and
Cardiovascular  Disease  to  Electric  Energy  by  Alternative  Renew-
able Resources.

Texas  A&M,  the  George  Bush  Presidential  Library  Foundation,
and  the  Chinese  People’s  Association  for  Friendship  with  Foreign
Countries  have  hosted  three  China–U.S.  Relations  Conferences
that  have  helped  expand  academic  and  business  opportunities  and
strengthen one of our most important global relationships. Through
this  conference,  Texas  A&M  is  helping  to  promote  continued  dia-
logue,  at  all  levels,  and  encourage  the  development  of  strong  part-
nerships in areas of joint interest.

Our campus in Qatar provides us with a remarkable opportunity
to provide help in producing an increased engineering workforce in
the  Middle  East  while  simultaneously  providing  research  opportu-
nities to work on problems of global interest. During this past year,
Texas  A&M  University  Qatar  faculty  received  grants  from  the
Qatar National Research Foundation for approximately $12 million
to pursue research topics in engineering, the physical sciences, and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

mathematics,  all  on  topics  that  are  of  equal  interest  to  Texas  and
the United States.

Our  new  Institute  for  Applied  Mathematics  and  Computational
Science  is  a  partnership  with  the  King  Abdullah  University  of
Science  and  Technology,  or  KAUST,  located  in  Saudi  Arabia.
Through this $20 million effort funded by KAUST, Texas A&M fac-
ulty  will  be  working  on  problems  that  are  of  fundamental  impor-
tance  while  simultaneously  helping  to  establish  a  new  higher  edu-
cation  institution  built  on  the  western  educational  model.  The  in-
stitute  is  part  of  a  global  research  alliance  that  currently  includes
only  three  other  centers  located  at  Stanford,  Cornell,  and  Oxford.
Finally,  Norman  E.  Borlaug,  winner  of  the  Nobel  Peace  Prize,
Presidential Medal of Freedom, and the Congressional Gold Medal,
is  a  Distinguished  Professor  of  International  Agriculture  at  Texas
A&M.  The  Borlaug  Institute  is  assisting  other  nations  to  combat
world hunger through technical innovation, training of agricultural
scientists  and  workers,  and  intellectual  leadership.  There  are  cur-
rently  15  Texas  A&M  personnel  serving  throughout  Iraq  working
in cooperation with USAID, USDA, and DOD.

In addition to what was said previously, there are three areas of
interest  that  I  think  are  quite  significant  in  the  way  that  univer-
sities can support the efforts of Texas A&M and all universities.

The  first,  as  has  been  mentioned  before,  is  the  visa  process.
While national security issues are clearly a high priority, efforts to
enhance appropriate international intellectual changes still need to
be encouraged. An important way the Federal Government can pro-
vide  unique  support  is  through  the  development  of  new  programs
that effectively provide joint funding for international collaboration.
Many  partnerships  can  be  initiated  through  a  number  of  local  ca-
pabilities,  but  to  move  the  successful  ones  to  the  next  level  of
progress,  we  really  need  funding  that  is  able  to  provide  resources
as was previously mentioned to partnerships regardless of their lo-
cation.

This  includes  support  for  American  students  wishing  to  study
abroad as well as the international research efforts that I have dis-
cussed. And if these resources can be made available, the funds for
the international research efforts should be committed for the long-
term  so  investigators  can  make  the  commitment  required  to  make
important  advances  in  these  new  programs  and  so  that  our  inter-
national collaborators know that they can depend upon our partici-
pation  as  they  develop  and  commit  their  share  to  such  a  funding
model.

And  finally,  we  believe  it  is  important  that  as  we  begin  these
new  initiatives,  scientific  peer  review  is  a  driving  force  behind  the
allocation of resources. It is through the competitive processes that
we  have  developed  as  a  country  that  the  best  science  can  be  per-
formed and given into the most effective hands.

Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Calvin follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES A. CALVIN

Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  my
name  is  James  Calvin,  and  I  am  the  Interim  Vice  President  for  Research  at  Texas
A&M  University.  Good  morning  and  thank  you  for  including  me  in  this  prestigious
list of speakers. I am honored to be representing universities in testifying about the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

role of non-governmental organizations and universities in international science and
technology cooperation.

Background

As one of the select few universities with the land-, sea- and space-grant designa-
tions,  Texas  A&M  has  a  long  history  of  supporting  the  three-fold  mission  of  re-
search,  teaching,  and  public  service  at  a  research  intensive  university.  The
globalization and diversification of research and education is a natural extension of
this  traditional  mission  and  is  in  fact  one  of  the  University’s  key  imperatives  out-
lined  in  Vision  2020,  the  University’s  effort  to  attain  consensus  top-ten  status
among  public  universities  by  the  year  2020.  Through  its  globalization  and  diver-
sification  efforts,  Texas  A&M  is  able  to  provide  a  more  well-rounded  education  for
our students, ensure that our faculty have the ability to engage in collaborative re-
search with the leading researchers throughout the world, and promote Texas A&M
as a research hub that encourages the best and the brightest from around the world
to  pursue  their  education  within  the  United  States.  The  result  of  these  efforts  is
that  Texas  A&M  has  been  able  to  produce  graduates  that  are  better  prepared  to
compete within the global marketplace, recruit top-level faculty members, and lever-
age  local  and  national  research  support  through  international  partnerships  as  well
as further developing a positive international reputation.

Demographics

Texas  A&M  has  a  student  population  of  46,542  (37,357  undergraduate  and  9,185
graduate  students)  studying  in  over  250  degree  programs  in  10  colleges.  Among
these  students,  we  have  4,025  international  students  from  124  countries.  While  a
great number of these students come from Mexico, China, Taiwan, South Korea, and
India,  we  also  have  students  from  Bhutan,  Croatia,  Eritrea,  Macao,  Yemen,  and
Togo.

During  this  academic  year,  Texas  A&M  hosted  577  foreign  faculty  scholars,  rep-
resenting  74  countries.  Many  of  the  faculty  come  to  Texas  A&M  as  a  result  of  the
relationships  established  through  formal  Memoranda  of  Agreement  (MOA),  while
others  visit  our  campus  as  a  result  of  personal  relationships  with  Texas  A&M  fac-
ulty  established  through  usual  scientific  exchanges.  Today,  we  have  132  active
MOAs  with  universities  and  research  institutions  in  45  countries.  We  are  also  cur-
rently in the process of formalizing nearly 30 additional MOAs.

Texas  A&M  operates  a  branch  campus  in  Doha,  Qatar  offering  four  under-
graduate  engineering  degrees  in  Chemical,  Electrical,  Mechanical  and  Petroleum
Engineering.  In  addition,  research  and  graduate  programs  will  soon  be  established
at  the  Qatar  campus.  This  campus  is  supported  by  private  funding,  as  the  Qatar
Foundation  underwrites  our  efforts  in  Doha.  No  taxpayer  or  tuition  money  is  used
to  support  this  effort.  When  offering  a  degree  from  Texas  A&M,  either  in  College
Station or in Doha, the curriculum requirements are the same. Thus, undergraduate
students  must  complete  six  hours  in  American  history  and  six  hours  in  political
science.

We  also  maintain  two  overseas  centers  in  Italy  and  in  Mexico  City  and  are  cur-
rently establishing a third center in Costa Rica. The University is also a part of the
network  of  27  federally  funded  national  centers  for  International  Business  Edu-
cation  and  Research,  maintains  an  Office  for  Latin  American  Programs  and  an  In-
stitute for Pacific Asia and has received funding from the European Commission to
establish one of the 10 European Union Centers of Excellence in the United States.
Although  Texas  A&M  has  research  and  educational  relationships  all  over  the
world  as  well  as  the  physical  presences  in  Mexico,  Italy,  Qatar  and  Costa  Rica,  we
have  chosen  to  focus  particular  emphasis  on  three  regions:  the  Middle  East,  Asia,
and Latin America.

Role  and  benefit  to  Texas  A&M  of  participating  in  international  research

and education cooperation

The  workplace  and  the  scientific  landscape  have  become  increasingly  global.  No
country  can  maintain  a  monopoly  on  scientific  discoveries  or  on  a  trained  work
force.  Thus,  it  is  incumbent  upon  universities  such  as  Texas  A&M  to  engage  this
global environment so that we can lead instead of follow. The value of globalization
can  be  seen  in  all  three  components  of  our  mission-research,  teaching  and  public
service.  Because  of  Texas  A&M’s  commitment  to  diversity  and  globalization  and  its
varied international initiatives, we have better prepared students, globally competi-
tive  research  programs,  and  a  long  history  of  giving  back  to  the  world  community.
Our graduates are better prepared, more rigorously trained and have a broader per-
spective  upon  which  to  draw  as  they  enter  the  marketplace.  Our  research  efforts

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

have  a  broader  impact  and  the  resources  that  can  be  used  for  research  are  lever-
aged.  The  area  where  impact  is  arguably  the  greatest,  but  the  least  mentioned,  is
within the realm of public service. By working on problems of bilateral or multi-lat-
eral interest, we can help to develop solutions to practical problems that can provide
immediate  impact  and  provide  an  avenue  for  economic  development.  All  of  this  al-
lows  Texas  A&M  to  provide  increased  capabilities  and  value  to  the  state  and  the
Nation,  while  simultaneously  helping  to  develop  strong  partnerships  with  our  key
regions of collaboration.

Our various study abroad programs and opportunities as well as our efforts at our
international  campuses  and  centers  in  Qatar,  Mexico,  Italy  and  our  emerging  cam-
pus in Costa Rica play vital roles in helping our students prepare for life after grad-
uation.  However,  providing  international  experiences  to  46,000-plus  students  is  an
inconceivable mission if we limit ourselves to only sending students to foreign loca-
tions.  Having  more  than  4,000  international  students  on  our  main  campus  allows
Texas A&M a significant opportunity to create global experiences for a broad set of
our  students  and  provides  experience  possibilities  that  do  not  require  students  to
be  able  to  afford  the  additional  cost  of  a  student  abroad  opportunity.  For  example,
the  Muller  International  Host  Program  (MIHP)  was  started  by  some  students  out
of  the  Academy  for  Future  International  Leaders  who  started  by  taking  inter-
national  students  home  for  holidays.  The  purpose  of  MIHP  is  to  provide  inter-
national  students  the  opportunity  to  interact  with  a  local  family  from  the  United
States. This allows students to gain a better understanding of U.S. cultures and val-
ues.  MIHP  also  provides  international  students  with  an  informal  atmosphere  in
which they can ask questions about U.S. customs, culture, and society. By acknowl-
edging  that  international  students  are  a  welcome  part  of  the  Texas  A&M  commu-
nity,  MIHP  deepens  the  relationship  between  international  students  and  the  Texas
A&M community. MIHP also increases international students’ knowledge of U.S. so-
cial  institutions,  promotes  a  better  understanding  of  issues  facing  the  international
community,  and  provides  international  students  a  reference  for  casual  U.S.  dining.
In exchange, the international students also have a chance to discuss their own cul-
tures  and  social  customs  and  bring  the  international  experience  home  to  their  host
families. Most importantly, MIHP lowers cultural barriers.

These  invaluable  educational  experiences  prepare  our  domestic  students  for  jobs
with multinational companies and the ability to perform under a wide variety of en-
vironments  and  with  a  diverse  workforce  and  potentially  diverse  clientele.  With  a
welcoming  and  nurturing  global  campus,  the  international  student  population,  in
turn,  learns  the  merits  and  perspectives  of  the  U.S.  educational  system  and  allows
Texas A&M to cultivate relationships with individuals who become influential lead-
ers back in their home countries. The current President of Panama is a former stu-
dent  of  Texas  A&M.  As  a  result  of  Panamanian  President  Martin  Torrijos  Espino’s
experiences  at  Texas  A&M,  he  has  promoted  formal  student  and  faculty  exchanges
with  Texas  A&M  as  a  mechanism  to  help  increase  the  competitiveness  of  Panama-
nian universities.

Many areas of national need, for example the STEM fields of Science, Technology,
Engineering  and  Mathematics,  have  a  shortage  of  students.  While  it  is  imperative
that  we  increase  the  number  of  U.S.  students  pursuing  training  in  these  areas,
international  students  also  provide  a  resource  that  can  help  drive  the  University’s
research agenda and provide trained graduates to meet the needs of U.S. employers.
It  is  important  to  recognize  that  in  addition  to  providing  needed  expertise  to  em-
ployers,  international  students  often  become  entrepreneurs  that  add  to  the  vitality
of the U.S. economy and provide employment for many U.S. citizens.

Scientific  discoveries  are  coming  from  all  over  the  globe.  In  addition,  many  sci-
entific  challenges,  such  as  effective  alternative  energy  supplies  and  new  break-
throughs  in  the  life  sciences  require  multi-disciplinary  teams.  In  many  cases,  these
efforts  are  most  effective  if  the  collaborations  involve  global  partnerships.  These
partnerships can also leverage the resources of a Texas A&M faculty member as the
global  partner  brings  resources  to  the  collaboration.  The  benefits  of  these  partner-
ships will be both scientific and economic.

Oversight  of  the  relationships  that  are  established  is  an  important  aspect  of  any
multi-institutional  partnership.  When  educational  experiences  of  our  students  are
involved, these mechanisms require additional effort. Each MOA that is signed must
go through a rigorous review process that ensures multiple institutional officials re-
view  the  agreement.  At  Texas  A&M  this  is  monitored  at  the  highest  levels.  In  the
case  of  our  branch  campuses,  we  maintain  on-sight  staff  that  is  charged  with  the
oversight of the student experiences. In the case of the Qatar campus, we maintain
a full academic administrative structure to ensure that the experiences students re-
ceive  replicate  the  ones  that  they  would  receive  if  they  were  on  the  main  campus.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Existing research and science education programs

44

As  was  mentioned  earlier,  we  maintain  a  large  number  of  international  relation-
ships that span a wide variety of disciplines and levels of engagement, from person-
to-person  relationships  to  major  institutional  commitments  to  international  con-
sortia.  A  long-standing  example  of  our  effective  partnerships  is  the  bilateral  agree-
ment  we  have  with  Mexico’s  National  Council  of  Science  and  Technology
(CONACYT).  Through  this  partnership  formally  established  in  2001,  Texas  A&M
and  CONACYT  have  invested  over  $2.2  million  in  collaborative  research  teams  in-
volving  investigators  from  both  Texas  A&M  and  Mexico.  The  93  projects  funded  so
far  through  this  program  have  established  new  collaborations,  provided  support  for
numerous students (from both Mexico and Texas A&M) and provided the seed fund-
ing  needed  to  initiate  collaborations  that  could  not  have  been  established  without
this  support.  The  topics  of  the  research  are  quite  varied  and  of  major  interest  to
both  Mexico  and  the  United  States,  from  Cross-Border  Land  and  Water-Use
Changes  to  Diabetes  and  Cardiovascular  Disease  among  Mexicans  and  Mexican
Americans to Electric Energy by Alternative Renewable Resources. Another example
of the benefits of this program is the team of researchers who are working a multi-
year  bovine  tuberculosis  project.  This  funding  not  only  allowed  the  research  team
from Texas A&M and from Mexico to look for a solution to a serious health problem
that  affects  both  animal  and  human  populations  along  the  U.S.–Mexico  border,  but
also  enabled  graduate  students  to  work  along  side  the  counterpart  investigators  in
a  meaningful  way.  As  can  be  seen,  this  partnership  is  leading  to  not  only  scientific
advances, but the potential for the outcomes to provide stimulus to the economic de-
velopment of the Texas–Mexico border.

Our campus in Education City in Doha, Qatar provides us with a remarkable op-
portunity to help provide an increased capacity to develop an engineering workforce
in  the  Middle  East  while  simultaneously  providing  research  opportunities  to  work
on problems of interest to Texas, as well. An important aspect of the efforts in Edu-
cation  City  is  that  this  is  a  co-educational  environment  that  promotes  men  and
women  learning  and  working  in  the  same  environment.  During  this  past  year,  fac-
ulty at Texas A&M–Qatar received grants from the Qatar National Research Foun-
dation  (QNRF)  for  approximately  $12  million  to  pursue  research  in  topics  in  engi-
neering,  the  physical  sciences,  and  mathematics.  In  addition,  our  engagement  in
Education  City  has  led  to  separate  research  opportunities  for  our  Colleges  of  Edu-
cation and Human Development and Liberal Arts.

The  College  of  Education  and  Human  Development  was  invited  to  collaborate
with  the  University  of  Qatar  to  set  standards  for  their  teacher  training  programs.
Qatari graduates from this joint program will be competent, motivated teachers pre-
pared to train students to achieve at the highest international standards.

In addition to traditional international research partnerships, Texas A&M is also
involved with three examples of novel cooperative relationships. Texas A&M Univer-
sity,  the  George  Bush  School  of  Government  and  Public  Service,  the  George  Bush
Presidential  Library  Foundation,  and  the  Chinese  People’s  Association  for  Friend-
ship  with  Foreign  Countries  have  hosted  three  China–U.S.  Relations  Conferences
that  have  helped  expand  academic  and  business  opportunities  and  strengthen  one
of  the  most  important  global  relationships.  As  has  been  noted  by  President  George
H.W.  Bush,  China  is  our  most  important  bilateral  relationship.  Through  this  con-
ference, Texas A&M is helping to promote continued dialogue, at all levels, and en-
courage  the  development  of  strong  partnerships  in  areas  of  joint  interest.  On  the
scientific  side,  this  biennial  conference  series  brings  together  scientists  from  the
United  States,  primarily  Texas  A&M  and  China,  to  identify  ways  to  work  on  prob-
lems  facing  both  countries.  A  recent  example  of  a  successful  collaboration  is  the
project comparing the Yangtze and Mississippi River basins related to global climate
variability and coastal ecosystem change.

Additionally,  Texas  A&M  has  received  a  significant  grant  from  the  U.S.  Depart-
ment  of  Defense  (DOD)  to  help  strengthen  the  ability  of  future  military  officers  in
language  and  cultural  competency.  The  grant,  part  of  the  2008  Reserve  Officer
Training Corps (ROTC) Language and Culture Project, is sponsored by the National
Security Education Program, on behalf of the Defense Language Office, and will be
used  to  create  on-campus  as  well  as  overseas  programs  to  enable  students  in  the
Corps  of  Cadets  to  gain  greater  exposure  to  the  Chinese  and  Arabic-speaking
worlds, as well as to create courses and other programs to improve language skills.
A  second  novel  partnership  is  our  new  Institute  for  Applied  Mathematics  and
Computational  Science  (IAMCS),  which  is  a  partnership  with  the  King  Abdullah
University  of  Science  and  Technology  (KAUST)  in  Saudi  Arabia.  Through  this  $20
million effort funded by KAUST, faculty at Texas A&M and its partner institutions
will be working on problems that are of global importance while simultaneously, like
Qatar,  helping  to  establish  a  new  higher  education  institution  built  on  the  western

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

educational  model.  IAMCS  is  part  of  a  global  research  alliance  that  includes  only
three  other  centers  at  Cornell  University,  Stanford  University,  and  Oxford  Univer-
sity. The research resulting from IAMCS will be open to peer review and published
in  the  highest  quality  journals.  We  will  develop  new  results  that  both  advance  the
disciplines within mathematical and computational sciences, but also work on recur-
ring  annual  themes,  such  as  Earth  science  and  material  science  to  help  solve  prob-
lems that will impact multinational audiences.

Finally, Norman E. Borlaug, winner of the 1970 Nobel Peace Prize, the 1977 Pres-
idential  Medal  of  Freedom,  and  the  2006  Congressional  Gold  Medal,  is  a  Distin-
guished Professor in International Agriculture at Texas A&M. As the largest center
for  agriculture  and  life  sciences  in  the  world,  Texas  A&M  Agriculture  is—by  virtue
of  mission  and  vision—uniquely  poised  for  a  new  era  of  global  leadership.  Texas
A&M’s Borlaug Institute is assisting other nations to combat world hunger through
technical innovation, training of agricultural scientists and workers, and intellectual
leadership.

Current  projects  related  to  Iraq  and  Afghanistan  include  a  $4  million  USAID
project  for  range  management  in  Afghanistan,  the  $6  million  USDA  IAER  program
to  improve  agricultural  extension  in  Iraq,  and  a  $10  million  USAID  subcontract  on
the  Inma  Agribusiness  program  to  build  agribusiness  in  Iraq.  The  Institute’s  work
began  in  Iraq  in  2003  with  crop  technology  demonstrations  and  extension  support
under  the  USAID  Agricultural  Reconstruction  and  Development  for  Iraq  (ARDI)
project  based  in  Baghdad  and  Erbil.  The  Institute  has  had  long-term  agricultural
specialists in Iraq from 2003 until the present.

Resulting from previous and current experience in Iraq, Texas A&M personnel are
acquainted  with  Iraqi  universities,  government  agencies,  industries,  businesses,  in-
frastructure,  leaders,  natural  resources  and  agricultural  production  technologies.
There  are  currently  15  Texas  A&M  personnel  serving  throughout  Iraq  working  in
cooperation  with  USAID,  USDA,  and  DOD.  We  are  engaged  in  private  sector  eco-
nomic  development,  collaboration  with  educational  institutions,  and  providing
science-based solutions for the rehabilitation of the Iraqi agricultural sector.

Federal interaction and support

While  the  visa  process  is  the  most  obvious  example  of  interaction  between  Texas
A&M and the Federal Government, we also actively engage federal sponsors and the
peer  reviewed  mechanism  to  obtain  funding  to  support  our  initiatives.  In  many
cases,  these  funds  are  then  leveraged  by  private  or  international  sources.  In  the
case  of  the  China–U.S.  Relations  Conferences,  we  have  actively  involved  cabinet
level officials or their representatives to provide keynote addresses.

In  looking  at  the  broad  perspective  of  global  collaboration,  one  way  the  Federal
Government  can  provide  unique  support  is  through  the  development  of  new  pro-
grams  that  effectively  provide  funding  for  international  collaboration.  At  this  time,
collaborations  can  be  initiated  through  a  variety  of  mechanisms,  such  as  our  part-
nership  with  CONACYT,  but  long-term  funding  for  the  most  promising  collabora-
tions  is  extremely  difficult  to  obtain.  In  most  cases,  such  success  involves  each  col-
laborator  searching  for  funding  independently  in  their  home  countries  and  hoping
that both can find funds during the same funding cycle. Given the current rigorous
competition  for  existing  research  funding,  it  appears  that  new  resources  would  be
required  for  such  a  program  so  that  existing  high  priority  initiatives  are  not  im-
pacted.

If  resources  can  be  made  available,  we  feel  that  the  funds  should  be  committed
for the long-term so that investigators can make the commitment required to make
important  advances  in  these  new  programs  and  so  that  our  international  collabo-
rators  know  that  they  can  depend  upon  our  participation  as  they  develop  and  com-
mit their share of such a funding model.

It would seem natural that prioritization of research programs would be necessary
to ensure sufficient resources to make an impact. A broad dialogue will be important
in  determining  what  these  priorities  are  and  ensuring  that  both  scientific  pre-
eminence  and  economic  impact  will  have  a  role  in  determining  the  topics  that  are
chosen.  It  is  important,  however,  that  the  scientific  peer  review  process  drive  the
allocation  of  the  resources  once  the  priorities  are  established  to  ensure  credibility
within the scientific community and the best possible science.

I thank the Committee for the important work they do for U.S. scientific research,

and specifically, their interest in this important topic.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

BIOGRAPHY FOR JAMES A. CALVIN

James A. Calvin earned his doctorate and Master’s of Science degrees in statistics
from  Colorado  State  University  in  1985  and  1980,  respectively.  Dr.  Calvin  received
his  Bachelor  of  Science  degree  in  computer  science  and  mathematics  from  the  Uni-
versity of Oregon in 1976. Upon earning his doctorate, he held the rank of Assistant
Professor  in  the  Department  of  Statistics  and  Actuarial  Science  at  the  University
of Iowa from 1985 to 1991 and held a secondary appointment in the Division of Bio-
statistics from 1988 to 1991.

Dr. Calvin Joined the Texas A&M University faculty in 1991. From 1998 to 2004,
he was Professor and Head of the Department of Statistics with secondary appoint-
ments in veterinary anatomy and public health, epidemiology and biostatistics, and
toxicology.  In  2001,  he  became  an  Associate  Vice  President  for  Research  and  was
appointed  as  the  Executive  Associate  Vice  President  for  Research  in  2004.  He  has
served as Interim Vice President for Research since September 2007.

Dr. Calvin’s research interests include linear models, multi-variate variance com-
ponents,  biostatistics,  measurement  error,  spatial  models,  and  statistical  process
control.  He  is  the  principal  investigator  for  the  Texas  A&M  Institute  for  Applied
Mathematics  and  Computational  Science.  The  new  institute,  funded  by  King
Abdullah University of Science and Technology in Saudi Arabia, will engage mathe-
maticians,  statisticians  and  computer  scientists  on  problems  that  span  the  Earth
sciences, materials science and the bio-sciences. Applications include reservoir mod-
eling, thermo-acoustic and photo-acoustic imaging related to disease diagnosis, gene
expression  modeling  and  complex  data,  including  seismic  and  genomic  information.
Dr. Calvin has served on several editorial boards, including Biometrics, where he
served  as  Executive  Editor,  the  Journal  of  the  American  Statistical  Association,
Communications  in  Statistics  and  the  ASA–SIAM  Series  on  Statistics  and  Applied
Probability.  Dr.  Calvin  is  a  fellow  of  the  American  Statistical  Association  and  an
elected member of the International Statistical Institute. He has directed seven suc-
cessful graduate students and authored numerous publications.

DISCUSSION

Chairman  BAIRD.  Thank  you  all  for  outstanding  testimony.  We

much appreciate it.

We  will  now  begin  the  questions,  and  I  will  recognize  myself  for
five  minutes,  and  we  will  follow  with  Dr.  Ehlers.  We  have  been
joined by Dr. McNerney from California. Dr. McNerney, thank you
for joining us and for your service on this committee.

I  want  to  begin  by  addressing  what  we  heard  from  a  number  of
you,  the  issue  of  visas.  This  committee  has  had  a  hearing  on  this,
and  the  good  news  that  we  are  told  that  the  visas  are  improving.
The  bad  news  is  there  is  still  a  lot  of  challenge  both  in  terms  of
the reality of whether they are being processed quickly enough and
also  the  perceptual  realities  internationally  about  the  difficulties
people  face.  We  have  had  both  hearings  publicly  here  but  also  pri-
vate meetings with a number of people from various Homeland Se-
curity  and  related  departments,  and  we  are  continuing  to  work  on
that. The point is well-taken, and we are working on that.

Also, I want to begin also by congratulating you, Dr. Leshner, on
the  Center  for  Science  Diplomacy.  And  we  are  honored  that  you
would announce that here and perhaps you have announced it else-
where, but it is——

Dr. LESHNER. No, today is the day.
Chairman BAIRD. Is that right?
Dr. LESHNER. This is the moment.
Chairman  BAIRD.  It  is  perfect.  Great  minds  think  alike  I  guess,
and  I  can’t  think  of  a  better  organization  to  do  that.  We  will  look
forward to good things from the Center, and any way we can assist
in that, we will be happy to and to celebrate your accomplishments.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

Now,  you  also  mentioned,  Dr.  Leshner,  the  importance  of  the
Foreign  Relations  Committee.  Howard  Berman  is  quite  interested
in this issue. We have had a number of conversations with him and
his  staff.  They  have  been  sitting  in  on  meetings,  and  our  hope  is
really  to  kind  of  set  the  table  here  through  this  series  of  hearings
we  have  been  having  and  then  work  in  very  close  concert  with
Chairman Berman and also with Nita Lowey. They both appreciate
the  value  of  this  and  have  some  great  staff  working  on  this  issue,
and we are eager to work with them on that.

I  want  to  ask  a  few  questions  if  I  may.  This  issue  repeatedly
mentioned  in  your  testimony  about  the  restrictions  on  U.S.  funds
to  go  to  foreign  researchers,  a  couple  questions  emerge.  One,  we
have the Fulbright Program, predominantly to bring folks here, but
do  we  need  something  like  that  where  we  would  fund  foreign  re-
searchers in their home countries with U.S. dollars? You don’t nec-
essarily  want  to  dilute  the  NSF  monies,  but  how  would  we  do  it?
If you could devise a program, what would it look like? And we will
hear from all the witnesses.

Dr. LESHNER. Perhaps I will start. I would say that from my own
perspective,  the  only  conditions  under  which  I  would  support  re-
search  in  a  foreign  country  without  an  American  collaborator  is  if
in  fact  it  was  something  we  really  needed  to  know  and  we  were
confident  it  was  something  that  was  not  going  to  happen  in  the
United States.

Chairman BAIRD. Let us assume we have a U.S. collaborator.
Dr. LESHNER. Right. So when we have a U.S. collaborator, often,
particularly  in  developing  countries,  the  foreign  collaborator  can’t
afford  to  provide  the  resources  for  their  part  of  their  research.  If
we’re serious about fostering collaboration and if we have a serious
motivation  towards  helping  in  infrastructure  development  in  other
countries,  particularly  in  the  developing  world,  then  I  think  we
have  an  obligation  to  provide  at  least  minimal  support.  The  big
issue, however, in the diplomacy aspect of this is to make sure that
these are not just one-shot, one-year investments. If we are serious
about  building  infrastructure,  we  have  to  be  willing  to  sustain  it
and maintain it at least for a while over time.

Chairman BAIRD. Very good point.
Dr. CLEGG. I agree with Alan’s points, but let me add that in my
capacity  with  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  I  travel  around
the  world  very  frequently  and  meet  with  the  leadership  of  science
of most of the countries of the world, and it is remarkable the num-
ber  who  have  had  experiences  in  the  United  States.  Most  of  them
speak  English,  they  know  our  culture  much  better  than  we  know
theirs,  they  are  very  good  interpreters  of  our  society  in  their  own
environments, they are our friends. Typically they desire to collabo-
rate  with  us.  This  is  a  huge  investment  that  began  after  World
War  II  and  continued  up  until  the  late  ’80’s  but  after  that  has  de-
clined substantially. These assets will not be there. This generation
is  passing  from  the  scene.  We  will  not  have  the  kinds  of  contacts
and people who are familiar with our scientific institutions and our
society more broadly in the leadership of science internationally in
the future.

So  I  would  urge  that  one  important  step  is  to  begin  to  re-estab-
lish the support for international graduate studies from developing

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

countries,  not  from  the  developed  countries  but  from  developing
countries  where  we  can  continue  to  benefit  from  this  personal  ex-
change.

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Wulf.
Dr.  WULF.  Several  points  I  would  like  to  make.  First  of  all,  the
issue of funding foreign scientists to do research in their own coun-
tries  is  what  CRDF  does,  funded  by  NSF,  the  State  Department,
Department of Energy, Department of Defense, and NIH. The origi-
nal  goal  was  to  fund  foreign  scientists.  This  is  something  that  an
NGO  can  do.  It  is  not  so  easy  for  the  Federal  Government  to  do.
Second, I would like to amplify just a little bit on your comment
about visas in two dimensions. First of all, I think all of us sitting
at  this  table  travel  a  good  deal  overseas,  and  a  common  reaction
that I get from my colleagues overseas is ‘‘what are you doing?’’ We
are  shooting  ourselves  in  the  foot,  although  I  know  that  the  aver-
age  time  it  takes  for  a  student  visa  to  clear  has  gone  from  several
months  down  to  less  than  two  weeks.  That  is  not  the  story  that
plays  on  the  front  page  of  the  newspapers  overseas.  It  is  the  rare
but  newsworthy  case  where  it  takes  six  months  or  we  deny  a  visa
to a renowned scientist.

There  is  a  second  problem,  and  that  is  the  problem  of  ‘‘deemed
exports.’’ I had the privilege of serving on the Department of Com-
merce  Committee  to  look  at  the  question  of  deemed  exports,  but
unless  something  changes,  we  could  wind  up  in  a  situation  in
which no foreign student is allowed to do any research at a univer-
sity  in  the  United  States.  It  is  a  very  serious  problem.  Our  Com-
mittee  submitted  its  report  to  the  Secretary  of  Commerce  back  in
late  December  or  early  January.  I  think  they  have  been  working
on  it.  But  there  may  be  legislative  action  that  is  required  as  well,
and so I would urge you to think about that.

And finally, I would like to just reiterate some of what Mike said
about  the  goodwill  that  we  have  engendered  overseas  because  of
the foreign students who have been here. Mike and I were both in
Iran in October, and it is just hard to explain how much the faculty
at  places  like  Sharif  University,  which  is  sort  of  their  MIT,  like
Americans,  understand  our  values,  admire  our  values,  and  are
some of the best ambassadors that we have in the entire world. So
this is gold.

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Calvin?
Dr.  CALVIN.  I  think  many  of  the  points  have  already  been  men-
tioned,  so  I  don’t  want  to  duplicate  them,  but  two  things  I  think
are  important  to  recognize  is  one,  not  all  countries  we  want  to  en-
gage  in  national  partnerships  are  the  same.  And  so  a  model  that
may  work  well  in  many  developing  countries  isn’t  necessarily  the
right  model  to  engage  China,  for  example.  And  so  I  think  we  need
to  come  up  with  a  broader  perspective  on  the  issue  of  how  we  ap-
proach the problem.

Second,  I  think  it  is  important  from  a  scientific  standpoint  that
we  need  to  have  a  model  so  that  the  money  goes  where  it  goes
where  it  needs  to  go  to  get  the  science  done.  And  if  that  is  in  on
relocation or the other, it shouldn’t be the issue. Is the science get-
ting  done  and  is  the  effective  partnership  in  place  to  make  that
science  work  appropriately.  And  if  we  pay  attention  about  quotas
on one side or the other, we eventually find that there is inefficien-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

cies  in  the  system  that  doesn’t  allow  us  to  get  as  much  bang  for
our buck as we would like.

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Calvin, I will close with one comment, and
then  recognize  Dr.  Ehlers,  and  that  is  that  Dr.  Clegg,  you  men-
tioned  and  others  mentioned  the  importance  of  Mid-East  applica-
tions  of  scientific  diplomacy.  One  of  the  things  I  would  hope  we
would also do, I think it is absolutely correct that our technological
and  scientific  prowess  is  admired  by  Middle  Eastern  nations.  I
would  hope  we  could  also  look  at  science  diplomacy  as  leading  to
our recognition of the scientific history and contributions of Middle
Eastern nations. One need only look at some of the early astrolabes
created  by  Islamic  scientists  to  realize  that  we  owe  a  profound
debt, algebra, zero, a few other things——

Dr. CALVIN. Right. Absolutely.
Chairman  BAIRD.—to  them,  and  we  need  to  accentuate  that

awareness within our own culture I think as well.

With that, I recognize Dr. Ehlers.
Mr. BILBRAY. First I want to clarify that they hijacked that from
India and from the Far East, too, so it was transmission of knowl-
edge, not necessarily the discovery of it.

Mr. EHLERS. That was not me, by the way.
Chairman BAIRD. The Chair recognizes Dr. Ehlers.
Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you.  It  just  struck  me  when  you  said  they
gave us zero. They gave us zero and we give them nothing, and we
think it is a fair exchange.

Thank you very much for your testimony. It has been very, very
enlightening  to  me.  I  spent  a  year  in  Germany  many  years  ago  as
a post-doctorate fellow supported by NATO, and I thought that was
a  marvelous  program,  especially  to  have  some  of  our  military
money funneled into a good program like that. But also later on my
research advisor, Bill Nuremberg—some of you know him, brilliant
physicist,  lots  of  energy,  but  also  a  good  diplomat—he  was  ap-
pointed by the Department of State as the representative to NATO
on the science level. And we did those things much more often back
then.

I think we certainly have to return to that and we have to correct
the  visa  problem,  but  I  am  very  impressed,  Bill,  with  the  program
you  outlined  and  I  didn’t  know  much  about  it  and  I  am  pleased  to
hear about what you are doing. It is a very good way to do it.

One  thing  we  did  at  Berkeley  when  I  was  on  the  faculty  there,
we  took  some  students  from  Turkey  and  had  them  in  our  laps  for
a  few  years,  and  then  one  of  our  faculty  members,  one  of  my  col-
leagues, spent some time in Turkey; and it was a marvelous experi-
ence  because  it  made  us  realize  how  difficult  it  is  to  do  research
in  a  foreign  country.  And  when  my  colleague  was  over  there,  al-
most every day I would get a telephone call, can you send me three
O  rings  of  such-and-such  a  size.  It  really  was  that  bad.  And  we
don’t  appreciate  that  enough,  and  I  think  having  their  students
come here and letting our students and professors go there is really
good in helping break the logjam in that. Some of the horror stories
that  I  have  heard  from  foreign  scientists  I  have  worked  with,  one
ordered a marvelous new piece of equipment—this was many years
ago,  before  bubble  wrap  and  all  those  sort  of  things.  It  was  pack-
aged  in  a  box  with  not  foam  insulation  but  micro  light  insulation

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

and paper. The customs official just sliced that open, filled the sci-
entific  equipment  with  all  these  little  particles.  It  took  them  six
months to clean it out. It is just endless problems to be dealt with.
I am just very pleased with what you said and the progress I see.
I think we ought to work very hard at breaking down some of these
barriers, and the first time I encountered it when I got here, I was
asked  to  write  this  brief,  little  booklet  on  science  policy.  And  one
of  the  goals—I  think  I  developed  it  with  the  assistance  of  the  Na-
tional  Academy—was  to  get  a  scientist  back  in  the  State  Depart-
ment.  Why  that  ever  stopped,  I  don’t  know.  But  the  difficulty  of
getting it restarted just amazed me. It seemed to me a self-evident
thing. Fortunately it is under way now.

We have so much work to do in so many areas on this topic, and
I am just glad you are there doing it. I don’t really have questions,
I  just  wanted  to  say  I  am  very  pleased  with  what  you  are  doing,
and  keep  it  up.  If  there  are  things  that  we  can  do  to  help,  please
let  us  know.  The  visa  question,  Dr.  Baird  has  done  a  great  job  on
addressing  that,  but  we  know  there  are  a  lot  of  other  issues  we
should  be  addressing.  I  would  like  to  see  a  lot  more  exchange  pro-
grams,  not  just  the  current  situation  where  some  students  come
here if they get the money and we send some people there, but an
organized  program  with  constant  exchange,  as  we  used  to  do  with
the Soviet Union.

I  think  I  have  time  left,  but  I  will  set  a  standard  for  everyone,
be  the  first  one  to  close  before  the  bell  goes  off.  Thank  you  very
much, Mr. Chairman.

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. McNerney.
Mr. MCNERNEY. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. I do want
to  thank  you  for  pulling  this  together.  It  is  a  very  important  sub-
ject.  And  you  know,  as  important  as  it  is  for  the  development  of
science  and  technology,  it  is  also  as  you  mentioned  critical  for  just
understanding  international  issues.  I  think  science  is  the  tool  we
can  use  to  open  up  these  barriers.  And  so  I  really  encourage  you
and you colleagues to continue.

I  have  a  couple  of  questions.  First  of  all,  how  interested  do  you
see  multinational  corporations  being  in  developing  an  infrastruc-
ture for international scientific cooperation and collaboration?

Dr.  WULF.  CRDF  has  experienced  substantial  financial  support
from multinational corporations, both for research projects and also
for education.

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  Are  there  particular  sectors  that  you  think  are

more interested in——

Dr. WULF. The energy sector has been very interested. The high-
tech sector, it is an embarrassment that we are now a net importer
of high-tech products. But yes.

Dr. CLEGG. I will just echo what Bill says. There is great interest
because  of  the  perception  that  markets  are  largely  going  to  go
abroad  and  not  to  the  United  States.  And  so  American  high-tech
industries  have  a  strong  interest  in  developing  relationships
abroad.  But  their  interests  are  largely  driven  by  their  business
models and a need to deliver to their stockholders. But they aren’t
as  interested  I  think  in  the  long-term  issues  that  we  have  tried  to
portray in our presentations.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  Do  you  think  that  the  standards  of  ethics  and
integrity are an important issue for scientific development in coun-
tries  that  have  different  cultures  than  us,  I  guess  is  a  way  to  say
that?

Dr.  LESHNER.  Sure,  and  more  and  more  we  are  seeing  evidence
that  as  the  global  scientific  enterprise  becomes  more  unified,  more
integrated,  we  are  seeing  more  and  more  efforts  among  countries
to  have  those  kinds  of  discussions  very  candidly.  We  have  partici-
pated  in  an  array  of  them,  including  with  China  who  has  invested
tremendously,  a  tremendous  amount  of  effort  in  trying  to  develop
their own set of standards and regulations and have them being in
keeping  with  the  rest  of  the  world.  But  it  is  an  effort  that  has
begun  and  needs  to  continue.  I  am  sure  that  the  Academies  and
the InterAcademy Panel have worked on these issues as well.

Dr.  CLEGG.  Let  me  just  pick  upon  what  Alan  has  said  and  also
to  relate  it  back  to  a  comment  that  Bill  made.  As  Bill  mentioned,
we have a program of workshops with Iran which are conducted on
an  annual  basis.  One  of  the  first  workshops  that  the  Iranians
wanted  to  have  was  on  scientific  ethics.  But  I  would  like  to  also
return  in  the  context  of  ethics  to  a  broader  point  which  is  that
science does operate within an ethical framework because you can-
not  do  science  without  paying  attention  to  the  material  evidence,
and  science  has  to  be  repeatable  so  it  has  to  be  honest.  So  there
is  an  ethical  basis  to  science  which  adds  we  believe  to  the  temper
of society, and therefore helping expand science and technology ca-
pabilities  in  other  parts  of  the  work  also  expands  an  ethical  basis
which is an important dimension of science.

Mr. MCNERNEY. Thank you. I am not sure who to ask this ques-
tion  or  who  to  direct  this  question  to.  What  do  you  think  the  lim-
iting  factors  are  in  promoting  global  scientific  cooperation  and  col-
laboration?  What  are  the  ultimate  limiting  factors?  Is  it  political,
is  it  economic,  is  it  cultural,  or  is  it  something  else  that  I  haven’t
mentioned?

Dr. CALVIN. My experience is that—and of course, this is coming
from  a  single  institution—but  there  is  no  limitation  in  scientists’
interest or willingness as long as the research is available for pub-
lic  peer  review  processes  to  find  new  partners  and  engage  in  new
collaborations. What is limiting is mechanisms to provide introduc-
tions to those individuals and then the model so that if you can in-
stigate a new partnership, you can actually follow through on your
relationship.  As  it  stands  right  now,  if  I  have  a  colleague  in  an-
other  country,  we  have  to  go  to  separate  funding  mechanisms
under separate funding cycles and hoping that we can make a case
for  something  that  is  of  interest  to  two,  non-coordinated  bodies  to
be able to push forward from an initial process. So it is this coordi-
nation of communication, and then a model that approves the part-
nership.

Mr. MCNERNEY. What you see is a bureaucracy, the bureaucratic

hassle is one of the biggest factors, then?

Dr.  CALVIN.  I  guess  if  you  want  to  put  it  that  way.  You  know,

resources always become an issue at some point.

Mr. MCNERNEY. Of course.
Dr. CALVIN. But faculty members at our institution are aware of
what  is  going  on  worldwide,  and  if  they  have  a  collaborator  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

is anywhere in the world, they know how to get a hold of them and
they  have  the  international  conferences  to  make  the  introductions.
What they don’t have is the mechanism to take the next step.

Dr.  LESHNER.  One  of  the  things  if  I  might  just  mention  is  that
the European Commission opened its Framework Seven petition to
people outside of the European Union, and we met with the Argen-
tine  Science  Minister  last  week  who  very  proudly  pointed  out  the
extent of Argentina’s participation in Framework Seven. Well, that
is not only a form of science diplomacy but it is certainly a mecha-
nism  that  makes  it  a  whole  lot  easier  to  develop  international  co-
operation. And it is part of the reason why I am obsessed with the
notion  that  we  need  to  rethink  the  way  in  which  we  structure  our
own funding for international science diplomacy.

Mr. MCNERNEY. Thank you.
Dr.  WULF.  I  can’t  not  say  that  resources  are  also  a  limiting  fac-
tor, which you didn’t mention. I have been really impressed by the
fact  that  CRDF’s  average  grant  to  support  foreign  scientists  and
collaboration  between  foreign  scientists  and  U.S.  scientists  is
$60,000  over  two  years.  Eighty  percent  of  that  money  goes  to  for-
eign scientists, 20 percent to the United States. That is a tiny, tiny
little  bit  of  money  and  yet  we  have  no  problem  finding  U.S.  sci-
entists  who  want  to  participate.  They  do  it  because  they  think  it
is  important,  because  they  think  it  is  a  contribution  that  they  can
make to the world. You know, that is not the limitation, money is.
Mr. MCNERNEY. Speaking of limitations, I think I have run over

my time a little bit, Mr. Chairman, so I yield back.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Fortunately,  Mr.  Ehlers  had  pre-yielded  time.

It is a time back that Mr. McNerney drew upon.

Mr. EHLERS. I may reclaim that.
Chairman BAIRD. Mr. Bilbray.
Mr. BILBRAY. Yes, Dr. Calvin, if you want to be frustrated by un-
coordinated  efforts,  you  should  try  to  work  with  the  Senate.  Mr.
Chairman,  I  apologize.  I  wasn’t  going  to  mention  anything  about
the  visa,  but  it  really  is  a  very  important  issue  and  I  hope  that
today we can sort of understand that the Science Committee ought
to  be  an  advocate.  But  understand  that  the  obstructionism  that  is
caused  at  the  visa  process  is  not  the  problem.  It  is  a  symptom  of
a problem. Now, we all have heard back and forth the 9–11 terror-
ists were visa overstays, and we assume that the concept of check-
ing like visa status whenever you let somebody into an educational
institution  is  not  the  business  of  educationalized  institutions,  but
then again, you have the 9–11 terrorist take a class in aviation and
use  it,  and  that  is  one  of  the  problems.  So  I  just  hope  that  this
Chairman or this committee becomes the perfect spokesman for the
fact  that  our  problem  is  that  we  are  trying  to  do  it  all  at  the  bor-
der.  You  know,  we  are  trying  to  restrict  those  who  come  into  our
country,  and  what  happens  is  the  bureaucrat  who  is  making  these
calls  has  a  feeling  that  once  I  say  okay,  there  is  nothing  to  back
me up afterwards. Forty percent of the people illegally in this coun-
try are visa overstays, and to a lot of people, their argument is the
way you eliminate 40 percent of the problem is just don’t allow any
visas, and I don’t think any of us wants to do that.

But  I  think  that  if  we  want  to  open  up  and  make  the  system
more rational, we have got to understand we got to stop taking the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

political  easy  route  of  saying,  let  us  do  it  all  at  the  border,  let  us
just  not  issue  visas  or  let  us  tighten  up  the  visa  process.  Rather
than having a back-up system so that the agent who was given the
visa  can  be  assured  that,  look,  somebody  might  slip  through,  they
might overstay, but at least I know then that somebody is checking
that  they  can’t  get  a  driver’s  license,  they  can’t  open  a  bank  ac-
count, they can’t get a job; and then I feel you are going to see the
visa  system  much  more.  But  historically,  we  have  not  been  brave
enough  to  address  that.  I  mean,  this  week  I  think  we  are  going  to
have  a  vote  on  e-verification.  Very  simple  system,  name  and  num-
ber  matches.  But  even  that  people  don’t  want  to  take  the  political
heat  for,  so  it  ends  up  being  easier  politically  to  put  it  all  on  the
visa  system.  And  I  think  that  as  a  child  of  an  immigrant  and
watching  my  cousins  trying  to  get  into  this  country,  that  is  one
thing  that  we  have  got  to  open  up.  But  if  we  want  it  opened  up,
then we have got to be willing to take the heat at having a backup
system  and  that  means  doing  these  checks,  to  assure  the  visa  ap-
plication  handler,  you  are  not  the  only  barrier  between  the  Amer-
ican people and somebody who may come into the country or over-
stay.

But  getting  back  to  one  of  the  things  I  am  interested  in  is  the
use of water. I think one of the things we are missing is that water
is  going  to  be  the  most  destabilizing  element  in  the  world  in  the
future, more than oil, and especially from the Jordan to India from
the  Kurdistan  down  to  the  sub-Sahara.  And  the  Muslim  world  is
one  of  the  biggest  crisis.  I  am  very  encouraged  with  your  work  of
getting  Israel  and  Jordan  working  together  because  no  one  in  the
world has done more at conservation and application of water than
Israel.  Negative  desert  research  with  high  salinity,  that  really
could have a great diplomatic advantage of moving science but also
getting  two  parts  of  that  world  working  together,  and  if  somebody
who  has  worked  since  I  was  25  years  old  working  with  Mexico  on
environmental economic issues, that is how you build relationships,
is  working  at  joint  problems  together.  And  can  you  elaborate  on
how you got Jordan and Israel working together?

Dr.  CLEGG.  Well,  actually,  it  was  Jordan,  Israel,  and  Palestine,
and we initially approached the parties to work on it on a scientific
project  of  high  importance,  as  a  bridge-building  mechanism  to  cre-
ate  understanding  between  the  scientists  in  that  conflicted  region
of  the  world.  The  initial  focus  was  actually  on  health,  but  during
the process the issue of water in the Jordan Valley which is a very
contentious  and  difficult  political  issue  came  to  the  fore  as  one  of
the  primary  issues.  So  a  committee  of  scientists  representing  all
three  entities,  including  also  the  United  States,  was  put  together
under  our  sponsorship.  We  provided  the  money  for  the  work  and
so  forth,  and  that  led  to  a  book-length  report  that  I  cited  in  my
written  testimony  called  Water  for  the  Future.  This  effort  is  slow.
This  kind  of  work  is  not  easy  because  it  means  building  trust  and
relationships among people where there is very little trust to begin
with.  That,  however,  has  matured  into  a  number  of  efforts  on  our
part to work together with those three parties, including something
called  the  frontiers  of  science  for  young  and  mid-career  scientists
of  the  Middle  East  which  we  have  hosted  twice  now,  once  in
Istanbul  and  most  recently  in  Spain.  This  brings  young  and  mid-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

career  scientists  together  for  symposia  on  five  quite  distinct  areas
of science, to build relationships and understanding.

We  also  just  had  a  meeting  in  January  in  Jordan  on  the  Dead
Sea  with  Palestine,  Israel,  and  Jordan  to  focus  on  other  areas  of
science that we can work on. Among them are micro-nutrient defi-
ciencies which is a serious health problem in the Middle East, land
degredation  and  pollution,  water  resources,  education.  But  that
takes  resources,  and  virtually  all  of  the  support  for  these  kinds  of
activities  has  come  from  private  sources,  either  philanthropic
sources or from our own institutional endowments. So what we can
do is fairly limited.

So this allows me to come back to this question of resources. You
cannot  do  things  without  adequate  resources,  no  matter  how  good
your intentions are. Resources are important.

The  other  key  thing  is  that  science  can  be  an  essential  compo-
nent  of  soft  diplomacy  and  can  help  solve  problems  in  all  parts  of
the  world.  I  would  like  to  just  say  one  word  about  our  part  of  the
world. Our activities also include Latin America. You cited Mexico.
We did a joint study on water and the water issues facing the basin
of  the  Valley  of  Mexico  in  Mexico  City,  together  with  the  Mexican
Academy  of  Sciences  which  has  been  influential  in  that  country.
We do continued water work in Mexico.

I  just  came  from  Central  America  on  Sunday  night.  It  is  a  dis-
appointment  to  see  that  our  national  engagement  and  soft  diplo-
macy in Central America is very little——

Mr. BILBRAY. Doctor, I totally agree with you. We have totally ig-
nored Central America. We spent more time in Argentina than we
do in Costa Rica or El Salvador.

Dr.  CLEGG.  The  northern  Europeans  make  bigger  investment  in
science and technology diplomacy in Central America than does the
United  States  despite  the  fact  that  this  is  a  vital  region,  of  vital
interest to us. I will stop talking.

Mr. BILBRAY. Well, I will talk about that later.
Chairman  BAIRD.  We  will  begin  the  second  round  of  comments
and  questions.  Dr.  Calvin,  you  were  building  kind  of  a  line  of
thought  earlier  it  seemed  like  and  at  the  critical  juncture  paused
and  talked  about,  okay,  so  you  have  got  U.S.  researchers,  foreign
researchers,  and  I  think  you  used  the  word  there  is  a  lack  of  a
mechanism or some word like that. What would a mechanism look
like?  How  would  it  be  administered?  What  would  you  do  if  you
want  to  promote  scientific  diplomacy,  international  collaboration?
What would it look like?

Dr. CALVIN. Well, I think again, as I said before, it would depend
somewhat  on  which  area  of  the  globe  I  was  trying  to  promote  this
effort. I think if you take for example in China where we have had
our  three  China-U.S.  summits,  what  we  have  come  out  of  this  is
we  have  a  lot  of  debate  and  a  lot  of  discussion,  and  we  bring  sci-
entists  together.  Everybody  is  excited,  and  then  after  three  con-
ferences,  we  are  still  at  the  same  stage  because  no  one  can  find  a
good  model  to  really  move  the  projects  to  that  next  stage  of  dis-
covery.

And  so  I  think  in  the  case  of  China,  there  is  quite  a  reason  to
believe  that  we  could  work  with  the  Chinese  government  to  estab-
lish a jointly funded research capability that would allow for inves-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

tigators to apply to an agency that would be financed by both coun-
tries potentially. I don’t believe that we would want to make an ar-
gument  that  we  would  want  to  change  the  dedication  of  the  exist-
ing  resources  at  the  National  Science  Foundation,  for  example,  be-
cause they are woefully under funded from my perspective as they
sit  right  now,  and  asking  more  and  giving  them  less  isn’t  a  way
to do anything better.

Beyond  that,  I  don’t  have  an  effective  mechanism  because  I  am
sure  that  the  political  aspects  associated  with  getting  anything
through  the  channels  of  dialogue  are  far  beyond  my  experiences
and I couldn’t advocate in an area where I have so little expertise.
Chairman  BAIRD.  The  things  I  found  intriguing  was,  you  know,
we have looked at some of the S&T agreements that our State De-
partment has established. I think you said 130 MOAs? I think that
is  more  than  our  government  officially  has  with  other  countries—
I don’t mean that as a critical comment, more just it is—entity may
have more international agreements than the Federal Government,
and the administration of these things—they are a relatively small
staff,  tasked  with  creating  these  agreements,  but  the  follow-up
then becomes a problem.

I  will  share  an  anecdote  with  you,  and  I  want  to  pursue  this
issue  of  funding  and  how  we  get  around  it  or  detail  with  it.  My
wife,  who  does  international  development  work,  was  in  an  African
country  and  they  were  talking  about  the  relative  small  number  of
people  some  developing  countries  have  who  are  expertise.  In  this
particular African country, they had three water sanitation experts,
one  of  whom  died  of  AIDS  and  the  two  others  were  killed  in  a  car
wreck  coming  back  from  his  funeral.  And  that  was  it.  You  know,
in  our  country  you  just  post  an  ad  and  you  would  get  50  applica-
tions  and  you  would  replace  them.  That  was  the  entire  country’s
water sanitation unit. This issue of capacity building is really crit-
ical,  and  one  of  the  interesting  questions  I  have  is  Dr.  Wulf,  you
are an agent in the organization. It seems to be able to get money
to  foreign  researchers,  and  yet,  other  U.S.  Government  entities
seem  not  to  be  able  to  do  that.  Is  this  a  desirable  mechanism,  are
there better alternatives?

One of my questions is does it make sense for example for State
or USAID to have a fund that while we don’t dilute the NSF funds
as  Dr.  Calvin  I  think  I  agree  entirely  with  what  he  is  saying,  but
nevertheless,  an  NSF-funded  researcher  could  say,  okay,  I  want  to
collaborate  with  Dr.  So-and-SO  in  foreign  country  ‘‘X.’’  Here  is
where  we  will  go  and  everybody  knows  this  is  where  we  go.  So  I
throw that question out.

Dr. WULF. My understanding is that there might be legal restric-
tions  on  NSF  providing  money  to  foreign  researchers.  I  don’t  quite
understand how this works, but they seem to be able to fund CRDF
for  programs  that  involve  foreign  researchers  collaborating  with
U.S.  partners.  Actually,  I  think  there  are  some  advantages  other
than  legal  sleight  of  hand  going  on  here.  Because  for  example,
CRDF  can  negotiate  with  foreign  governments  for  cost-sharing  ar-
rangements.  That  is  something  that  NSF  or  I  think  any  federal
agency  may  not  be  able  to  do  as  quickly.  And  we  have  been  fairly
successful  at  that.  The  foreign  governments  clearly  recognize  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

advantage of these collaborations and have demonstrated that with
$43 million of cost sharing.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Let  me  follow  up  with  just  a  question  on  this.
You  know,  USAID,  I  think  I  actually  support  it,  has  made  a  real
effort to brand. I mean, they have actually gone over the top a little
bit.  I  think  if  you  give  toothpicks,  you  would  have  to  find  a  gift  to
the  American  people  on  this  toothpick.  But  nevertheless,  the  idea
that in some way when we spend U.S. dollars internationally on an
AID  project,  people  get  the  sense  that,  yeah,  this  is  U.S.  dollars  is
a  good  thing  for  us.  Our  generosity  should  be  recognized,  I  think.
How does that translate into the work CRDF does?

Dr. WULF. I think foreign nationals recognize CRDF is a U.S. en-
tity, just not the U.S. Government. And that again is somewhat of
an  advantage  in  places  where  the  intentions  of  the  U.S.  Govern-
ment are not necessarily trusted.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Dr.  Leshner,  you  looked  like  you  wanted  to

comment.

Dr.  LESHNER.  Yeah,  I  was  just  going  to  reiterate  the  last  com-
ment  that  Dr.  Wulf  made  which  is  that  often  it  is  important  to  go
through  a  third  party  or  a  non-governmental  organization  so  that
the  sort  of  the  neutrality  of  the  motivation  is  clear.  Was  that
English what I just said? It was an attempt at English. And I think
because science carries this sort of aura around it, it is often impor-
tant to make clear that the act of science diplomacy, either collabo-
ration or for more general relationship building, is going on outside
of a formal governmental framework.

Dr.  CLEGG.  With  respect  to  Africa,  I  would  like  to  say  a  couple
of  things.  The  first  is  the  U.S.  philanthropic  community  has  cre-
ated a large footprint in Africa. The Gates Foundation does support
direct  research  in  Africa.  It  is  a  very  large  and  very  significant
player, as you know. There is also the Partnership for Higher Edu-
cation in Africa which is funded by six of the major American phil-
anthropic  foundations.  So  the  philanthropic  community  is  a  very
important  player  in  the  creation  of  soft  diplomacy  for  the  United
States,  even  though  it  is  not  part  of  the  government.  It  is  possible
to  leverage  some  of  those  activities,  and  it  would  be  useful  for  the
government  to  think  through  how  it  might  leverage  and  take  ad-
vantage  of  the  good  work  being  done  by  American  institutions  in
other contexts.

Another point is that we, together with the science academies of
the  whole  world,  have  created  a  global  organizations.  One  of  the
messages  of  that  global  organization  has  tried  to  get  across  to  all
of  the  national  members  is  that  investments  in  human  resources
in science and technology capabilities within individual countries is
an absolute necessity if they expect to participate in the economies
of  the  21st  century,  and  that  is  a  local  responsibility.  We  cannot
assume  that  responsibility,  but  we  can  work  hard  to  try  and  get
that  message  across  and  also  to  facilitate  their  movement  in  that
direction through incentives.

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Ehlers is recognized for 9-1/2 minutes.
Mr. EHLERS. At least. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. First, a couple
of  points.  Getting  to  the  question  of  our  government  supporting
other  scientists  in  other  countries  or  doing  other  things,  I  had  an
experience  with  my  family.  My  son  is  a  geophysicist.  I  never  real-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

ized before he even became that how much they travel. At the mo-
ment he is in Bolivia doing some very esoteric experiments in rath-
er  dangerous  territory,  and  he  has  also  done  research  in  British
Columbia, about 300 miles from the nearest person. He had a com-
mitment  from  a  colleague  in  Germany  to  do  some  research  to-
gether. The colleague obtained funds from the German government
to  do  it  if  the  U.S.  would  provide  the  money.  My  son  submitted  a
grant  proposal,  could  not  get  any  money  from  the  Federal  Govern-
ment  to  match  a  project  with  the  German.  That  seems  a  bit
strange  to  me.  And  of  course,  my  personal  ethics  didn’t  allow  me
to  intervene  on  his  behalf,  but  I  thought  that  was  symptomatic  of
the real problem here.

The  issue  of  resources,  Dr.  Clegg,  you  went  into  that  a  number
of  times,  the  resources  in  other  countries.  Are  you  talking  about
money  or  a  lot  of  other  resources  because  I  gave  you  the  example
of  my  friend  who  was  needing  three  O  rings  and  things  like  that
in  a  relatively  advanced  country.  I  think  that  is  a  major  problem
judging from the foreign scientists I have worked with. Just getting
equipment, and I am not talking about getting money from the gov-
ernment to order equipment from the U.S., but I am talking about
the  mundane  equipment  that  one  needs  every  day  in  the  labora-
tory. Have you encountered that as a major——

Dr.  CLEGG.  Oh,  absolutely,  particularly  in  travels  in  the  devel-
oping  world,  in  Latin  America,  in  parts  of  Africa  where  the  ability
to  put  together  a  functional  laboratory  is  inhibited  by  the  lack  of
access  and  also  the  lack  of  maintenance  for  high-quality  scientific
equipment. That is a very big issue.

Typically when we say resources, we are talking money one way
or the other. It is a nice way of saying money. But there are other
resources which are absolutely crucial. One is access to the world’s
scientific literature. You cannot be as you very well know of an ef-
fective  practicing  scientist  without  access  to  the  contemporary  de-
velopment of knowledge in a field. And the transforming technology
of  our  era  is  electronic  communication.  It  is  now  possible  to  access
knowledge  almost  from  anywhere  in  the  world.  There  are  just  two
barriers.  One  barrier  is  infrastructure,  whether  the  scientists  in  a
particular  country  have  the  infrastructure  to  get  on  the  web  and
access  the  scientific  literature,  and  the  other  is  intellectual  prop-
erty  issues  associated  with  publishers  like  my  friends.  Being  able
to  access  the  scientific  literature,  there  are  places  where  the  U.S.
Government  could  be  of  direct  help.  Creating  digital  scientific  li-
braries  where  resources  again  were  provided  to  buy  site  licenses
that would allow people in poor countries to access the scientific lit-
erature.  And  we  have  worked  together  on  programs  in  limited
areas  in  that  context.  One  is  Pakistan  where  we  found  that  we
could  purchase  bundled  site  licenses  at  a  huge  discount.  So  it  is
possible to do those sorts of things.

Mr. EHLERS. Alan?
Dr.  LESHNER.  There  is  a  large  consortium  called  HINARI  that
provides free access to the world’s scientific literature. There are a
very  large  number  of  countries  in  the  developing  world  that  most
major  journals  participate  in.  The  point  I  wanted  to  add  is  the
other,  and  it  may  be  resources  but  it  may  not  only  be  resources,
is  scientific  careers,  that  is,  that  it  has  to  be  clear  that  there  is  a

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

career  path  in  a  developing  country,  that  it  is  not  just  going  to  be
a  momentary  opportunity  or  you  won’t  be  able  to  recruit  the  best
and  brightest  into  careers.  Many  countries  now  are  working  very
hard  and  investing  very  hard  to  bring  the  scientists  who  train  in
the  United  States  back  home  by  providing  career  opportunities,
and it is very effective. China, of course, is the best example of that
at the moment. But other countries are doing this as well.

Mr.  EHLERS.  You  know,  I  am  reminded  of  a  cliche´.  Forgive  me.
Churchill  was  supposed  to  have  made  the  comment  that  America
always  does  the  right  thing  after  they  have  done  all  the  other
things first. It seems to me that we are at a state where we should
think  seriously  about  doing  this  as  a  national  effort  in  a  coordi-
nated way instead of having all of the different organizations doing
this. And there are tremendous opportunities there. I wouldn’t dare
to put this in the State Department because they don’t seem to un-
derstand  the  problem  and  the  urgency.  Are  we  going  to  give  the
charge to the National Science Foundation to do it? Not without in-
creasing  their  budgets  substantially.  But  we  really  have  to  think
seriously  about  developing  mechanisms  rather  than  depending  on
the  private  sector  or  the  National  Academy,  the  universities,  or
whatever.  There  is  immense  international  relations  work  to  be
done  here,  and  the  Federal  Government  is  just  not  doing  it.  It  is
depending  on  you  folks  to  do  it,  and  that  is  not  the  most  efficient
way  to  get  it  done.  So  I  hope  we  can  pursue  this  idea  together  in
some way.

Dr.  WULF.  Can  I  reinforce  that?  Just  in  my  travels  around  the
world  in  the  last  10  years,  I  feel  we  are  at  a  moment  in  time,
where this kind of activity could have an enormous impact, positive
impact, on U.S. foreign policy and U.S. hopes for democratizing the
rest  of  the  world.  We  have  just  got  an  opportunity,  and  it  is  very
frustrating  that  we  are  limited  in  being  able  to  take  advantage  of
that opportunity.

Mr.  EHLERS.  That  is  very  true,  and  you  know,  these  things  hap-
pen  in  a  haphazard  way.  I  had  a  constituent  come  to  me  a  couple
of  years  ago.  They  had  a  great  idea  for  a  new  water  filter.  It  is
made out of concrete with sand in it, et cetera, and he had backing
of  the  Rotary  Club.  He  wanted  to  know  what  I  could  do  for  him
through  the  government.  I  said,  not  much.  But  I  did  put  him  in
touch  with  a  friend  who  works  regularly  in  Africa  as  part  of  our
religious  denomination,  and  then  there  is  another  friend  of  mine
who  operates  a  plastic  extrusion  plant  so  he  replaced  the  concrete
with  plastic.  He  is  producing  these  things  at  very  low  cost.  Easy
to  ship  to  Africa.  We  are  saving  an  incredible  number  of  lives  just
with  a  simple,  local  project  which  results  in  purified  water  on  a
per-family or per-community basis. It is amazing, just a few people
getting  together.  That  is  without  the  benefit  of  the  Government,
and  maybe  it  is  best  that  we  don’t  have  the  government  involved
in it. It would increase the cost and the difficulty. But nevertheless,
we are missing—as a nation we are missing all these opportunities.
Chairman  BAIRD.  Thank  you,  Dr.  Ehlers.  Thank  you.  The  points
you  raise  is  really  the  purpose  of  these  hearings.  The  whole  series
of  hearings  is  to  try  to  understand  how,  from  many  perspectives,
what  is  being  done  and  then  see  what  we  can  do  in  an  improved

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

way  until  this  is  part  of  that.  I  agree,  I  want  to  raise  the  profile
and that is indeed why we are having this meeting.

We  have  now  been  joined  by  Mr.  Carnahan—we  mentioned  ear-
lier  their  role,  Russ,  was  discussed  the  importance  of  the  Foreign
Relations  Committee.  Russ  plays  a  central  role  because  he  has  a
joint assignment to both this committee and the Foreign Relations.
So welcome, Mr. Carnahan. Do you have any questions for our wit-
nesses? Recognized for five minutes.

Mr.  CARNAHAN.  Thank  you  and  I  apologize  for  being  late  today.
I got tied up on something else, but wanted to make a special point
to be here.

I guess I wanted to first start with kind of a broad question, and
we may have covered some of this but as we know, the Department
of  State  is  chiefly  responsible  for  our  diplomatic  relations  and  en-
gagement; and I guess I would want a description from you of what
their—how  they  are  using  the  role  of  science  and  diplomacy  now
in  ways  that  you  think  is  working.  What  do  you  think  is  working
best  about  that?  And  then  also,  what  do  you  think  is  some  of  the
obvious things that they are missing in terms of how it can be bet-
ter integrated, in what they do.

Dr.  LESHNER.  A  couple  of  examples  immediately  come  to  mind.
One is in a partnership with the Department of State led by Paula
Dobrianski. We organized a meeting on women in science and engi-
neering and the Muslim world, and that was an extremely effective
example  of  science  diplomacy  at  its  best  where  200  women  from  I
believe  30-some  countries  participated  in  that  meeting.  Recently
our Chief International Officer, Vaughan Turekian, just came back
from  a  meeting  in  Uruguay  to  start  talking  about  some  of  the  col-
laborations  that  an  organization  like  AAAS  might  be  able  to  help
facilitate. So there are examples.

I  think  the  issue  that  did  come  up  earlier  is  an  important  one
and  that  is  the  way  in  which  these  activities  are  initiated  and
maintained is critically important. And often to have a non-govern-
mental  organization  as  a  clear  partner  and  help  lend  neutrality,
whatever  the  word  is,  clear  motivation  to  it  so  that  it  is  not  just
implementing  a  particular  political  agenda  but  also  has  scientific
motivation as well.

Dr. CLEGG. I will just add a tiny bit. From actually in my written
testimony was a comment on the May 2007 strategic plan that the
Department  of  State  had  developed  on  setting  international  goals
for their science, technology, and health diplomacy. We think those
are  a  very  good  set  of  goals.  I  think  our  major  concern  is  whether
they  have  the  resources  and  capabilities  to  implement  them.  So
being  able  to  reach  out  to  other  organizations,  like  those  rep-
resented at this table, as partners in implementing those goals may
be helpful.

The  only  other  comment  is  that  often  the  science  technology  ca-
pabilities at the embassy level in U.S. missions abroad is fairly lim-
ited, and that is a disadvantage. It is again a resource-driven ques-
tion,  but  it  is  a  disadvantage  to  U.S.  diplomacy  because  it  makes
it  more  difficult  for  us  to  understand  and  interpret  it,  S&T
strengths  and  developments  in  the  countries  that  we  are  engaged
with.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

Dr.  WULF.  I  would  second  the  last  comment  that  Mike  made.
Over  the  last  several  decades,  the  number  of  science  attache´s  in
foreign embassies has dramatically dropped. The emphasis in most
of  the  State  Department  now  is  on  political  and  economic  issues.
It is a positive thing that there now is a science advisor to the Sec-
retary of State. We have a particularly good person, Nina Fedoroff,
in  that  position  now.  But  as  currently  structured  and  to  some  ex-
tent  as  currently  culturally  oriented,  the  State  Department  is  not
particularly good at implementing the kinds of things that we have
been  talking  about  this  morning.  That  is  why  they  use  us  and  I
think appropriately so.

Dr. CALVIN. I think the only thing I need to add on this is when
I  talk  about  the  science  and  diplomacy,  the  first  observation  that
comes  to  mind  is  always  that  the  scientific  timetable  for  success
and the political timetable for interest often don’t match. And it is
a  major  commitment  for  people  to  reshift  their  careers  to  certain
areas  of  emphasis  and  they  are  very  hesitant  to  do  so,  given  some
past  experiences  in  the  high-energy  physics  arena,  for  example,  to
make  these  leaps  of  faith  that  they  can’t  believe  that  their  crew
would be able to be supported once they make that transition.

Mr.  CARNAHAN.  Good  point.  I  appreciate  all  of  those.  One  thing
in particular I wanted to mention that I was on a recent delegation
trip that included a stop in India where they had announced a very
large  expansion  of  the  Fulbright  Program  there,  and  it  was  done
in a unique way, really opening it up to public and private funding
in a way that dramatically expands what they are doing there.

And so it was a neat, kind of local initiative what they are doing
right  there,  organized  through  the  embassy  there.  That  might  be
a  good  model  to  look  at  growing  those  kind  of  programs  in  other
parts of the world. Thank you very much.

Chairman BAIRD. Mr. Bilbray.
Mr.  BILBRAY.  Yes,  Mr.  Chairman.  One  of  the  things  I  think  we
were  talking  about  is  the  challenges  out  there,  and  somebody  will
bring  it  up.  I  think,  Mr.  Chairman,  one  of  the—while  we  face  the
challenges,  we  need  to  sort  of  look  at  great  opportunities.  I  think
that  we  use  the  term  worldwide  web  and  don’t  think  about  how
deep  it  really  does  run.  I  mean,  everybody  is  astonished  they  can
go  to  Kuwait  and  get  on  the  Internet.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think  any
of  us  that  have  spent  time  in  the  third  world,  when  you  go  back
into the villages in some of the poorest neighborhoods, some grand-
mother  has  figured  out  to  pick  up  two  or  three  old  computers  and
the  number  one  source  of  communication  between  countries  now,
in  third  world  countries,  are  not  telephones,  not  mail,  it  is  the
Internet. So I think this issue of the accessibility of third-world na-
tions having the accessibility to the world information is something
that  really  is  a  great  opportunity  if  we  can  figure  out  how  to  tear
those  barriers  down.  And  it  has  just  astonished  me  as  I  travel  in
the  third  world  when  I  get  back  there.  If  I  need  to  communicate
with  my  staff,  I  don’t  make  phone  calls,  I  get  on  the  Internet  and
just  figure  out  how  to  pay,  you  know,  15-whatever  to  a  little  old
lady  just  so  I  can  spend  15  minutes  to  communicate.  Just  let  my
staff know that they still have a job.

Building on that, let me just sort of go a whole different way. Dr.
Calvin,  we  were  looking  at  the  comment  on  Central  America.  I

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

mean,  how  many  Americans  realize  that  we  are  400  miles  further
away from San Diego where we sit now, Mr. Chairman, than where
we are from Central America, that it is right in our backyard. And
I  would  just  say  this  to  somebody  on  the  Foreign  Relations  Com-
mittee—maybe the Science Committee and Foreign Relations Com-
mittee  really  need  to  get  together  and  say  the  poor  stepchild  is
Central  America.  We  talk  about  South  America,  we  talk  about
Mexico,  but  Central  America  is  just  literally  a  diplomatic  black
hole for us in so many ways. And Dr. Calvin, you have talked about
Latin  America.  Is  there  any  specific  items  that  you  can  point  out?
Panama  is  a  good  example  but  you  know,  we  are  talking  about
some  of  the  poorest  people  right  in  our  back  yards.  It  is  going  to
have  an  effect  on  our  grandchildren’s  future  than  any  other.  What
are we doing in Central America?

Dr. CALVIN. I guess I will take a sort of the securest route to get
to  your  answer.  Our  relationship  with  Mexico  has  been  very  effec-
tive for a couple of reasons, clearly on the proximity between Texas
and Mexico is certainly an advantage. But also because of the Bor-
der Governor’s Initiatives and other activities that are taking place,
there is a recognition that these scientific changes can also produce
economic development benefits that can help the stability of the re-
lationship between Texas and Mexico, but Mexico has a size advan-
tage. And when you take the relationship we have with Mexico and
you talk to people—has come to visit us from Panama because they
want  to  put  a  duplicate  relationship  together  that  CONACYT  de-
veloped in Mexico, and the difficulty is the size of the capacity that
exists in Panama or these other countries. It is very difficult to du-
plicate because Texas A&M University and 40 universities in Mex-
ico.  We  have  Texas  A&M  University  and  maybe  over  two  or  three
universities  in  Panama,  and  many  of  them,  their  researchers  are
not  really  trained  to  be  globally  competitive  in  research  and  so
their  interests  are  in  upgrading  the  capacity  to  be  able  to  become
partners  with  global  environment  in  the  competitive  research
arena.

So we are trying to figure out how to partner with distinct polit-
ical  groups  in  a  global  area  because  each  of  them  doesn’t  really
have enough capacity to work as effectively individually as Mexico.
Mr.  BILBRAY.  Well,  that  is  why  like  last  month  we  met  with—
the  southern  parts  of  Mexico  have  not  gained  from  any  of  the  ex-
changes.  They  are  economic  cul-de-sacs.  But  Central  America,
which  was  once  a  united  country,  still  has  its  immigration  policy
as the United States of Central America. We need to address those
comprehensively to get them used to working together, but I would
be  interested  in  the  experience  you  had  in  Central  America  and
your  observations  and  the  challenges  there  because  we  have  got  a
whole  lot  of  scientific  research.  I  am  overseeing  Scripps  Institute
looking at Central America for the development of biofuels, and the
infrastructure is traditionally not there but the attitude toward the
United States is so positive right now, I worry about us looking to,
and no offense, Mr. Chairman, looking to Africa and Asia while we
overlook our neighbors. And if you could address that?

Dr.  CLEGG.  Well,  I  think  you  are  making  a  very,  very  important
point.  Much  of  Central  America  is  extremely  poor,  Guatemala,
Honduras,  Nicaragua.  Costa  Rica  is  a  bit  better,  and  the  question

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

is why does Costa Rica stand out, and the reason is that they have
invested  a  lot  more  in  education  and  tried  to  build  an  economy  fo-
cused on the comparative advantages that Costa Rica has, particu-
larly  in  the  environmental  context.  But  in  Nicaragua  for  example,
50 percent of the population is illiterate. I have had experiences in
Guatemala,  El  Salvador,  and  Nicaragua  in  my  duties  representing
the  Academy.  One  of  the  things  that  is  going  to  be  key  for  them
to move forward in their own development is to make more invest-
ments in education. But those to some extent are local responsibil-
ities.  There  are  things  that  we  can  help  with  by  providing  incen-
tives, but there are not things we can do for them.

Mr. BILBRAY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Dr.  WULF.  Can  I  just  add  something  here?  This  is  about  Ven-
ezuela which is not quite Central America but almost. I had a fas-
cinating experience in January. I was privileged to be inducted into
the National Academy of Sciences in Venezuela. I went down there
with  some  trepidation  given  the  bellicose  tone  of  exchanges  be-
tween our two governments, and what I found was exactly what we
are  talking  about  in  this  hearing,  namely  the  ability  of  scientists
and engineers, because of their shared values, because of their fre-
quent  training  in  the  United  States  to  communicate.  I  think  we
have  an  enormous  opportunity  to  turn  the  situation  around  with
Venezuela  and  the  opening  is  through  scientists  and  engineers.  I
think this is globally true, but it was just such a forceful, personal
experience.

Mr.  BILBRAY.  Well,  historically  in  Latin  America,  Academia  as  a
whole  has  not  been  politically  threatened,  and  so  the  political
structure  has  allowed  academia  to  do  trans-border  communication
that traditionally they would not allow any other institution to do.
So we do have the opportunity if they are willing to allow academia
and  scientists  to  cooperate  and  work  without  direct  supervision  by
government, where other institutions would not be allowed to do it.
Dr.  WULF.  And  this  is  a  perfect  example  of  where  using  NGOs
doesn’t  introduce  the  complication  of  government-to-government
interaction.

Dr.  CLEGG.  Just  to  follow  up,  I  just  returned  from  a  meeting  of
the network of Academies of Science in this hemisphere which was
held in Central America this weekend. We have a very effective or-
ganization  that  could  do  much,  much  more  in  that  network  of
science  academies;  and  it  tries  to  address  three  questions.  One  is
the problem of education in the hemisphere, the second is water re-
source issues in the hemisphere. So we have the means to do much
more.  We  have  built  the  relationships.  We  also  command  respect
among  our  peers  in  that  part  of  the  world  because  we  have  tried
to work together with them. But what we are able to do at the mo-
ment is limited once again by our resource capabilities.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Bilbray.  I  think  your  points
are  well-taken  about  relative  neglect  of  our  own  hemisphere.  I
know  well,  having  flown  to  Guatemala  once  and  I  get  off  the  air-
plane,  I  thought  I  would  be  back  home  in  Vancouver,  Washington,
yet I am already in Guatemala. We forget that.

I thank the witnesses for not only your outstanding and insight-
ful testimony, both verbal and written today, but your many years
of service, each and every one of you. The record of this committee

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

will  remain  open  for  additional  statements  from  Members  and  for
answers  to  any  follow-up  questions.  We  thank  the  witnesses,  the
audience  and  the  Members  of  the  Committee,  and  with  that,  the
hearing stands adjourned. Thank you very much.

[Whereupon, at 11:51 a.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:40 Oct 31, 2008 Jkt 043350 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\071508\43350 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

